Part 3. Chapter 101 to 140.

15 years ago, the town that Lee-yeon and Choo-ja had been living in was turned
upside down.
Strange people in black suits barged into old houses and searched them. They went
through everything, from bowls to storage boxes, kicking things around it as they
searched the entire town. For a few days, the place that was usually peaceful became
a rowdy mess.
During that time, Lee-yeon was home alone. She had been left in the home that her
uncle and Choo-ja had lived in while her uncle was dealing with his health
complications and had to be admitted to the hospital.
One normal, quiet day, Lee-yeon’s peace was interrupted by the sound of scratching
on wood.
“Please help me!” said the voice of a woman. “Please open the door!”
Lee-yeon, who had been doing her homework on the floor when she heard the
scratching, froze. It seemed like the woman was too weak to even knock on the door,
resorting instead to scratching at it. The thought of it alone sent a chill through Leeyeon’s spine.
“Someone is chasing me!” the voice continued. “Please hide me! Please! Save me!”
Lee-yeon dropped her pencil and moved away from the door slowly as the woman’s
sobbing became louder.
“Just open the door for a moment! Please! Let me in!”
Lee-yeon remembered the things that she had heard from the last few days. She
remembered that they were looking for a woman, the older folk had been rather upset
about it. She wondered if the woman at her door was the woman that they had been
looking for.
Her instincts told her to leave the door closed, to not let the woman in. But she knew
that she couldn’t do that. She saw herself in the woman, trembling in fear just as she
had been, all alone just as she had been. Lee-yeon didn’t hesitate as she opened the
door.
As the door swung open, her eyes met with the lady who had been sobbing at the
door. She looked up at Lee-yeon like she was her lifeline and began sobbing harder.
She looked like a mess. Her hair was in disarray and her hands had cuts all over them,
as if she had just run through a sea of thorny bushes. Lee-yeon looked around to see if
anyone was watching and quickly pulled the lady in with her and closed the door.
The lady had stayed in the house for quite some time. She had given Lee-yeon a huge
sum of money that Lee-yeon had forgotten about when she grew up and went to
university.
“I know,” she mumbled, staring at the ceremonial table with Choo-ja.
Choo-ja smiled. “Maybe the kind person is living a good life.”
I wonder if she ever ended up seeing her son, Lee-yeon thought. She smiled at Chooja. “I’m sure she’s living a good life with her son.”

“Chae-woo,” Lee-yeon called out for Kwon Chae-woo. The memorial was over, and she
was looking to see where he went. She saw him as he approached her, having just
come back from the yard. In his hands, he was holding an envelope. Lee-yeon
frowned. “What’s that?”
Wordlessly, Kwon Chae-woo handed her the envelope. There was a seal on it that
matched the logo on the jacket that Joo Dong-mi was always wearing. Lee-yeon
nodded as she opened the envelope to see what was inside.
There was a catalog explaining the work that the center did and an application with
his resumé.
Kwon Chae-woo sat beside Lee-yeon and rested his forehead against hers. His breath
tickled, but Lee-yeon didn’t even notice because all she could focus on was the way
that her heart sank looking at the application. There were so many empty slots left for
her to fill in.
“I only know my name and my birthday,” Kwon Chae-woo told her. “You can fill in the
rest.”
Lee-yeon frowned. “You said you were issued a new ID, right?”
“Yes.”
“Can you show it to me?”
Lee-yeon pretended to be busy studying the application as Kwon Chae-woo handed
her his ID. She took it in her hands and felt her body stiffen when she saw his photo.
She wondered when the photo had been taken. It showed Kwon Chae-woo, but it was
not the Kwon-Chae-woo that Lee-yeon knew. His eyes looked aggressive and his face
was cold as it stared back at her. She tried to look away, but she couldn’t seem to
bring herself to do it.
She scanned the rest of the ID, trying to avoid looking at the photo. She bit her lip
when she read when his birthday was. His birthday was the day that Lee-yeon had
witnessed him bury someone alive. That day had started all of this and she found it
eerie that it also happened to be his birthday.
She was snapped out of her thoughts when Kwon Chae-woo’s quiet voice asked her,
“Lee-yeon, what’s my education?”
Lee-yeon came back to her senses. She suddenly wanted to tell him everything.
Surely, he would be able to accept the whole situation now, right? Even though it was
complicated, they would be able to solve it together, right?”
She opened her mouth to say something. But she couldn’t.
She was afraid that, if she told him the truth, everything they had right now would be
ruined. Maybe he would get his memory back and everything would change. She
decided it was better to hide the truth for just a little more. Just a little more, it
wouldn’t hurt would it?
The more she fell for him, the harder it was to hide these things from him. But, even
then, she knew that she would have it no other way. Even when she knew that the
consequences to her actions would come back to bite her eventually.
She sat in silence as Kwon Chae-woo leaned back against the sofa and sighed.
“I guess my education isn’t that good,” he said.

Lee-yeon looked at him tentatively. “Well” she trailed off.
“Did I at least graduate high school?”
Lee-yeon looked at the ID and read the education portion. She nodded. “You did,” she
said. “Well, you got a GED.”
Kwon Chae-woo blinked. “Was I expelled?” His eyes looked desperate, like he needed
to know more.
Lee-yeon sighed. “Why are you making that face?” she asked. “Do you need to know
that much?”
He closed his eyes and pressed a hand against his temple. “What did you see in me?
Why did you even sign the marriage license?”
Lee-yeon looked at him and, without meaning to, answered, “Your face?”
“That was enough to make you marry someone who was lacking in everything else?”
he scoffed. “Really?”
“What? It’s an important thing.”
Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t hide the smile on his lips. “Sometimes, I feel like that’s the
only thing.” He looked at the application and nodded. “I can fill out the ‘hobbies and
specialties’ part.”
“Oh?” Lee-yeon raised a brow. “What are you going to put?”
Her husband leaned his head closer to her. “My specialty is beating up those who
bother my wife and my hobby is chasing after my wife. What I like is So Lee-yeon,
what I hate sometimes are trees, what I’m good at is making my dick hard, what I
can’t do is have enough manners to not go on for 10 rounds—”
“Wait!” Lee-yeon cut him off before he could keep going. She looked at him worriedly.
“You’re not really going to write that are you?”
“Do you think I’m lying?”
“No. And that makes it worse,” Lee-yeon glared at him despite the growing blush on
her cheeks.
Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t hold back his laughter as she shyly looked away from him.
He grabbed her puffed cheeks and leaned in to swallow her lips into a kiss.
Lee-yeon felt like her body was free-falling at just that. They kissed each other like
there was no tomorrow. Then, his tongue slipped into her mouth and the kiss became
deeper. Suddenly, the lightbulb that hung above them exploded and she stopped
kissing back. Kwon Chae-woo frowned and pulled away.
“Are you really looking at something else when your favorite face is right here?” he
asked.
“That’s an LED bulb,” she said. “Why did it do that?”
“Is that really important right now?” He frowned and started to attack her lips again.
Lee-yeon, however, was still staring at the bulb. It looked like it was about to burst.
Eventually, realizing that she was too distracted, Kwon Chae-woo gave up.
Later, a repairman wearing a violet cap and vest came in.
Jang Beom-hee and Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes met.

Lee-yeon greeted the man with the toolbox and led him to the living room. “I
mentioned it on the phone,” she said. “I have no idea why it exploded.”
The repairman nodded. “I’ll take a look at it,” he said. He set up that ladder that he
had brought with him under the bulb that had exploded.
Lee-yeon had called the place that had changed all the lightbulbs in the house into
LED bulbs. She went into the kitch and kept glancing up at the man as he checked the
bulb. She frowned when she realized that he was looking at the most random places.
From his place beside her, Kwon Chae-woo glared at the repairman. Lee-yeon flinched
when she saw his face and the room filled with an odd kind of tension. Kwon Chae-woo
just stared at the man as if he was going to drag him down and the repairman couldn’t
seem to focus because of that.
Even then, the repairman didn’t avoid his glare. Instead, he met his eyes for a moment
before turning away.
Realizing that this wasn’t working, Lee-yeon grabbed Kwon Chae-woo’s arm and led
him out of the room. At first, he didn’t budge but, when he realized that Lee-yeon was
trying to move away, he followed.
“Chae-woo, why are you doing that?” she hissed, trying to stay quiet so that the
repairman wouldn’t hear her. He just shook his head and clenched his jaw. Lee-yeon
rolled her eyes. “If you don’t like someone else being in the house, then just stay
here.”
“That’s not it.”
“Then what is it?”
“It’s just” he trailed off and glanced at the living room again. “It just feels weird.
Sorry. You don’t have to worry about it.” His voice wasn’t hard now, but Lee-yeon
couldn’t help but be curious about why he couldn’t seem to tell her what it was that
bothered him.
In the other room, Jang Beom-hee quickly retrieved the wire that had exploded in the
lamp and replaced it. It wasn’t the bulb that had exploded but the wire that he had
planted inside. It was all his doing.
When he heard about the landslide, he was convinced that the young master had been
hurt. He broke his orders to simply stand guard and decided to tell him the truth. He
couldn’t stand idly by and twiddle his thumbs when a random accident could have
taken him.
Young master, it can’t take this long, he thought. You still have work to do.
Jang Beom-hee looked around nervously.
Kwon Ki-seok was all about his family. He wouldn’t let his brother, who was 12 years
younger, go on like this. He would punish his siblings and make life harder for them,
but he wouldn’t let them die. He grew up knowing the importance of family. He would
never let such a thing happen to anyone he cared about.
But if Kwon Chae-woo wasn’t coming back, he would lie low as nothing but a toothless
beast.
Jang Beom-hee frowned. He knew that this wasn’t something that Kwon Chae-woo
would have wanted if he hadn’t lost his memory.
He had tried to bring the young master’s memory back in all manner of different ways.
He tried to bring it back by leaving around the roses that he used to like. His favorite
poem had been about the rose’s thorn. He hoped that Kwon Chae-woo would
remember his favorite part of that poem and come back.
But it was no use.
Jang Beom-hee realized that he needed to act.
When he stepped off his ladder, he was immediately confronted by Lee-yeon who was
holding out a can of orange juice to him. His instincts made him flinch, but he
accepted the juice as casually as he could.
“I think it’s a problem with our product,” he said. “It should be good now, but please
let me know if you encounter any issues in the future.”
Lee-yeon nodded as he packed up his toolbox. Curious, Lee-yeon looked inside it. She
immediately paled and stepped back.
Kwon Chae-woo, who was sitting on a chair, quickly got up and moved towards her.
“Lee-yeon?” he said. “Is something wrong?”
Lee-yeon, realizing her mistake, shook her head. “It’s nothing!” she said. “I just felt
weird all of a sudden.” She rubbed her arm and leaned against Kwon Chae-woo’s
shoulder.
The repairman casually closed the toolbox, but Lee-yeon had already seen what was
inside: a red rose.
A rose was a symbol of stalking.
“Lee-yeon, I’ll be right back,” Kwon Chae-woo said.
She frowned. “Where are you going?”
He placed a hand on Lee-yeon’s head and smiled. “Just over there,” he told her. “I
think I need to sweep the yard.” But, before Lee-yeon could even say a thing, his eyes
changed as he ran to chase the repairman that was already leaving.
Before he knew it, Jang Boem-hee was being pushed against the wall and choked.
Kwon Chae-woo was placing pressure on his throat with his elbow.
“I don’t believe this is the first time we’ve met,” he said.
Jang Beom-hee’s eyes widened when he heard the words. The moment he realized that
Kwon Chae-woo was running after him, he realized that this wasn’t an opportunity
that he could waste. He had been waiting for a chance for Kwon Chae-woo to attack
him.
“Young master—”
“Why do you keep hanging around here?” Kwon Chae-woo demanded.
Jang Beom-hee froze at the unexpected question. “What?”
“You live across the street,” Kwon Chae-woo said. “You served at the hotel the other
day. Now you’re fixing light bulbs?”
Jang Beom-hee wanted to kick himself. Why had so many people noticed him? His
mind flashed to the woman who had left the house the other day and was immediately
suspicious of him.
When Kwon Chae-woo didn’t let up, Jang Beom-hee became annoyed. He had never
faced Kwon Chae-woo personally. He had only seen Hwang Jo-yoon in the corridor for
a few seconds and only a bit in the party hall.
But he was terrified by how Kwon Chae-woo had managed to piece it all together.
“This is the third time we’ve met,” Kwon Chae-woo hissed. “Is that still a
coincidence?” He pushed the neck harder and Jang Beom-hee realized that it had been
a while since he had been this overwhelmed.
Jang Beom-hee chuckled suddenly and that only made Kwon Chae-woo frown even
more. “Who are you?” Kwon Chae-woo demanded. When the other man didn’t answer,
he growled. “Answer me,” he said. “I will squash all the bugs that come after my wife
either way.”
Jang Beom-hee shook his head as he realized the misunderstanding. “Young master,
that’s not it!” Kwon Chae-woo’s face became stern so Jang Beom-hee continued. “Did
you get the rose that I sent you?”
“What?”
“Does it not bring back any memories?” Jang Beom-hee asked. “Do you not remember
me? Do you really not know who I am?”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. “What are you saying, pervert?” he sneered.
As Jang Beom-hee realized how he had been further misunderstood, he kicked Kwon
Chae-woo in the shin and managed to escape the other man’s grip. But Kwon Chaewoo’s reflexes were unbelievable and he was able to grab Jang Beom-hee. The two
men broke out into a fight.
Eventually, Kwon Chae-woo pushed Jang Beom-hee against the wall again and
managed to hit his head. He twisted the man’s arm and gritted his teeth as he said,
“Get lost. This is my last warning. I don’t ever want to see you again.”
“Young master, please come back to your senses!” Jang Beom-hee pleaded. “You have
to get your memory back!”
Kwon Chae-woo’s grip loosened when he heard the man start to beg.
“Aren’t you curious about your past?” Jang Beom-hee asked. “Don’t you want to know
what kind of person you were? What kind of thoughts you had? You can’t stay here
and play husband and wife forever. Don’t let that woman fool you! That woman is—”
“Stop.” Kwon Chae-woo went back to twisting Jang Beom-hee’s arm.
“Young master!”
But Kwon Chae-woo just shook his head. “I’ve heard enough.” When Jang Beom-hee
frowned at him, he said, “I’m sorry to tell you, but I’m not interested in knowing about
my past. I promised my wife that I didn’t want to know.”
Jang Beom-hee tried to speak more, but Kwon Chae-woo just twisted his arm. The man
seemed used to keeping people in check.
“If you really know me well,” Kwon Chae-woo said. “Then, I hope you’ll shut up.”
“Young master, don’t be fooled!” Jang Beom-hee said. “That woman is—”
“I told you to stop.” Kwon Chae-woo’s voice was cold. “And stop fucking calling me
that.”
Jang Beom-hee broke out into cold sweats. He tried to look at Kwon Chae-woo, but the
man wouldn’t meet his eyes. He felt empty as he looked ahead at the man holding him
against the wall.
Where had the devil in charge of the Kwon family’s hunting dogs gone?
“If you understand me, don’t ever show your face again.”
Jang Beom-hee was speechless. Kwon Chae-woo, the man who would storm an area
the moment he saw blood, was now being so polite. Just the thought of it made him
cringe.
Kwon Chae-woo left without looking back and Jang Beom-hee frowned at him while
holding his aching arm.
He felt his cellphone vibrate and he reached into his pocket to get it.
It was an unsaved number, but he already knew it all too well. It gave him a headache
just looking at it. It was a text from someone that he had accidentally spent the night
with. She had been messaging him for a few days now and it was starting to get
troublesome.
You may forget my name, but I know that you remember my body.
Jang Beom-hee scratched the back of his neck as he read the text, then he looked back
up at where Kwon Chae-woo had disappeared to.
Nothing was going his way.

“He should be ashamed of his name!” They were in a Korean barbeque restaurant and
the conversation was loud and wild.
“Director, did you know that tigers mate 100 times?” Joo Dong-mi asked without care.
“Huh?” Lee-yeon’s eyes widened as she spluttered and coughed out the water she was
drinking.
“That man, his name was Beom—it means tiger,” Joo Dong-mi drawled. “He was as
sweet as an herbivore!”
Lee-yeon nodded, a little confused. “Sure, okay.”
“It’s not possible, it’s not!” Joo Dong-mi exclaimed. She raised her glass and spilled
some of her drink on her hand. She licked it up.
Lee-yeon could see the half empty bottle of soju past Joo Dong-mi and looked back at
the woman who was red in the face and blurting out nonsense. She thought back to
the past few weeks and tried to remember how they got to this point.
The tournament had been canceled thanks to the landslide. The Spruce Tree Hospital
and Mi Hospital received a new subject for the tournament about three weeks after
the natural disaster occurred.
The subject was to cure the spirit tree, which was known to have a ghost living within
it—
“Are they crazy? Do they know what kind of tree that is?” Choo-ja had slammed the
table and glared when Lee-yeon told her.o
Lee-yeon had shrugged. “Maybe they’re just scared of us,” she had suggested.
“Don’t be so naïve!” Choo-ja had growled.
The thing about the tree was that, in the past, all the doctors that had tried to treat it
encountered some form of misfortune or other while they tried to complete the task.
From their children failing their exams to divorce to investment scams to all kinds of
psychological illnesses and physical accidents imaginable.
All the tree doctors in Hwaido knew about this, which was why they avoided the tree
as much as they could.
“You definitely can’t do this,” Choo-ja had said. “You’d be putting yourself in terrible
danger!”
Lee-yeon had played with her teacup and stared at the leaf pattern on the table.
“I hear all the other hospitals were relieved to hear it,” Choo-ja had continued. “I’m so
pissed!”
Lee-yeon’s face had fallen as she became worried. No matter how hard she thought of
a way out of this, there was no solution. She had also started to feel like, for some
strange reason, she was being assigned some of the more difficult tasks, the
avalanche included. But she tried to ignore that.
There was a little temple beside the 500-year-old spirit tree. The townspeople were
trying their best to save the protector of the town but nothing seemed to work.
Because of the ever-growing rumors surrounding the tree, the perfect time for it to be
treated had ended already and now it was about to die.
Lee-yeon thought that the forest ministry had chosen some annoying case.
“I can’t do anything about it,” she had said. “I have to try. Have you ever seen me pick
my patients?”
Choo-ja had frowned at that.
“You should pick your friends but not your tree,” Lee-yeon had continued.
Choo-ja had scoffed and looked at her with narrowed eyes. “Of course,” she had said,
rolling her eyes. “It seems like it was only yesterday when you were pissed about that
dangerous man in his vegetative state. You were always saying how much of a pest he
was and you made me lie as well. But now you’re with him.”
Lee-yeon had flinched and quickly drank her tea.
“But, of course, you must pick your friend but not the tree,” Choo-ja had mocked her,
laughing.
Lee-yeon had tried her best to hide her face behind her teacup.
Another thing that had happened since the landslide was that Kwon Chae-woo had
become an intern at the Wildlife Rescue Center, his rank right under Joo Dong-mi’s.
He was the backup for rescuing injured animals and transporting them, and he was
very busy going to rescue sites as well as studying. Thanks to that, he and Lee-yeon
spent a little less time together.
But, surprisingly, they still had three meals a day together. He would always come to
see Lee-yeon during their lunch break. She knew how ridiculous this was from a
perspective of view so she always tried to send him back, but he would never listen.
Lee-yeon had become scared of lunchtime. She got anxious every time the door
opened, worried that it would be Kwon Chae-woo coming to get her.
On top of that, every night, he would bully her so much that Lee-yeon felt like her
back was being broken every day. Some nights, he wouldn’t even let her sleep a wink
and she would go to work the next day without any sleep.
Something was wrong. They were both earning income but Lee-yeon knew that
something was a little off!

As Lee-yeon had avoided speaking to Choo-ja, Joo Dong-mi gave her a call.
“Director, can you attend the company dinner just this once?” she had asked.
“Pardon?” Lee-yeon had said.
“It’s just that we haven’t had a welcoming party for Kwon Chae-woo,” Joo Dong-mi had
said. “We need an official excuse to relax and eat at our heart’s content. That man is
craz—I mean a mutant that doesn’t even listen to his team leader. So please, save us
and give us a reason to have this party!”
Lee-yeon had checked her watch and gotten up. “Choo-ja, I’ll be back.”
She had to do this so that her husband would settle nicely with the team. She decided
to say yes to Joo Dong-mi, ignoring her own unease.
“He really should be ashamed of his name!” Joo Dong-mi said as loud for anyone in the
room to hear. She still couldn’t get over her experience with the man named Jang
Beom-hee.
Many people were now looking in their direction. Their eyes were full of curiosity and
horror as they went between Lee-yeon and Kwon Chae-woo and back to Lee-yeon. The
center employees’ curiosity was clear.
Lee-yeon froze as Kwon Chae-woo slammed his chopsticks down and glared at them.
His coworkers looked away the moment he did.
She sighed to herself. She could see the reputation this man had amongst his peers.
She felt like it was all her fault that he was acting like this.
On the other hand, Joo Dong-mi was spitting out her misery while half-asleep.
“I have never seen any man who acts like that in front of a woman with a body like
me!” she said. “He’s a tiger, so how could he? He’s not living up to his name! If he’s a
tiger, he should act like one!”
Kwon Chae-woo didn’t bother hiding his frown at her drunken state and kept putting
all the cooked meat in Lee-yeon’s plate.
She had come so that her husband could have good relationships with his coworkers,
but it felt like they were on a date. Lee-yeon put her chopsticks down. “Chae-woo, go
talk to your coworkers. Have a drink with them, enjoy yourself.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her. “Have you had drinks with others before?”
He had already been displeased when she said she was coming. He was happy to see
her, but only for a moment. He didn’t want to leave Lee-yeon in a crowded place like
this for long.
“I’m already annoyed that my wife is on display, but your words piss me off even
more.” Kwon Chae-woo locked his fingers with her under the table. “You want me to
do whatwith others? Talk to them? Seriously?” His eyes were dark and his voice was
getting cold. The space between Lee-yeon’s legs throbbed. She was flustered that her
body was reacting before her head.
“Director,” Joo Dong-mi leaned her head against her hands and stared at them. Her
tired eyes were moving hazily. It looked a little scary for a while, but then she started
saying something surprising, “Do you know where I think I saw your husband before?”
Lee-yeon felt her heart stop. Has she seen Kwon Chae-woo before? The noise in the
restaurant faded and only her heartbeat filled it. It felt like ages had passed before
she gulped.
“I just remembered.” Joo Dong-mi pointed at Kwon Chae-woo. “Over one summer
vacation when I was in high school, I went to Europe with my family. I saw a little
child in Vienna, Austria and your husband looked an awful lot like that child. If he
didn’t change and grew up as he was, he would look exactly the same. But of course,
they wouldn’t be the same people.”
She scoffed at herself. “That child was great too, though, like this guy who climbed a
mountain while carrying a deer. They also look quite similar. Even though their age
and their occupation is different.”
“A little child?” Lee-yeon asked. Her fingertips were cold but they warmed up quickly
thanks to Kwon Chae-woo’s hand.
“Of course, he wasn’t an ordinary boy. From his face to the sound he made, he was so
mind-blowing that I guess I couldn’t forget him.” Joo Dong-mi shrugged lightly. “He
was a cellist.”

Lee-yeon’s shoulders relaxed as she let out a sigh.
“He was small so he looked like he was in elementary school,” Joo Dong-mi said. “I
looked him up after I came back and he wasn’t well known in Korea for someone who
had debuted in Europe. Isn’t that weird?” Joo Dong-mi tilted her head as if it was still
mysterious. “Anyway, my parents were all up in my business, always comparing me to
him.”
She shuddered like she didn’t want to be reminded. Then, she looked at Kwon Chaewoo again. “But coincidentally, our junior here also seems to know quite a lot about
classical music.”
Kwon Chae-woo stopped moving his hands and Lee-yeon’s eyes widened. This was the
first she was hearing of this.
“Chae-woo?” She looked at him for answers.
“Ah, you didn’t know?” Joo Dong-mi asked. “At my uncle’s party the other day—”
“Stop talking nonsense.” Kwon Chae-woo stopped Joo Dong-mi from continuing.
But Lee-yeon was now curious to know what she was going to say next. “I want to
know too.” she said.
“I—” Kwon Chae-woo started talking instinctively when he saw her innocent eyes. He
was always annoyingly obedient.
Joo Dong-mi clicked her tongue as if to say that she was done drinking.
Kwon Chae-woo cleared his throat. “I was able to guess the title of the song right
away.”
“Really?” Lee-yeon asked.
“Yes,” Joo Dong-mi nodded. “That might be it.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes went to Joo Dong-mi for a moment, but she was too busy trying
to unlock her phone.
“Come to think of it,” Lee-yeon shifted in her seat. “When you sleep, Chae-woo, I turn
on the music sometimes. You sleep really well.” Then, she mouthed to him, “You don’t
even cry,” so that no one else but Kwon Chae-woo would see.
He smiled. He leaned towards her and lowered his voice. “That’s not the only way to
stop your man from crying.”
“What?” Lee-yeon blinked.
“I don’t cry sleeping after sex.” he said.
Her ears became red right away.
Kwon Chae-woo locked his hand around hers harder under the table. “So do I cry
tonight or not?”
He bottomed out inside her in one swift movement. He pushed deep inside her walls
and, because she wasn’t thinking straight from all the pleasure, she banged her head
against the wall. His thick head just kept thrusting in and out.
The moment they got home, Kwon Chae-woo had bitten Lee-yeon’s lips. The touching
that started in that moment led to this.
She was lifted on top of the drawers in the living room and he sucked her until she
melted. The table and the sofa became sloppy messes soon after. Lee-yeon stepped out
of her clothes and didn’t know what else to do while she was being rammed behind
while standing up. Her heart pounded nonstop from the man’s presence behind her
back.
She pushed against the wall and stuck her back out. It was an instinct that allowed
him to slide into her easily. Her ass hit his hip as he kept thrusting wildly into her.
“I missed you so much today,” he groaned into her ear. “Did you miss me too, Leeyeon? Were you happy sending me off to work while you were alone with the trees?”
She couldn’t respond and just let out a moan.
“I really thought I was going to go crazy,” he growled.
Lee-yeon felt goosebumps on her neck when his hot breath brushed against her skin.
His rough palm grabbed her smooth breast and he fondled it as he bit on her neck. He
continued to move in and out of her slowly.
“Can’t you just go around catching animals with me?” he asked. “Sometimes, I feel
like it’s a shame when I let go of the animals. I think about you. I wish I could just
keep you trapped like that.”
He grabbed her hair all of a sudden. She bit her lips as she could feel her ears ringing.
As she leaned her elbow against the wall, her back arched even more. Her ass and
thighs tingled as if they had just been spanked. But, above all, she felt like she was
going to melt with pleasure.
His long cock buried itself deep inside her. His hands from the back grabbed her
breasts and squeezed them, a wet sound ringing through the room as skin slapped
against skin.
Lee-yeon scratched the wall a little.
Kwon Chae-woo grabbed her chin and turned her head to face him, then he sucked on
her lips. Lee-yeon turned her neck as much as she could as she whined against his
lips. Her hazy eyes closed. He put his nose against her sweaty back and moved his
waist.
“Lee-yeon, Lee-yeon, Lee-yeon,” he chanted her name. His abs hardened as he
continued to penetrate her, his veins popping from the back of his hand to his arms.
His length grew inside her.
She trembled as he hit her spot. Her toes curled. She felt like she was going to die.
“Every day is so precious now,” he whispered as he pushed Lee-yeon’s breasts against
the wall. He thrust harshly and sucked on her earlobe. His movements were becoming
stronger.
He squeezed Lee-yeon’s nipple and continued, “Lee-yeon, let’s keep living like this,”
he said. “We can live without worry. We can just do this all day.”
Lee-yeon groaned at his words.
“I just need you,” he continued. “I don’t need anyone else. I only trust you, Lee-yeon.”
Lee-yeon buried her face in her arms and sobbed like a child. Kwon Chae-woo just
stared at her.
“Don’t let that woman fool you! That woman is—” Jang Beom-hee’s words rang
through his ears.
He wrapped his arms around Lee-yeon’s waist and shook his head lightly. But for
some reason, he just couldn’t forget those words.

“It becomes a problem because you don’t tell me in time.” Choo-ja looked at the leaf
and clicked her tongue.
The Osmanthus fragrans that had been planted in the garden was dead. Lee-yeon was
examining the tree and thought that it looked grim. “It was poisoned with drugs.”
It was due to pesticides. As it was a common problem, she thought she could save the
tree even if it looked a little withered. “Choo-ja, you brought nitric acid, calcium, and
potassium right?”
Choo-ja already had them out. She also kept sighing. “It just keeps getting sicker”
Lee-yeon flinched. She chewed on her nails and circled around Choo-ja.
Choo-ja stared at Lee-yeon and raised a brow at her, then she saw some marks. She
reached out to lift the hair from Lee-yeon’s neck and was surprised by what she saw.
Choo-ja thought he really did a number on it.
“What if I tell him everything?”
The random words just came out of Lee-yeon’s mouth unexpectedly. But Choo-ja
understood right away.
“Tell Mr. Kwon?”
“Yes.”
Choo-ja stared right at her. Two of them stood there silently for a moment.
“Do you think you can handle it?” Choo-ja finally asked.
Lee-yeon shook her head. “I don’t have the confidence.”
She knew that the truth meant destruction. She remembered how her aunt, uncle, and
cousins reacted when she told the truth. She felt a chill just thinking about it.
Even so, Kwon Chae-woo was the first person to notice what she felt deep inside and
actually lent her a hand.
“I don’t have the confidence,” she repeated. “But I want to be understood by him.”
There were many ropes and pieces of cloth of different colors tied to the spirit tree. A
lady was throwing knives and dancing around it gracefully. Beneath the tree’s shade,
the dancing accompanied by the banging of gongs mesmerized the crowd. It was the
dance of the shaman.
The tree was about 500 years old. It was big enough that even ten people would have
difficulty wrapping their arms around the expanse of its trunk.
“I don’t even know why the city employees come for the shaman ritual.” Choo-ja jutted
her chin out in the direction of the people in suits who stuck out of the crowd like
thorns.
The Mi Hospital’s director came in while casually holding a fan in his hands. Lee-yeon
looked up from under her straw hat to acknowledge him.
“Are you feeling better sir?” Lee-yeon asked him.
“The landslide didn’t affect us as much as it could have,” he said. “You’re the one who
had to deal with most of it, Director So. I was just lucky. Is your hospital also here to
see the ritual?”
Lee-yeon scanned Choo-ja and Kwon Chae-woo’s faces. Kwon Chae-woo’s presence
soothed Lee-yeon so, when she spoke, she sounded confident. “I just came here to
check in before the tournament,” she said.
“By the way, I wanted to talk to you.” He wiped the sweat off his forehead and smiled
at Lee-yeon. She felt uneasy.
“I was told by my employees when we went for drinks a few weeks ago that they
would feel unlucky if they had to face Spruce Tree Hospital,” he continued. “We just
laughed it off then, but it seems like it’s become true. This spirit tree issue is quite
annoying.” He was still nonchalantly fanning himself.
He looked at her in the eye, “Director So, by any chance, did you do anything to the
higher-ups to rub them off the wrong way?” He finally asked Lee-yeon.
“Sorry?”
“I mean, first you climb a 30-meter tree, then you deal with a landslide, and now the
spirit tree? Isn’t it a little strange?” The Mi Hospital director smiled at her innocently.
“Director So, think long and hard,” He sounded sincere and concerned. “Treating the
spirit tree might not be the answer.”
“Pardon?” Lee-yeon chucked nervously at the Mi Hospital’s director’s question.
She remembered the details of the tournament. The goal was to treat the dying spirit
tree and the person with the best plan for the course of action to be taken would be
given the chance to attempt it. But treating the tree was never the problem.
“Is it because of the horror stories that you tell me this?” Lee-yeon pressed.
The director shrugged his shoulders. “I don’t know. I’m more scared of money and
ghosts.”
The dance of the shaman before them reached its peak and ended. Even as the people
were leaving, Lee-yeon couldn’t take her eyes off of her small binoculars. She was
looking around the place and checking the status of the tree. She was checking off the
branches and the places that needed to be treated in her head. But the more she
checked, the less confident she became.
An old man tapped Lee-yeon’s shoes with his cane.
“Oh, hello, sir,” she greeted him nervously.
“I assume you’re also a tree doctor or whatever,” he said. He looked at her with
aggressive eyes. “Humans can’t fix God. Don’t be foolish. Get lost!”
“Sir, this tree is seriously being mishandled,” Lee-yeon told him. “It needs surgery.”
But as soon as Lee-yeon spoke, the old man’s nostrils flared in anger. “What?
Surgery?”
People were staring at them now as they passed by.
“No!” the old man continued. “Never! Do you know what kind of tree this is?”
“In my eyes, it’s a serious patient,” Lee-yeon told him.
“How dare you?”
Lee-yeon covered her ears as the man started yelling.
“That is a great tree that has saved countless townspeople,” he told her. “Records say
that, during the war, they put a huge drum on that little tree and they hit it with all
their might. Everyone evacuated after hearing the sound and the only thing that
survived in this town was that tree! The tree was only 10 years old. It had to carry a
drum that was bigger than its size and it had to handle the sound of the drums, that’s
why it grew up curved like that!”
“Yes, it seems like it has a herniated disc as well,” Lee-yeon said.
“What?” the old man demanded.
Lee-yeon just stared at him. Then, she thought of something. “If that tree is as
precious as you say it is, then why does it have so much moss and dirt? Have you ever
brushed it or washed it with water?”
The old man flinched. “Why would that matter! You’re saying that we should be
bathing this tree?” he growled. “If you touch that tree and cut it in any way, we’ll
show you what happens to those that mess with it!” The old man tapped his cane
angrily and walked away.
Choo-ja complained about the old man, but Lee-yeon just smiled.
“I think I know,” she said.
“Know what?” Choo-ja asked.
But Lee-yeon ignored her and asked, “Where’s Chae-woo?”
Lee-yeon went on her tiptoes and looked around. The man who usually couldn’t stay
away from her was suddenly nowhere to be found. As Lee-yeon started to bite her
nails anxiously, her eyes met the shaman’s who had just finished the ritual.
The way the shaman was dressed made him look like he was from another time and
that frightened her. She tried to look away quickly but felt the man was still staring at
her.
“Lee-yeon, aren’t you hot?”
At that moment, a huge hand wiped the sweat off her neck. A cold drink touched her
hot cheek. Lee-yeon was more surprised by the touch of the hand than the beverage.
She turned around.
“You stood out in the sun for too long.” Kwon Chae-woo was sweating buckets as he
spoke to her.
“I don’t see any stores around here.” Lee-yeon frowned. “Did you run to get that?”
Lee-yeon stared blankly at the man that she had been looking for. He didn’t say a
word, just smiled and opened the bottle. Lee-yeon took the bottle and brushed the
aluminum on its sides. The way he was staring at her hadn’t changed. It only made
Lee-yeon feel guilty.
“Did something happen while I was gone?” Kwon Chae-woo asked when he saw Leeyeon’s face get grim for a split second.
“Well” Lee-yeon felt it was childish to say she had been anxious because she
couldn’t find Kwon Chae-woo, so she said something else. “A famous model was
transported here by accident.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her weirdly at her strange response.
“They fixed his bones, treated his wound, and later removed his scars and sent the
model off,” she said, changing the subject. “But this patient kept on getting worse. Why do you think that is?”
“The patient probably had some other disease.” Kwon Chae-woo frowned at the
strange topic. “Another disease that wasn’t caused by the accident, something that
was eating him alive inside.”
As Lee-yeon nodded, the man touched her face with his soft hand. “But to completely
get better, I heard they had to shave his head and even cut both arms off.” As she
looked up at the tree sadly, two voices suddenly spoke.
“What can we do? It’s still better to be alive than dead.” Kwon Chae-woo said.
“So what if you have to take both arms off? I would keep the patient alive no matter
what it takes.”
They were similar answers but the second one was a bit odd for some reason. Leeyeon shook her head and tried to focus. “But this is a tree.”
Choo-ja finally seemed to realize what Lee-yeon was saying and looked at the tree
seriously.
“It’s even a good tree,” Lee-yeon said. “It’s the town’s protector and has such a
heartwarming story. Many people come to see it. What if this tree suddenly looked so
bad all of a sudden? What would they think of it?”
Choo-ja shook her head as if she had a lot to think about and Lee-yeon lowered her
voice even further. A cicada that started crying overpowered her voice.
“The hospital probably didn’t want to be part of it,” she said. “They left it alone for so
long that it would have died if they did something even slightly wrong. They probably
didn’t want to try and fix it anymore and get blamed for things beyond their control.”
She sighed. “There’s a good chance that they just took a bit of money and treated it
well enough to keep its appearance as it is.” Lee-yeon drank the drink in her hand and
rolled up her sleeves. “I think it was the tree doctors who made up those nonsense
horror stories as well.”
“What?”
“They probably didn’t want to be responsible for letting a 500-year-old historical tree
die.” Her voice got lower. “This is a battle of wits between the city, the townspeople,
the shaman, and the tree doctors.”
They really didn’t care about the spirit tree dying or not. Town’s people cared more
about its appearance, the doctors were too scared of being responsible for anything,
and the city and the shaman just took whatever money they could take.
Lee-yeon took a deep breath and frowned. “I’m. going to turn everything upside
down.”

Kwon Chae-woo hugged Lee-yeon before she even could finish talking. Lee-yeon
couldn’t see anything but his shoulders as he covered her in his embrace. As she
looked down, she could see the red of the hanbok if the shaman from a near distance.
“How did this happen?”
Lee-yeon heard an unfamiliar voice. It was quite steady, but it also sounded like a
kicking tongue to Lee-yeon.
“It looks like the willow branch is also going to fall soon. It’s going to hurt a lot.”
Lee-yeon tried to look past Kwon Chae-woo’s shoulder. Even though she could mostly
only see Kwon Chae-woo’s white shirt, she caught a glimpse of the shaman’s face.
The willow branch.
Lee-yeon bit her tongue. She didn’t know why she felt like she was trapped when she
heard the so-called shaman say that.
“Lee-yeon.” Kwon Chae-woo noticed that her breathing had changed slightly and
looked down. Lee-yeon grabbed Kwon Chae-woo’s shirt and tried to calm herself. Leeyeon just stared at the shaman without any hesitation.
It felt like she had been slapped in the face. The shaman was right. Lee-yeon felt more
hurt than angry, so she buried her nose in Kwon Chae-woo’s shoulder to try and
breathe.
He just placed a hand on her head. “Should we go home?”
“Yes,” she said. “Yes. Let’s go home.”
A tree always gave clear answers but, whenever Kwon Chae-woo was involved, things
got messy. What bothered her the most was her guilt, the fact that she was hiding the
truth. Lee-yeon wiped her forehead and hid her shaking hands.
It seemed like it was time to stop running. If she didn’t get rid of her guilt, then the
relationship would die in the end. It was like everyone and everything was pushing
Lee-yeon to tell the truth. She wanted to be understood. She wanted to be accepted.
Lee-yeon pushed herself to step towards the truth that she had been avoiding.
“Chae-woo.” She cleared her throat. “I. I have something to tell you after the
competition.”
“What is it?”
“Just the past.”
She felt dizzy and suffocated even as she said it. It was time to unload all the lies. It
was the most terrifying moment she would ever have to face. It was something she
had to get over.
“When I first met you 2 years ago, there was something I didn’t tell you.”
A willow branch falling means that you’re saying goodbye to a loved one.

It was a late and cloudy night. Lee-yeon sat in her office, writing up how she was
going to treat the tree. The quiet room was filled with the sound of her typing.
As she was about to turn her head to look for a book, she started. “Oh my god!” Leeyeon jumped like she had seen a ghost as Kwon Chae-woo, who was leaning against
the door, pouted.
“How long have you been standing there?” she choked out.
He shrugged. “A while.”
“You should’ve said something.”
“I was wondering when you would notice.”
Lee-yeon blinked.
“But you’re pretty quick. I was tempted to bite you if you took any longer.”
As Lee-yeon noticed his eyes changing, she quickly went back to looking for the book.
She knew that nothing good happened when he looked at her like that.
As if she was ignoring the warning signs, she said, “You should’ve gone to bed first.”
“I couldn’t sleep.”
Lee-yeon looked at the lock. 2:00 AM. Lee-yeon’s eyes widened. “You should still
sleep! You’re going to work tomorrow!”
“What fun is it to lie in bed alone?” he whined while staring straight at Lee-yeon. Even
though his body was impatient, his eyes were not.
Lee-yeon held onto her chair tightly. “You really should sleep.”
“I don’t even want to do that if you’re not there,” he said. “Am I being a bother?”
When she missed her chance to answer him, Kwon Chae-woo sighed and closed his
eyes. He put a hand to his tired face and stood by the door. Even though he wasn’t
saying anything, Lee-yeon could sense that he was upset. She got up quickly.
But he already left and Lee-yeon froze with her arm stretched out. She felt a little
embarrassed so she sat down, but still she couldn’t focus when she remembered the
look on Kwon Chae-woo’s face.
Then, she heard knocking. When she looked up, she found Kwon Chae-woo standing
there with a couple of her training pants.
“Lee-yeon, pick.”
“Pardon?”
“I want to help you,” he said. “Pick which one you want to wear to the competition.”
He waved the pants around as if he was in a hurry. “Left or right?”
“Right.” Lee-yeon’s throat felt ticklish for some reason.
“Right.” Kwon Chae-woo nodded. “This does look a bit more fancy.”
Lee-yeon hid her embarrassed expression but also managed to smile to herself.
Kwon Chae-woo started walking in and out of the room. Each time, he made her
choose from things like a straw hat, to his dirty shoes, to handkerchiefs. Lee-yeon kept
on glancing at the door even while looking at her monitor. She was waiting for him to
come back each time.
“Which one is better?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t hold back her brightest smile as she answered, “I like you the best,
Chae-woo.”
The man stood there like he had been hit in the head and his entire upper body
became red.

Lee-yeon left the house in the caring hands of Chae-woo. Each time she touched the
things they had picked out through the night, she couldn’t help but giggle. Did he
know that it was like waiting to go on a picnic? It was something that she had never
felt, even when she was little.
But that feeling was fleeting. Now, she was speechless.
“Oh my god I can’t believe this! How can you just say that now?” Choo-ja was angry as
she held the judge’s arm, shaking it.
They had worked on the treatment plan together over a few sleepless nights and
practiced the surgery countless times. But when they got there, what the judge had to
say startled them out of their fatigue.
“The director of Mi Hospital isn’t participating?” Lee-yeon asked, just to be sure that
she had heard it correctly the first time.
“Yes.” The judge sighed. “It seems like he was in a car accident. He’ll have a cast on
his neck for the next two weeks. We just received the message as well so we couldn’t
announce it before now. Anyway, you guys win by default. Would the Spruce Tree
Hospital like to proceed?” The judge was barely able to get Choo-ja off of him as he
pulled his tie up.
“Is that true?” Choo-ja demanded.
“Pardon?” the judge asked.
“Did you check if it was true?”
“He said he was forfeiting, so we didn’t bother.”
And yet Lee-yeon couldn’t help but think that maybe, just maybe, he believed the
horror stories of the spirit tree and was avoiding treating it just as she had guessed.
She scoffed as she looked around at the crowd that had gathered. She felt their
hostility from where she stood.
While Lee-yeon and Choo-ja prepared to work on the tree, a soju bottle randomly flew
overhead and hit the ground beside them. They jumped back.
The atmosphere had immediately changed for the worse. The glass fragments
reflected the sunlight threateningly. Lee-yeon froze in an instant.
“You crazy bastards! If you change our spirit tree, you’ll be punished by it! How dare
you?”
It was the old man that they had spoken to a few days ago who was now shouting. This
time, he seemed quite serious.
From what Lee-yeon had learned over the past few days, it seemed like people picked
the falling leaves from the tree and sold them claiming that if you caught the leaves
before they fell, your wishes would come true.
Nowadays, not a lot of people fall for it, but around 30 years ago, it seemed like it was
good money. It seemed like that old man’s generation was the one who got the most
out of it. They also spent $100,000 on treating the spirit tree, but she couldn’t tell that
they had done anything at all. She was confident that people of the city, the shaman,
and the tree doctor had taken all that money from the old citizens and split it nicely
among themselves.
“Choo-ja, are you okay?” Lee-yeon asked.
“It’s not like they hit my head,” Choo-ja smiled. “Besides, I wouldn’t be me if I was
surprised by some soju bottle.”
“This is the only way,” Lee-yeon said. “If we don’t do anything, this tree will die.” She
gulped and looked at the people around them who seemed very angry. The camera
that was filming the tournament, people who seemed like they were about to riot, city
employees who were whispering amongst each other were all aiming their score
sheets like spears at Lee-yeon. She was scared, but she pulled at her pants hard.
“Today, these people will see the cuts in the spirit tree,” she said. Before she started
the surgery, Lee-yeon closed her eyes and said a short prayer. Please hold on. The
strength that will heal you will come from your roots. Then, a thought hit her. If
something goes wrong, I might have to move.
Lee-yeon had someone to take care of now. She had to be realistic. If she fell, Kwon
Chae-woo also fell.
Lee-yeon confidentially took a deep breath and lifted the ladder.
Kwon Chae-woo arrived late to the scene and pushed his way forward, past all those
who shouted and shook their fists. At once, he found the face that was now dark as
ash from dust and moss.
Lee-yeon, who had wrapped rope around her waist and ascended the tree, was
positioned as precariously as if she were standing on a guillotine. What was shaking,
however, was not her, but the chainsaw.
She picked up the roaring saw and excitedly cut off a dead branch. She seemed not at
all like a doctor, but rather some sort of destroyer of the environment. Kwon Chaewoo furtively raised the corners of his mouth into a smile as he watched his wife
boldly perform her surgery.
Crack, thud. Crack, thud.
Each branch that fell to the ground elicited more groans from the crowd.
“Ahhhh!”
The elderly all either sunk down to the ground or shouted, “Why doesn’t anyone stop
that woman?!” Kwon Chae-woo’s hands twitched as he wished to snap the necks of
those who criticized her.
“I found the rectum!”
It wasn’t long before Lee-yeon’s booming voice reached Choo-ja.
She located the rotten hole only to find it already teeming with insects. To put it in
terms of the human body, a hole in the spine decayed, and the infection had spread so
wildly that the damage was irreversible.
Lee-yeon briefly held her breath and turned her head away from the spreading stench.
As she slowly sorted through the decay and dead branches, the skin and excrement of
the insects piled up high.
Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t take his eyes off Lee-yeon as she immersed herself in her
work.

Her tightly shut lips were resolute, and the look in her eyes was unusually serious,
almost savage. It was his first time seeing her in such a state. His Adam’s apple
nervously bobbed up and down. Suddenly, the sun shone down and pierced his field of
vision. Chae-woo squinted one eye and stared at her, swallowing up her image.
“Lee-yeon.”
He wanted to brush aside the damp bangs stuck to her forehead, to wrap her knee
that was being swept by the tree.
At that time, he happened to lock eyes with someone in the crowd—a conspicuous yet
familiar appearance. A shaman who had once performed a ritual there was staring at
Kwon Chae-woo, as if he were searching for something. He narrowed his forehead in a
rude and blatant manner, returning the gaze of the shaman, who continued to watch
Chae-woo closely.


From somewhat of a distance, the shaman murmured something soundlessly. Oddly,
rather than dismissing it as a stranger’s insignificant mumble, he found himself able
to read his lips precisely.
‘When the moon is full, the dog wails.’
The shaman tore the corners of his mouth upward and beamed. Though his mouth was
bizarrely turned up, her eyebrows dropped sharply. It seemed as if she were mocking
Chae-woo—pitying him, laughing at him.
Simultaneously, Chae-woo’s head throbbed as if being struck repeatedly by a series of
blunt weapons. The protesting and drumming of the people around him aggravated
the splitting headache all the more.
‘What’s happening?!’
Kwon Chae-woo bit down hard on his tongue until he tasted blood, enduring all the
pain.
As if the ground that he stood on had overturned, his face violently contorted, and his
eyes burned with life.
He looked up again in search of the shaman, but he had disappeared without a trace.
The sacred tree’s appearance was changing with every second. The grand and
mysterious tree that had once stood there existed no longer.
‘You’ll be back. Tonight.’
Kwon Chae-woo distinctly heard the shaman’s last words—a furtive whisper, like a
butterfly’s wings.
Something was definitely changing.

“Choo-ja, good work.”
The long five-hour operation finally came to a close.
After injecting the IV, Lee-yeon let out a long exhale. As soon as the tension released
from her body, her limbs trembled.
The people were transfixed by the sacred tree’s new appearance, now scrawny as a
telephone pole. Some cried, and others stomped their feet and lunged at Lee-yeon in
anger.
Kwon Chae-woo pushed them away with ease and stood proudly by Lee-yeon’s side. When such a tall, strong man had a cold look in his eyes, people hesitated pushing any
further.
“Huh? Chae-woo, how did you get here?”
She stared wide-eyed at the man who had appeared unannounced. Delight filled his
eyes and his lips parted in a smile. Chae-woo’s throat suddenly stung. Needless to say,
it was a moment he wished to be engraved in his memory forever. As he placed a
cheek on top of Lee-yeon’s head, she pushed his large body away.
“I got a lot of moss on me. It’ll get all over you!”

“It’s alright.”
Lee-yeon paused at the frail sound of his voice.
“Chae-woo, why do you seem so worn out? Is something wrong?”

“Do you have a fever or something?”
Lee-yeon hurriedly reached to feel his forehead, but rather than warm, it was cold as
ice.
“It’s nothing.”
As Kwon Chae-woo recalled the words of the strange shaman, his face hardened. An
inexplicably bad feeling washed over him. He hugged Lee-yeon’s waist closer to him
and clung onto her tightly.
“How is the tree? Do you think it’ll be alright?”
“I think we’ll have to keep an eye on it for the next couple weeks. We took care of
everything urgent, but who knows how well it’ll recover”
“You did a great job, Lee-yeon.”
Before long, the sun was beginning to set. Its color was ethereal, like that of violets
set loose in water. As the wind blew, the landscape that hung at the eaves of the
village shrine wailed brilliantly. As she spoke, Lee-yeon gently stroked the tree that
had gone through so much.
“Chae-woo, come to think of it, that too was like a sort of sacred tree to me.”
“You mean the singing tree?”
Kwon Chae-woo felt around for her hand and grasped it. Soon, the two stood before
the disassembled tree.
“It was my greatest memory, and my greatest source of comfort. You could say it’s my
guardian.”
“Every time I hear that, I feel sour. It seems like your secret first love.” Kwon Chaewoo made a face.
He was familiar with the singing tree that Lee-yeon occasionally told stories about. When they ate, when they made love and shared their feelings, when they held each
other tightly and dozed off—anytime they shared small spaces, Lee-yeon cautiously let
her guard down and opened up, and the topic was always the tree of her childhood.
That was the only memory that Lee-yeon spoke of with a smile.
A tree that sings
It could have just been Lee-yeon’s imagination, something she created in her
loneliness. That’s why anytime Kwon Chae-woo heard these anecdotes, he wished to
insert himself. Although he was the one who lost his memory, sometimes Lee-yeon
seemed more like the empty one.
“Then I’ll tell you, and only you. Who my sacred tree was, that is.”
“Just please don’t say something like, ‘It turned out to be a male tree.’ I don’t want
you to resent me for nitpicking about the gender of a tree.”
“It was a girl.”
“A girl?” Funnily enough, Kwon Chae-woo’s face filled with relief. His expression
softened as he tucked Lee-yeon’s baby hairs flying in the wind behind her ears.
“I’m not a fool, you know. I was in high school at the time. Too old to believe in
fairytales.”
Kwon Chae-woo was fairly certain she had still believed, but he suppressed the smile
he felt creeping up.
“I was just thrown off at first. I realized soon after that it was a person playing. And
not the tree singing at all.”

“One day, when I cried, I heard a comforting melody, and when I laughed, I heard
dance music. And another day, it purposely played the wrong notes, like it was teasing
me.”
Then Chae-woo’s vision suddenly became shaky and Lee-yeon’s face blurred,
becoming two and then three faces.
Her side profile, that of a woman over thirty, now looked as if she were a teenage
schoolgirl in uniform. He furrowed his eyebrows and tried to refocus his eyes.
“Since then, I’ve often left post-it notes and slips of paper on trees. I ask who they are,
what kind of song they sing, and I tell them how I feel, like a diary. It’s embarrassing,
but I’ve also written that I’d like to meet them. I used to be so giddy at the thought
that maybe even I could make a friend”

“Of course, I never got any responses.”
Chae-woo slowly blinked and instinctively gripped Lee-yeon’s hand tightly. ‘If I don’t
grab her right now, if I don’t hold her in my arms’ Those kinds of strange thoughts
kept mucking about in his mind, like black ink.
“Then at one point, the village had become a bit boisterous, and I helped a girl I knew
hide. Before she left, she told me to try digging under the tree I often visited.”

“That was the first gift I received in my life. I think that girl was the singing tree. You
see, there under that tree were all the old records that I had heard before, that had
been played for me.”
An intense nausea that made him want to vomit his insides gushed through him, like a
sticky swamp. Lee-yeon’s voice, usually pleasant to his ears, sharply pierced his flesh
and cut him inside somewhere. Kwon Chae-woo chewed the inside of his lip and tried
hard to repress his repulsion.
“I have something for you, too.”
His voice was restrained by the feeling of fluid swaying just below his throat—such an
abnormal physical reaction toward his wife, the woman he’d give the world to at the
drop of a hat. The strong repulsion filled him with guilt.
But Kwon Chae-woo gritted his teeth and acted like nothing was wrong. He wondered
if the recent adjustment to work life could have taken this big a toll on his health
without him even noticing. There was no other reason for him to feel such aversion, as
if he were breaking out in hives.
He did not allow himself to be consumed by his baffling current state, instead clinging
tightly to his long-held affection toward her.
“Chae-woo, what is this?”
“A present.”
He pulled himself together and managed to take something out of his pocket. He
opened the palm of his hand to reveal a small wood carving. Upon receiving the gift,
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened.
“Wow!”
The carving was of a flower, each petal blooming vividly. As Kwon Chae-woo studied
Lee-yeon’s reaction, he tucked his arms into his armpits and pressed his lips together.
He was rather abashed of his work.
The more closely Lee-yeon examined the pretty carving, the more she noticed its
sloppy parts, and each time she found another flaw, her heart fluttered.
“Did you make this?”
“Sorry I couldn’t give you anything nicer.”
Lee-yeon’s lips parted slightly and she lowered her eyes back to the flower in her
hand.
“you said you’d never give me flowers.”
As she spoke in a choked voice, a slight movement began at the corners of his lips,
and then subsided. His smiles had seemed especially brief today, but the words that
followed made those sorts of trivial thoughts all flutter away.
“That’s why I carved it into a tree. So, it’ll never wither.”
She became unusually shy to make eye contact with him. Lee-yeon fondly ran her
hand over the carving that had clearly not been easy to make.
“But Chae-woo, how did you dye it?”
Lee-yeon pointed to the flower petals, which had been lightly tinged with a bright red.
“It’s blood.”
“what?”
She pricked up her ears, thinking she had misheard.
“I hurt myself while carving and some blood got on it.”
He pressed the ends of his eyebrows and avoided her gaze. Lee-yeon rushed to open
his palm, and saw scars were spread across his already rough skin.
“You said they were animal scratches!”
“Because they don’t look much different.”
“It was really only that? There isn’t anything else you’re hiding?”
Kwon Chae-woo gestured with his eyes to the blood-stained petals.
“Uh would it scare you if I said about half of that was intentional?”
“yes. I’ll pretend I didn’t hear that.”
Lee-yeon wrapped the precious wood carving in her hands and pulled it toward her
heart. The two remained for some time there, in front of the now branchless and
ungraceful, but newly healed sacred tree.

“Chae-woo, are you asleep?”
After washing up late, Lee-yeon slightly rocked the man who seemed to have fallen
asleep waiting for her.
My evaluation is over now—all I have to do is shut my eyes and spit it out. Lee-yeon
wanted to get things straight quickly, before she lost all her courage.
I really wanted to say it today
“Chae-woo, don’t fall asleep yet. We said we would talk today.”
He swept his eyes and relaxed his throat. His already weakened voice soon crumbled
into a moan. Lee-yeon became worried when she saw his fatigue and covered him with
a blanket.
“Alright, let’s just sleep for now and talk tomorrow.”
She lifted the other side of the blanket and slid in next to him. If things were normal,
he would have opened his arms and held her tightly, sensing her warmth like a ghost.
Fast asleep, he simply lay there and breathed, as if he couldn’t care less whether or
not Lee-yeon had come to bed. Lee-yeon spread his arms, settled into the gap, and
hugged his waist tightly. Only then did her heart feel warm and at home.
‘First of all, I’ll explain how we met’
As she thought through what she’d say tomorrow, her eyes began to close.
The sound of the bugs in the grass floating in through the window, Chae-woo’s
comforting scent, his firm yet wide chest, the smell of two people permeating the
room, the weight taking up half the bed, the absence of fear despite the presence of
another in the dark.
As she basked in each of these things, her whole body became listless and calm.
‘I’m sorry, in advance. I might end up hurting you tomorrow’
Lee-yeon’s spirit slowly sank down, down, down.

Brrrrring! Brrrrring!
The alarm that begins each day rang out loudly.
Lee-yeon frowned and burrowed into his chest. Usually, the alarm would ring once,
then twice, and at exactly the third ring, Kwon Chae-woo would toss and turn as he
shut it off.
Then there would be silence again, and he would squeeze Lee-yeon in a hug, press his
lips on the tender nape of her neck, and grumble and groan, not wanting to get out of
bed. That’s how the two begin their mornings.
Brrrrring! Brrrrring! Brrrrring!
But today was a bit different.
“Chae-woo.”
Lee-yeon whined, getting closer to his face and pushing him more and more. But the
man who was usually extremely sensitive to sounds was utterly silent today.
Something was off. Lee-yeon got chills and became suddenly alert. Her eyes popped
open all on their own, without a poke or prod from anyone.
As expected, the first thing she saw was Kwon Chae-woo, breathing evenly with his
eyes closed. Lee-yeon turned the alarm off herself and took in her surroundings, which
seemed particularly heavy today.
Sure enough, the sky was full of dark clouds, as if rainy season were about to begin
early.
“Chae-woo wake up. We’ll be late.”

“Kwon Chae-woo!”

Lee-yeon shook his shoulders, but he didn’t budge. His eyelids, closed tight as window
shutters, didn’t quiver in the slightest. Not even his forehead flinched. Lee-yeon knew
it was a ridiculous thought, but it seemed like somewhere in her body had instantly
become frozen cold. Her hands were shaking.
“Chae-woo Kwon Chae-woo!”
She shook him and patted his cheeks, but he showed no signs of waking up.
Goosebumps arose from the palms of her hands. She finally resorted to punching his
wide chest repeatedly with her soft fists, but the result was the same.
“Wha what in the world”
Then all sorts of thoughts came to mind. As if the tips of her fingers had suddenly
stiffened, Lee-yeon slowly clenched and unclenched her fists while she calmed down.
Don’t be so dramatic. Think clearly.Lee-yeon took a deep breath and fought to regain
her composure. Everyone sleeps in sometimes.
That sort of thing is common sense. There was no need to panic so much about the
fact that Kwon Chae-woo was in too deep a sleep to wake up right away.
“Chae-woo, c’mon, get up. What are you dreaming so deeply about? I have to leave for
work soon. If I keep dawdling, I’ll get an earful from Joo Dong-mi. You can’t blame me
later for not trying to wake you up.”
It wasn’t long before Lee-yeon held a damp towel in her hand, wiping it across the
back of his neck to try and revive him. But despite all her efforts, the man didn’t lift a
finger. She carefully wiped his eyes, hands, feet, and eyebrows, rubbing like a
masseuse, but it grew to be too much for her.
Lee-yeon couldn’t bear to overcome the uneasiness that bubbled up inside her, and in
the end she fell to her knees in despair.
“Kwon Chae-woo, wake up! I said wake up!”
Her eyes were misty and her breath stopped short.
“Chae-woo!”

Lee-yeon sighed and yanked on the clothes of the man who refused to respond no
matter how many times she called his name, but there was no strength in her grasp. What went wrong? Lee-yeon ran her hands through her tangled hair and lay back next
to him.
“Did did I do something wrong? I’ve been busy lately, so maybe that’s”
Kwon Chae-woo has Kleine-Levin syndrome, so he’s prone to oversleeping. But it
wasn’t so difficult for him to wake up regularly in the morning when Lee-yeon was
there by his side.
Maybe she’d gotten too used to that and let her guard down. Lee-yeon’s effect on him
running out for whatever reason was a predictable enough situation.
“Did I miss something?”
Lee-yeon embraced him in vain as he continued to escape from her like sand. It was
the only way she knew how to wake him up. She gathered and drew together what
had become empty, but all that remained was silence and a shell of a person.
Eventually, she picked up her phone.
Hello.
A yawn arose from the drowsy voice on the other end of the line. Then suddenly, as if
someone had pushed her over, the cries burst from her.
“Doctor!!”
So Lee-yeon? What is it, so early in the morning?
The doctor’s tone of voice became clear at once, as if she had immediately picked up
on Lee-yeon’s urgency. But rather than words, all that Lee-yeon could muster were
tears. She pressed her lips together for a moment and dropped her phone. She
managed just barely to swallow her sobs, but her facial expression crumbled
helplessly.
“Kwon Chae-woo he’s not waking up!”

“It really was like a ghost story.”
The Beauty Hospital director stretched his neck from side to side as he spoke.
Lee-yeon was walking around the wide trunk of the sacred tree, taking thorough notes
on the results of the surgery, and the director was following her persistently.
“Director So, is there some problem at home?”
“no.”
“How odd. Can the sacred tree distinguish between people?”
The man scowled and looked up at the unsightly sacred tree.
“I even totaled my car. I’d been on that road thousands of times—who could’ve
expected a boulder to suddenly come tumbling toward it? I crossed the center line to
avoid it. I mean, my perfect driving record of 30 years was almost ruined!”

“Thank God I was the only one hurt. Imagine if it had been someone else!”
He shook his head, shuddering at the thought. Then Lee-yeon stopped walking and
turned to look at him.
“It’s alright, sir. I didn’t think you’d run off to get out of doing surgery or anything like
that.”
“What?”
“I just meant that you don’t have to feel like you need an excuse.”
As if she’d hit the nail on the head, the director’s face instantly stiffened. He scratched
his head and coughed as Lee-yeon continued speaking.
“Well, now I’ll definitely secure the Dome Project.”
“what?”
“You know, I’m the doctor of a tree that survived a ghost story.”
Lee-yeon evaded the people’s torrent of grievances and passed the second round of
evaluation.
Ever since the sacred tree’s unique quality of magnificence disappeared overnight, the
village people clicked their tongues and turned their heads every time they passed by
it. Lee-yeon was the only one to consistently stop by and check on the tree, as well as
keep a record of its healing process.
She half-listened to the director’s rambling as she administered an IV to the tree. The
recovery speed had been particularly slow due to the high number of rotten cavities.
Lee-yeon wiped off her sweat with the back of her hand. She hadn’t given much
thought to the baby hairs that kept falling from her loose ponytail, until suddenly she
recalled an affectionate touch from another time.

The feeling of fingertips sweeping baby hairs across her cheek and rubbing her
earlobe. At that touch her ears had shivered, yet her neck had grown hot.
It felt like it was only yesterday. Lee-yeon took a moment to lower her head and take a
deep breath.
“Choo-ja, it’s done.”
She straightened her back. Choo-ja studied Lee-yeon’s face as if it were her duty, and
stood up alongside her.
As soon as the expressionless Lee-yeon picked up her bag and took off first, Choo-ja
made a zipped lips gesture toward the Beauty Hospital director. Startled by her biting
glare, the man recoiled.
The long rainy season was coming to an end, and it had been one month since Kwon
Chae-woo fell asleep.

“There’s no way to know exactly when he’ll wake up.”
In a panic, she had hurriedly contacted the doctor.
That day, he fell back into a deep sleep, as if beginning all over again. Just as before,
whenever medical staff visited to bathe him, check his condition, or administer shots,
Lee-yeon only stared blankly at him.
His body was cold some days, warm others. Even little abnormalities like this made
Lee-yeon’s emotions jump all over the place, changing dozens of times within one day.
“Chae-woo, when on earth will you wake up?”
Just like every other day, she squeezed in bed next to Chae-woo, who lay still as a
piece of wood.
If she didn’t sleep in the same bed as him, who knows whether or not he’d become
even more distant? Lee-yeon could not yet break free of that illusion. She didn’t want
to admit that the string forcing them together had been cut, that he didn’t need her
anymore.
“Not even a forest princess would sleep for this long.”
Lee-yeon stared vacantly at his unresponsive profile.
“Can you hear me? If you’re listening, hurry up and come out of there.”

“What is a man who always has nightmares doing in there all alone?”
It was the thick of summer but lying next to Kwon Chae-woo chilled her to the bone.
From time to time, she woke up and rushed to check his breathing, wondering if she
were clutching onto a dead body.
Some days, she missed him so much that she waited up all night, wondering if he’d
get up to go to the bathroom.
That was how a whole month passed.
A man who was clearly alive but could not make eye contact or respond to anything.
Kwon Chae-woo, fast asleep and unconscious.
Without his interference, Lee-yeon’s regular lifestyle of eating, working, and going
back home became more grueling. Each day, she simultaneously looked forward to
and dreaded the next. Mornings, nights—it was all hard for her.
“But I’ll wait.”
Lee-yeon closed her eyes with resolution.
“As I’ve said before, patients who can’t move or talk are comparatively quite easy to
care for.”

“Trees also hibernate. Shaking off leaves and going to sleep is their preparation for
springtime. Maybe your deep sleep is for a reason, too. So when you’re all done with
whatever it is you’re doing, wake up, please. All the time I’ve spent waiting for trees
to recover has given me a lot of patience.”

“We’ll have a lot to talk about.”
Her eyelashes trembled, but his fingers remained still, not showing even the slightest
sign of movement.

“Director, I don’t see him.”
Gyu-baek, who usually shows the discipline of a well-trained kid soldier, spoke as he
roamed around the house distractedly.
He was the type that had to sit and get settled in the proper spot before beginning
anything. As he examined his surroundings, he repeatedly clenched and unclenched
his fists. It was obvious who Gyu-baek was looking for.
“Ah.”
A hopeless gleam shone across the face of Lee-yeon, who sat before the TV in a daze.
“Ma’am, it seems I lost him.”
“What?”
“As expected, that’s the end of theold monkey. My understanding was correct.”
As he spoke, Gyu-baek glanced out at the front yard where Chae-woo often used to
exercise. Lee-yeon smiled bitterly.
It seemed like Kwon Chae-woo had left a lot behind. Choo-ja, Joo Dong-mi, Gyu-baek—
already this many people had asked and worried about him all month long. She wished
even more people would be holding onto him like this.
“He’s not lost, Gyu-baek.”
Sometimes, when Kwon Chae-woo disappeared like this, she feared she would be the
only one to remember him. There are times when those sorts of anxieties can eat away
at a person. She looked at Gyu-baek with a refreshed sense of relief.
“Kwon Chae-woo is sleeping now. He’s asleep on the second floor.”

Gyu-baek, who rarely showed strong expressions, suddenly looked as if he’s heard
something preposterous.
“He he’s lost his mind.”
“What?”
“Female bears, they give birth in hibernation, but males sleep through the whole
thing. They don’t take care of their babies, they don’t even live with the females. This
old male has nothing to parrot, so he’s mimicking the life of a bear. It’s shocking, truly
shocking.”
Gyu-baek’s words spilled out in a flurry.
“You ought to become a female praying mantis.”
“What?”
“The female mantis eats the male. And you can’t let that male be an exception to the
rule.”
“That male—no, Kwon Chae-woo will wake up soon.”
Then Gyu-baek frowned and shook his head exactly five times. “No. He is sure to
continue sleeping.”
“What?” Lee-yeon laughed off Gyu-baek’s air of pity as he continued.
“I’ve seen males like him more than enough times. My grandfather drinks, all day
every day. My uncle is similar. They don’t change. Some men just have a screw loose
from the very start. In bears’ case, even if they sleep for a long time, their bones and
muscles are fine but he took a wrong turn somewhere.”
Gyu-baek, perhaps feeling uneasy, sat down and began to quickly leaf through the
pages of a book.
“The man needs to regain consciousness quickly. When you laze around, you’re sure
to lose your territory to a younger monkey.” The child babbled, comparing Kwon
Chae-woo to a monkey.
“Of course.”
Lee-yeon only patted the boy’s head. Gyu-baek, who usually might have resisted,
pushed his head down as if giving her permission.
Choo-ja and Gyu-baek’s everyday life at Spruce Tree Hospital remained normal. Leeyeon’s already dull face became even more darkly clouded.
Will this sort of thing keep happening again and again? Not just this once?
She bit her lip and covered her tired eyes with her palm. Will I have to feel this alone,
this abandoned, over and over again?
Living with a man who could wake up at any moment might end up being a lot more
difficult than she originally thought. The man bloomed as briefly as a flower, and Leeyeon would have to tolerate getting through it all alone. It would become a life
dedicated to waiting, waiting for the arrival of that one abnormal day.
She fiddled with the wood carving Kwon Chae-woo had gifted her.

After the sacred tree’s surgery, the number of inquiries sent to the hospital increased,
as if they’d unintentionally left a strong impression on the public.
Lee-yeon took it all in stride. Only by keeping busy could she continue to stand up and
overcome the listlessness that often struck her. Once again today, Lee-yeon stopped
by the tennis court construction site, which was now in full swing. She was in the
process of making an estimate.
“The trees died because all their holes were blocked off.”
Using her toes, Lee-yeon pointed out the water veins that had been completely
covered by the soil at the construction site.
“First of all, we’ll need to construct a well—I’m sorry, just one moment.”
Lee-yeon excused herself as she felt her phone buzzing in her pants pocket.
But as soon as she saw the name on her screen, her face visibly stiffened.
It was Kwon Ki-seok.

Those three syllables hit her like a strike over the head. She rubbed her forehead like
someone who’d just walked into a telephone pole and stuffed her phone back in her
pocket. These pants had very wide pockets, but it still took her a few tries to put her
phone back in.
Was it because this was the first time she’d done this? Was it such a big deal for her to
miss one phone call? Her heart was beating hard against her chest.
Thinking back, the bigger problem was that up until now she’d acted like he was her
master, obediently answering every time he called.
This time she’d abruptly rejected the call. She worried he might just keep calling until
she picked up, but her phone remained silent.
“Anyway, this is just like when a person has a stuffy nose. First, let’s try to dig out
some of the dirt.”
The on-site engineer was listening to her explanation when he suddenly tilted his
head.
“I didn’t hear about anyone visiting the site today?”
He raised his eyebrows, a hint of annoyance on his face. Lee-yeon, overhearing his
grumbling, turned her head to look.
She watched as a spotless sedan smoothly coasted to a stop.
Her phone started to ring again. The back door opened, revealing in succession the
jet-black shoes, expensive suit, and silver-framed glasses of none other than Kwon Kiseok. He was holding his phone to his hear and staring directly at Lee-yeon.


It was the first time she’d seen him since that night two years ago. Riiing, riiing. Her
thigh ached as her phone vibrated violently in her pocket.
Lee-yeon found herself shrinking back. Ki-seok scrutinized her expressionlessly before
making a big show of ending the call.
“If you won’t pick up, then get in.”
He nodded toward the car. Perhaps it was a case of victim mentality, but she could
have sworn she heard the words, “While I’m asking nicely.”
“Sir, I have to—”
Choo-ja, who had been working on plans for the well, interjected with a serious face,
“Who is that?”
“Chae-woo’s older brother,” Lee-yeon whispered under her breath.
Choo-ja lowered the rim of her cap, and without moving her lips asked, “That jerk who
blackmailed you?”
When Lee-yeon nodded her head slightly in confirmation, Choo-ja gasped in
astonishment, “Oh my-! This is no ordinary pair of brothers, that’s for sure.”
“Choo-ja, I have to go take care of this. While I’m gone, can you prepare the trunk
injection?”
“What happens if he tries to hurt you? We should call the police.”
“It’s no use.”
“What?”
This feeling of being pressed on from all sides was not unfamiliar. Lee-yeon moved
towards the car as if being dragged by some invisible force.

The inside of the car smelled vaguely of cigars.
Lee-yeon placed her hands squarely on her knees. As Ki-seok leaned back deeply in his
seat and pinched the bridge of his nose, his glasses slid down a bit revealing his face.
Lee-yeon jerked her head to the side, like she’d seen something she wasn’t supposed
to.
His attitude was so cold, Lee-yeon could have literally been on fire and he probably
wouldn’t have even lifted a finger. However, when he spoke, it was clear his chilling,
emotionless words were directed towards her.
“I caught the real culprit.”
Her eyes widened.
“You caught the real culprit?” Lee-yeon stared at him in disbelief.
It was something she’d given up on for some time now. Some part of her had given up
on ever being able to catch the person capable of abducting her for no reason and
even forcibly obtaining her signature. As the years passed, somewhere along the way
Lee-yeon had simply become resigned to the fact that she would never find him.
Sometimes, the logic of power leads to unprovoked misery. Lee-yeon had believed
she’d simply been a victim of that misery. She’d accepted the situation with Chae-woo
as a kind of obstacle or burden that she’d carry with her for the rest of her life. That’s
how she’d been able to rationalize everything while she waited for him to wake up.
“I had to go undercover and find him from within his gang so it took me a while.”
He opened the console box in the back seat and removed a thin file containing the
culprit’s photo and background information.
Her memory of the incident two years ago had faded somewhat, but when she saw the
photo, she recognized him immediately. It was clearly the face of the man whom Kwon
Chae-woo had tried to bury alive and who eventually struck Kwon Chae-woo over the
head, causing him to lose his memory.
She was so caught off guard by this unexpected turn of events that she couldn’t focus
enough to comprehend the rest of the information in the file.
“Now, you no longer have to face punishment for a crime you didn’t commit.”
She suddenly felt like something fishy was going on. Lee-yeon knew all too well how
superficial his gentleman-like appearance was.
“From now on, you, So Lee-yeon, are free.”

She stopped breathing for a moment, her heart pounding like crazy. This is the
freedom she had been waiting for all this time.
The moment she could finally break free from the constant surveillance and blackmail.
She clasped her knees with her sweaty palms.
The ridiculous charges against her would be lifted, her shackles removed. She would
finally be free from the horror that had taken her life as collateral. It was all there,
right in front of her.
And yet, that intense feeling of bliss suddenly slipped from her grasp. She felt oddly
uneasy. Instead of feeling relieved that it was all over, it was as though something was
being stolen right from under her.
Lee-yeon sat frozen, unable to reply. Ki-seok turned to look at her.
As he turned, the leather seat made a sound like someone grinding their teeth
together.
“I’ll be taking Chae-woo with me.”

“Thank you for taking such good care of him, Lee-yeon.”
“Well, wait, just hang on a second.” At that, Lee-yeon finally pulled herself
together. “What are you saying all of a sudden?”
“Is there some kind of problem? We have already met all the terms of our agreement,
have we not?”
“You think you can just leave him in my care and take him away as you like. How can
you treat people like this?” Lee-yeon tried to settle her rising emotions and continue
calmly. Still there was no hiding the tremor in her voice. She wasn’t cold at all, yet her
whole body was shaking from Ki-seok’s chilling gaze.
“We made a deal that was mutually beneficial. Or would you rather I had thrown you
in jail?”

“If I had, I wouldn’t be sitting here now listening to you spew this nonsense.”
Lee-yeon gently chewed her lip. You could hear a vague feeling of shame in her pitiful
sounding tone.
Perhaps, she really was an idiot, just like he said, for not jumping at the opportunity to
put an end to all this.
“but the marriage registration.” Lee-yeon, unable to keep her hands still, couldn’t
stop rubbing her hands together almost to the point of wearing out her fingerprints.
“If you already knew the extent of my lies to Chae-woo, then why”
“So, you think I’m being unfair?”
“What?”
“I was trying to help you.”
“Exactly! Just why!” She pushed her hair out of her face in frustration. Suddenly, Kiseok lowered himself, so their eyes were level with each other. His stared at her,
silent, searching.
“Do you know what my brother despises most in this world?”

“Being lied to.
Beneath his glasses, she could see his sharp eyes and was reminded of Chae-woo. Leeyeon felt as though her heart, frozen inside her chest, was impaled on a harpoon.
“I, on the other hand, am quite fond of your lies.”
As the light in Lee-yeon’s eyes darkened, Ki-seok exuded a terrifying energy.
“We’re the same, you and I.”
This remark was gut wrenching. She had never felt more guilty for lying to Chae-woo
than she did in this moment. Lee-yeon clutched her stomach and dropped.
“please, don’t take him away,” she pleaded, her voice as small as an ant’s.
Even as Ki-seok stood looming over Lee-yeon, pale with fear, the resemblance was
striking. She frowned suddenly. The change was especially noticeable, for her face,
which white as a sheet, suddenly contorting into a strange expression.
“I didn’t expect to see another lie become true.”
They could hear a faint wind overhead. Ki-seok was just as formal as the first time
they’d met, but rather it was the lack of change in his attitude that made her realize
his ridiculing sneer reflected his honest emotions.
He slowly rapped his fingertips against the armrest.
“Nothing you have learned about Kwon Chae-woo up until now has been real.”
Lee-yeon’s shoulders shook with fear.
“Even so, are you confident you won’t have any regrets?”

Who knows how she made it through the rest of the workday.
Night had fallen, and she was just coming through the front door, her mind in a daze.
The lights were off, but in the darkness, an even darker shadow rose silently,
blanketing the tops of Lee-yeon’s feet. Startled, she dropped her bag with a thud.

She rubbed her eyes roughly, unable to tell if this was a dream or reality. Just when
she thought her heart would explode, her eyes filled with tears.
Right there in front of her, the man who for the past month had been the source of all
her dread and anxiety, Kwon Chae-woo stood calmly looking down at her. Perhaps
because he’d been asleep for so long, his eyes still seemed a bit blurry, but there was
no doubt in her heart. It was Kwon Chae-woo.
“Lee-yeon, how have you been?”
“Chae, Chae-woo.”
He slowly stepped toward her. When he smiled at her with that same feeling of
warmth and affection, she was struck speechless.
He stood with his hands clasped behind his back, twirling a web-like silver thread
around in his hand. The string was coiled tightly around the back of his fingers and
hands.
When he clenched his fist, the tightly wound string dug into his skin. The thin silver
thread shone sharply on the back of his hand cutting of his circulation and turned his
hand a dark red color.
“It’s been a while, Lee-yeon.”

Kwon Chae-woo was dreaming.
His vision was foggy. Who knows how long he’d been wandering aimlessly through
this place where he couldn’t see or feel a thing, let alone distinguish what time or day
it was.
One thing was certain. The further he walked, he drew lines, and the twisting sound
grew louder and louder, until it felt as though his ears were bleeding.
“Ugh.”
He couldn’t hear anything over his terrible headache and the ringing in his ears. He
felt like vomiting and wished to just turn around and go back the way he had come,
but his legs seemed to move on their own.
That unbearable tone rose to an unbearable volume. The sound of something pulling
and scratching reverberated like a soprano singing in vibrato.
That terrible screaming sound continued growing uncontrollably louder and louder in
his head. It grew and grew until he thought his head might explode.
Almost instantly, the fog before his eyes cleared. In this dream, he saw someone.
Covered in sweat, drawing lines, it was none other than Kwon Chae-woo himself, just
younger.
He sits, dressed in a fitted tailcoat, a cello between his legs, driving himself to the
limit with his performance. His arms, wrists, fingers all moving in harmony with
careful restraint, sometimes swelling in wave-like motions, other times shaking
intensely, violently.
The spotlight on him is illuminating. His fingers press violently against the four
strings, beads of sweat dripping from the ends of his hair each time he cuts his bow
across them.
The audience is holding their breath, unable to tear their eyes from the stage. They
understand at once why this nobody of a boy is said to be the best at playing a
Guarneri.
The same Guarneri played by Paganini until the day he had died.
Stradivari violins are also good instruments, but this Asian boy had appeared out of
nowhere seemingly possessed by the spirit of Guarneri instruments, able to make such
a beautiful sound that it pulled people in, tempting as the devil.
His playing was always heavy and dark. Yet at the same time it was never crude nor
vulgar.
Opinions about his unique style were divided, but Kwon Chae-woo, who had a natural
talent for mastering musical instruments, became Guarneri’s perfect muse.
And at that moment.
— Chaewoo, she’s dead.
All the memories poured out as though a dam had broken in his mind.
One day just before he turned 20, his world changed.
How the devilish talent, who made his debut at the age of thirteen as the youngest
winner of both the Geneva and Rostropovich International Competitions, vanished in a
single moment.
How that invaluable source of inspiration was lost overnight.
It all started with that phone call from his brother.
“Brother, I don’t care what her body looks like–” He was sobbing,“Just let me see her
one last time.”
Now the cello was just a wooden plank to him. He’d been obsessed with this
instrument all his life. The loss of his musical talent, as if it had been stolen from him,
left him defeated to the point where he couldn’t play even a single note.
The scene shifted, the dream bringing his consciousness to another memory.
“Gaahhhhhh!”
The corners of Chae-woo’s mouth perked up at the sound of the desperate wail. He
pressed his opponent’s back with his knees and lifted his neck mercilessly by the rope
wound around it. He calmly tightened the rope around the man squirming on his back
like a fish out of water. The hounds cheered wildly, slamming against the cage.
“St-stop”! Gahhhh!”
Despite his opponent’s appeals, Kwon Chae-woo’s gaze remained indifferent. His eyes
were motionless, just the corners of his mouth curving up in a sinister grin. The
muscles in his neck were strained revealing the colorful veins beneath his skin. One
thick tendon bulged from his arm, running from the back of his hand up to his elbow.
Jang Beom-hee, who stood watching from outside the cage, shuddered at the thought
of Chae-woo’s monstrous grip.
“If you’re going to piss your pants at something as simple as this, why did you come in
here?” He spat at the man.
“Ugh, ughhh! Please st—”
“How can you do this when life is so precious?”
“Gahhh!”
“If my job is to be a knife-wielding gangster, the least I should do is not listen to my
pet.”
Chae-woo relaxed his strength and stepped back, his opponent dropping to the floor.
The wide square fighting cage reeked of rusty iron. Kwon Chae-woo scanned the men
outside the cage with raw emotion in his eyes.
“Sir,” Beom-hee said, approaching with a towel in his hands.
It had already been six years since Kwon Chae-woo returned home and became
addicted to violence, the taste of which he had only gotten by accident.
Having disappeared from the stage as soon as he turned 20, he was now a hound on
the front line of violence to help with the family business. The concentration camp that
voluntarily entered was a private education battalion of the Kwon family, where Kwon
Chae-woo completely permeated into the darkness of society through a hellish
training process.
From a genius cellist who once dominated the classical world to a shallow torturer
who became a heinous racketeer and took out debt. It took a ridiculously short
amount of time for Chae-woo to become addicted to violence.
Cello, the instrument that most closely resembles a human vocal range.
“Gahhhhhhhhh!”
He stamped a foot down on his opponent’s back one more time.
The sense he’d once had to be able to fall into a trance and make music from
something as simple as a few notes was long lost, but violence has many similarities.
In this place of torn flesh and blood curdling screams, the needle numbing his system
seemed to press ever deeper.
Only then was able to pick up his cello bow once more. Like a parched man searching
for a well, he fell hopelessly into sadistic behavior.
“How did it go?”
Chae-woo stepped out of the cage without hesitation and crossed the musty basement. Whenever he climbed the stairs, small creases of light crossed his forehead as little by
little he rose from the darkness. Jang Beom-hee followed closely behind and lowered
his voice.
“I’ve identified a suspect.”
“Who?”
“A few years ago, she was a maid for the family, but she can’t speak.”
“Was her tongue cut or was she born that way?”
“Her tongue was cut, sir.”
There is a fine line between genius and maniac. Kwon Chae-woo controlled the hounds
with nothing but a lust for violence. He did not hesitate to do dirty work for his own
pleasure, rather than for the survival of the family, and since the hounds were a gang
famous enough to be used by previous presidents, he was a perfect player in that field.
Once he’d gained some power, he’d begun to do all the things he’d put off when he
was helpless.
“I’m guessing it wasn’t because cutting off her fingers was too much work.”
“It’s”
When Jang Beom-hee hesitated, Chae-woo, who was ahead of him, stopped walking
and looked back. “Don’t make me angry and tell me.”
“I think Director Kwon lied to you, sir.”
Jang Beom-hee couldn’t bear to look into his eyes and bowed his head.
“I don’t think Jooha’s death was an accident
She had many names and titles.
Yoon Jooha, that woman, crazy hag.
And his mother.
Even now, it was like looking at a melody whenever he closed his eyes. Warm sunlight,
fine hair fluttering in the wind, their humble thatched house, big trees.
A mother who nurtured with love and devotion and created a source of music. A warm
woman who taught the echoes of the trees and the cello.
A benefactor who sang a lullaby every night and told irrevocable lies at the same time.
A sinner who kidnapped Chae-woo, who was only three years old at the time, by
concealing him in a cello bag.
“Tell me.”
His face stiffened.
“It is to my understanding that the Kwon family has held her in custody for quite some
time.”
At that moment, Chae-woo finally opened his eyes, feeling the intense pain of his
broken ribs. The dream has ended and now he was finally conscious after months of
sleep.
“Oh, my” He sucked in a breath, hoisting himself up into a seated position. His chest
shook roughly like someone struggling to breathe.
Darn it, Chae-woo cursed in a strangely unfamiliar voice. His head, which had been
foggy up to that point, was brutally clear. He grimaced in pain.
Eventually he looked around at the familiar, yet unfamiliar seemingly strange
interior.The pattern on the ceiling he’d never seen before, the unfamiliar furniture,
and the medical devices checking his vitals. He ripped the pad off his body and got out
of bed.
He casually overlooked the first thing he saw, the wild animal rescue center’s jacket,
as if it were part of the wallpaper, and scanned the neatly organized wallet, cell
phone, and ID card on the dresser.
“what is all this?”
He crumpled his forehead and lifted his ID. The picture was definitely of him, but the
numbers were ridiculous. His birthday from the day to the year was all fake. He
laughed audibly at the sight of his age; four years older than he really was.
Like a well-made film set, this place had no sense of reality. Chae-woo kept looking at
the house unfamiliarly, rubbing the nape of his neck.
His hands felt rough as he opened drawers and searched through closets.
Nevertheless, his steps moved naturally like a person who knew exactly where to go.
His head couldn’t keep up with his body. Chae-woo clicked his tongue in annoyance at
his lack of memories.
“Exactly what kind of drugs was I subjected to. Who bastards did this to me?” Chaewoo came down the stairs, stretching and cracking his stiff neck, arms, waist, and legs
one after another.
However, the further he went down, the more spectacular the sight was. With two
pairs of indoor shoes, pastel-toned cushions, couple mugs, twin pots, and dream
catchers, the lower floor’s interior was cute and cozy.
Completely the opposite of him.
At the sight of the lower floor, his stomach lurched. Chae-woo held onto the railing
and bowed his head. Whenever he took a deep breath with his teeth clenched, the
veins sticking out in the center of his forehead writhed.
Fake, fake, fake. The whole thing was an outrageous facade. He could feel it in the
sporadic twitches of his body.
It was a level of disgust he’d felt for the first time in a long time since the world he
knew had been overturned at the age of 13.
At that, his memories came rushing back to him like pieces of metal to a magnet,
shocking him to the point where he saw lights in his eyes.
“Ah”
His adam’s apple bobbed once and a meaningful groan slipped from his lips. The man
lifted his bloodshot eyes and slowly stared into the air.
Yes
He had come to Hwaido to catch So Lee-yeon.
Bang! Beom-hee was stunned when he saw that half the door had been kicked down.
From the moment his ears had picked up the noise, he had immediately closed the
laptop he’d been working on and grabbed his baton, but he froze at the warlike force
of Chae-woo walking towards him.
That look in his eyes. The familiar energy he’d wielded in the past, of twisting and
tearing apart all the things he found unsatisfactory.
“Are you the young master?”
He felt a feeling of foreboding in his stomach.
“Beom-hee.”
Kwon Chae-woo, his face white as a sheet, grabbed Beom-hee by the collar and
pushed him to the wall.”Ugh! How on earth”
“Explain.” Chase-woo’s deeply furrowed brow and roughly raised eyebrows were
fiercer than ever. The dim look in his eyes revealed his feelings of confusion and
distrust, but something could be read in his expression as clearly as if illuminated by
the light of a lighthouse. Jang Beom-hee’s chest expanded and sunk in anticipation.
Instead of coughing, he smiled.
“I went under Director Kwon Ki-seok. As the young master ordered.”

“Are you really back?”
“So much so that I know you dug a cave here.” He slowly turned his head to scan
Beom-hee’s room. Large dual monitors, a program still running, telescopes by the
window, and pictures all over the table.
“What’s with the wiretapping?” Chase-woo asked, gesturing toward the monitor with
his chin.
“Director Kwon told me to keep an eye on Lee-yeon’s every move.”
Chae-woo’s raised a single eyebrow in reaction.
On one wall hung simple descriptions of all the people at Spruce Tree Hospital, and
there were an exceptional number of shots of Lee-yeon.
Chae-woo’s indifferent gaze lingered there. In that moment, he couldn’t move his eyes
as though he was caught in a trap. Chae-woo started at the woman as if reveling in the
mere image of her.
“This is the face of the woman who’s been playing me this whole time.”
“Sorry?” Beom-hee asked blankly, a slight hint of irritation in his voice.
“She definitely said she was my wife.”
Jang Beom-Hee was speechless. His master was now really back.
“Which is odd, since I’ve never been married or had a wife. I’m not some drugged up
animal, and I’ve been shoving myself between her legs like a mad man. Like I’ve
completely lost my mind.”
“Young Master, have your memories,” Beom-hee started, frowning at the delicate
tone of Chae-woo’s voice, but he did not respond. He was still just staring at Leeyeon’s picture.
A woman like that always had a man following after her. In the photos it was Chaewoo, always holding her hand, had his arm around her shoulder, or kiss her forehead
without the slightest hesitation. This man’s face, smiling affectionately, was like a
stranger to Chae-woo.
After examining each photo one by one, Chae-woo slowly turned his head back
around.
“I remember rolling around in bed with her whenever I had time, but that’s it.”

“So, explain it to me, Beom-hee.”
Beom-hee immediately stood at attention when he saw Chae-woo’s fearsome
expression.
“What the hell was I doing in that house?” Chae-woo irritably released Beom-hee’s
collar.
“gaslighting and sexual abuse.”
Chae-woo closed the laptop after reading all the reports up to now.
“At the time, the young master was also suffering from sleep disorders due to
aftereffects from the accident.”
“Damn, how did I fall for such lies?” He twisted his mouth in a pernicious way. She
used to lie every single time she opened her mouth. As if having a fake mother wasn’t
enough, now he had a fake wife, too. To think that he had been mesmerized by that
fumbling liar
“You’re saying that’s how stupid I was.”
Every time he unclenched his fist, there was a slight cracking sound. He also felt
angry at himself for having behaved like an idiot with no memory and no intelligence.
He pressed his temples and sighed irritably.
“How many?”
“Yes?”
“So how many bugs did you plant in the house?” he turned his stiff neck and spat out
disapprovingly.
“Twelve in total.”
Then he smirked through his teeth and pressed his tongue roughly against the inside
of his cheek.
“Make sure you erase everything before you smash all the monitors you have here.”
“Sorry?”
“Did you not overhear us having sex?”

Chae-woo was cold as ice as he spat out the words as if he were cutting them to
pieces. Beom-hee’s expression hardened instantly and he raised his voice in protest,
“No!”
“I only selected the necessary information and reported it to Director Kwon! I took
special care to report that Lee-yeon was committing sex crimes and gaslighting the
young master, providing false information about her job, age, education background,
and that she was clearly psychologically manipulating you. Other than that, I had
absolutely no other intention!”
Beom-hee’s gaze was unwavering as he made his pleas, but Chae-woo remained
expressionless.
“Yes, she played me.”
“Providing a person with false information to intentionally mislead them is
undoubtedly an act of fraud.”
“You think of all people I’m the one who doesn’t know that?”
His face was cold, slowly recovering the faintest touch of emotion. The floor was bare
except for a few scratches purposefully etched into the surface, which remained like a
faint afterimage. Beom-hee lowered his head.
“I’m sorry.”
Chae-woo stood for a while with closed eyelids, his hands resting on the back of his
neck. He felt some nameless force surge within him, a feeling he had not had for a
very long time. This burning feeling boiling up inside him sent a hot, searing sensation
through his esophagus.
“Exactly what is the relationship between Ki-seok and Lee-yeon?”
“It started out as blackmail, but now it’s a partnership.”
“Blackmail?” Chae-woo’s glare was as sharp as that of an animal about to pounce on
its prey.
“It was something of an equivalent exchange. Lee-yeon was caught at the scene of the
young master’s accident. Instead of delaying Lee-yeon’s disposition, the director left
the young master in her care.”
“I fell right into their trap, what an idiot.” Chae-woo looked as though he would say
something more but stopped himself. It was not technically equivalent. Before he had
lost his memory, he clearly recalled hearing someone approach him from behind.
However, he was the one who chose not to move. At that moment, a laugh slipped out
from his hardened lips. He had been the dumb one.
“It’s been the same for us. As word spread that the young master had fallen into the
hands of the director, over the past two years our influence has steadily fallen.”
He had expected that much. Beom-hee’s next words made Chae-woo break his
indifferent expression.
“Also, Director Kwon and Lee-yeon met today.”
“What?”
Beom-hee opened the laptop again. He clicked on a file and there on the screen was a
picture of Ki-seok and Lee-yeon facing each other in front of a black sedan. Chae-woo
wrinkled his nose in utter disgust. Images flipped past his eyes on after anothern. The
two of them in the same car. Ki-seok leaning toward her, his expression heavy as if he
was having a serious conversation, Lee-yeon getting out the car, and Ki-seok’s
mysterious eyes following her.
“What time?”
“It hasn’t been long. Two hours ago.”

“As of now, Director Kwon has been turning a blind eye to Lee-yeon’s lies.”
“Ha.” Chaewoo frowned and then burst into laughter.
“In addition to the marriage report and ID card, most of the documents the young
master submitted prior to his employment are forged. The qualification certificate,
driver’s license, and bankbook copies were all provided by the director. It’s a fake ID
but it can still bypass most bank and portal sites.”
“Shit, what are you saying?” Chae-woo clenched his fist, the bones on the back of his
hand popping out like a rake. “You mean the both of them are out to get me? Those
two.”
He grabbed at picture of Lee-yeon that was lying on the table and crumpled it in his
fist.
“What do you plan to do now, young master?”
He didn’t even breathe. He just stared out the window at Lee-yeon’s house. At first
glance, he looked empty and cold from the back. Beom-hee felt and unknowable
feeling of anxiety as he watched his silhouette darken in the glow of the backlight. He
wondered what thoughts were running through this poor hedonist’s mind.
“What do you mean?” His calm voice fell heavily.
Suddenly, Chae-woo’s eyes fell on something in the toolbox. There was a string he
used to use often rolled up like a snake.
“I’ll just have to keep up this act until I can return home.”
“you mean, the young master will play along?”
An unexpected smile caught the corner of his mouth. “She really should have gutted
me when she still had the chance.”
“Sorry?”
I hate liars, he muttered to himself chillingly. “I have no intention of forgiving people
who play around with lies.”
Lee-yeon, who brazenly dared to lie to his face and make a complete fool out of him.
Now it was time for her to get a taste of her own medicine.
This dirty hound knew better than anyone how to hurt Lee-yeon in the most painful of
ways and he intended to strike that spot exactly.
“For now, I’ll try to find out whether she’s really in league with Ki-seok or not. Also-”
That submissive man who ‘d believed her to be his real wife was gone.
“Whether or not my mother was sold off.”
Those memories he hadn’t experienced directly were just a record. The record of some
other guy who borrowed his body for a while. Just a stupid sketch he could rip apart
and be done with.
And so, just like that, ‘So Lee-yeon’s husband Kwon Chae-woo,’ who never even truly
existed, was buried beyond retrieval.
When he returned to the house, he paused and frowned at the familiar scent
surrounding him. As if out of habit, he felt immediately relaxed and he felt himself
harden upon the realization that he was relieved just by the mere scent of her. Chasewoo cursed at this unwilling physical reaction. After losing his memory, he’d become
such a moron.
His mouth and nose were instantly filled with the scent. It was this scent that always
made the idiot Chae-woo, his past self, become sexually aroused, the scent of So Leeyeon. He scoured the house, opened the window, and aired out the room.
“Damn, it smells like shit.”
It was the feeling of waking up one day with your head filled with another man’s
memories. But it was nothing more than the feeling you got from rummaging through
another person’s bookshelf or looking uninspired through black and white film. Chaewoo remained calm throughout it all.
Suddenly, he heard small footsteps and the front door opened wide.
“Scarabs feed on cow dung and horse dung. Adult scarabs roll the dung into round
dumpling-like shapes and store them in a cave for later– Ah.” He stopped. Gyu-baek
froze, his jaw dropping at the sight of the man standing tall in the middle of the living
room. It was at that moment that Gyu-baek started running towards him cheerfully
and with hands outstretched
However.
“Oh?” The child hesitated and stopped in his tracks. His eyes grew big like the time
his drunken grandfather squashed one of his most cherished insects. He suddenly
stepped back, quickly turning to hide behind the sofa. He gasped and screamed at the
top of his lungs.
“Fake! You are an impostor!”
Chase-woo’s head slowly turned toward the insignificant thing.
He watched the fumbling child. There was nothing so comical as the sight of him
quickly covering his face whenever their eyes met.
Ah, him.
He recalled what he’d seen in this absurd little boy’s record. He treated me like a lazy,
worthless man.
“You—”
“He’s gone. The man I knew has disappeared!” Gyu-baek kept covering and
uncovering his eyes, his nostrils flaring. As Chae-woo strode toward him, he screamed
and ran around the living room like a rabbit out of its cage.
A thick tendon pulsed wildly on Chae-woo’s chin. He glanced agitatedly out the
window and up at the clock. If Lee-yeon came home to see this, the game would be up.
Chae-woo immediately snatched Gyu-baek with all his strength and sat him on the
sofa. He squatted down and squeezed the child’s arms tightly, lowering down to match
his eye level. He had never done anything this small. Chae-woo clicked his tongue.
“Hey kid.”
“The poor director. This is a huge problem. Male mantises fight with females to avoid
being eaten. They are very cautious and strategic in their approach. You have an
ulterior motive. The director is being fooled.”
“What?”
The child compulsively avoided eye contact and muttered words Chae-woo couldn’t
understand.
“A-and the spider, bites the female, injects venom, or mates tightly with a web. This is
the wild. But I can’t interfere with the glass box. That know-it-all doctor will have to.
Peter Jonathan’s book. Preface. Third line.”
Gyu-baek looked at the square house, his face pale. Chae-woo looked at his small
frame. His pupils were dilated, and his breath was shaking. Eventually, Chae-woo let
go of the boy’s arms. He thought of something to say to calm Gyu-baek. “Insects that
build cocoons don’t consider their cocoons fake, right?”
“It’s called metamorphosis.” The child was fast to correct him.

“There’s a difference between an incomplete metamorphosis and a complete
metamorphosis.”

“The director must be told that you have undergone complete metamorphosis.”
Chae-woo’s expression slowly faded into a frown. There was no way to talk to this kid.
In the end, Chae-woo opened his arms wide as if to take the boy in his embrace. In
case he might scare Gyu-baek, Chae-woo loosened his control on the spirit inside him.
“Look carefully, am I really not the same man you knew?”
“The man I knew was old, lazy, and infirm. But your eyes are—”
“My eyes?”
“Wicked.”

“My gambling uncle always looks like that when he takes from my grandfather’s
emergency bank account.”
Kwon Chae-woo remained speechless.
“When he goes behind his back.”
Chae-woo lowered his head and put a hand on the sofa, leaning his weight on that
arm.
“Listen here, you little punk. I read about you. I know you’re smart, not great at
reading the room, but you can get the gist.”
He pulled Gyu-baek’s head back by his hair and forced him to make eye contact.
“So tell me, what do you think you should do in this situation?”
Gyu-baek closed his eyes as hard as he could and tried to twist his head free.
“The director has to run away!”
“Wrong answer,” he said, veins bulging from his forehead, but he suppressed his rage.
“You have to shut your mouth and adapt to the new environment.”
Chae-woo squeezed the child’s small lips like he was holding a pair of tongs.
“Wake up to reality. You can’t save your precious director.”

Suddenly, the child’s shoulders drooped as though all the energy had left his body.
Seeing this, Chae-woo suddenly let go of Gyu-baek’s head and he bolted.
Gyu-baek’s sullen expression was oddly bothersome, but Chae-woo knew this feeling
wasn’t really his. It was just a learned reflex his body had picked up and he knew
better than to be fooled by the illusion.
It was enough to have experienced it once.
‘But the singing tree’
Chae-woo smiled coldly, recalling the word he’d heard mentioned over and over again
in the wiretapping recordings. Looking back, it had already been 15 years since then.
He lifted his rope, the first time in a long time, and it felt smooth in his hand. In that
moment, the wait for the kill was better than ever. A dull humming sound escaped
from between his lips.
I guess I wasn’t the only one thinking of you.
“It’s been a while.”
Lee-yeon stared blankly at Chae-woo who smiled back at her as though nothing had
happened.
The last month, when all she could see was darkness, had been the worst rainy season
ever. The house was always gloomy and sometimes she even resented having to use
an umbrella.
And the absence of the first warmth she’d ever received. Lee-yeon had felt like
collapsing, but she kept treating the trees every day and somehow managed to pick up
a spoon and eat. Surviving by protecting those who sleep in the forest. She was a
forest keeper and an endurer.
“You haven’t changed at all.”
“Chae-woo!”
“It’s been such a long time, but you’re just the same.”
She ran straight to him and hugged him around his waist. Her damp eyelids fluttered
on the verge of overflowing. He patted Lee-yeon on the back as she buried her face in
his chest like a puppy.
“Why didn’t you call me right away? Are you feeling any pain? Aren’t you hungry? Do
you have a headache?”
She questioned him endlessly, almost forgetting to breathe.
“I thought I might disturb you at work.”
“Do you have any idea how long I’ve been waiting for you!” Everything she had been
carrying inside her stacking all the way up to her neck was finally washed away. With
Chae-woo’s presence filling the house, her stomach felt full, her heart raced. and she
felt full of energy. She took a deep breath.
“You’ve been asleep for over a month. Do you have any idea how much—”
“I’m sorry.”
“—how much I missed you.” Her tears poured endlessly. On the other hand, Chae-woo
seemed noticeably stiff.
“Now, now what? I’m no help to you at all. There was nothing to even try, so every day
I just tried lying down next to you, but it was useless. And things are only going to get
harder for you and all I can do is sit there, uselessly.”
At this, Chae-woo took Lee-yeon in his arms and squeezed her as tightly as he could.
Her nose pressed against his hard chest, and he placed his chin on top of her head.
Their bodies fit together perfectly as though molded specifically for this purpose. It
had been a long time since they’d felt such a warm feeling. Eventually, his calm voice
drifted warmly down to her.
“No, it’s my fault for taking so long. I’m sorry for being so late.”
“I, because of me,” she sobbed, “I treated the Sacred Tree even though people said it
brings bad luck! And then you, instead of me—”
“It’s not your fault. While I was asleep, I had a long dream.”
“Oh, a dream? What dream?”
“Well, it was kind of amusing–”
Lee-yeon raised her head and looked at Chae-woo, wondering what he meant by that.
But it was difficult to read his expression without the lights on.
“In fact, it was a story about a woodcutter that didn’t help a deer. So, the deer was
gobbled up by the hunter. In the end, the fairy misses her lost deer so much, she kills
everyone.”
“Ah”
“In the dream of course.”
“It’s a relief it was just a dream, but it was another nightmare.”
The top of her head tickled against his chin, and she felt him smile lightly. What Leeyeon couldn’t see was the chilling sneer flashing in the whites of his eyes, and the
saliva forming at the sides of his mouth like blood.
“That’s why I absolutely need you, Lee-yeon.”
“But—
“If you don’t believe me, should I just go back to sleep?”
“Definitely not!”
Her whole body trembled in fear at the thought. At this reaction, they sat in silence for
a moment. A sharp fear clouded her eyes.
The mere thought of it reminded her of that morning, how fed up she had felt. No
matter how many times she went through it, she knew she could never get used to
sitting and staring at a man who won’t wake up.
“Chae-woo tomorrow is the weekend, so let’s stay up together tonight.”
“I’ll do whatever you want me to.”
Lee-yeon’s body relaxed, relieved by his answer.
“By the way, Lee-yeon.”
She hugged Chae-woo’s waist tighter.
“I hear you met my brother today.”
“What?” Lee-yeon paused and looked up at him.

Her eyes trembled at the unexpected change in topic. The man pulled himself from
their embrace and looked down at Lee-yeon.
She blinked up at him helplessly like a child who lost their candy.
His black eyes were unfamiliar, and she couldn’t read the emotion behind them. She
gulped nervously at the sudden tension. She was itching to turn on the light and see
Chae-woo’s friendly brown eyes once more.
“You should choose your words very carefully from now on.”
“Chae-woo?”
“Lee-yeon, have you ever sucked a dick?”
“What?”
It was like a foreign language she’d never heard before.
He rubbed her lips roughly as if trying to smooth them out and dug his nails into her
skin leaving small crescent shapes. Lee-yeon quickly stepped back from his painful
touch, but Chae-woo, not missing a step, pulled her back. Her wrists throbbed
painfully in his tight grasp.
“It’s okay. It’s not hard. You have things you’re good at.”
“Chae-woo, what are you—?”
“All you have to do is roll your tongue around it.”
She felt the hairs on the back of her neck stand up.
“So, answer me carefully.”
He lowered his voice secretively. His unfamiliar tone sent a ripple through her heart.
“What would you do if I killed Ki-seok?”

“Would you still like me then, Lee-yeon?”
Lee-yeon had no idea what he was talking about. She couldn’t understand this sudden
change.
Despite being face to face, she couldn’t see him, and words kept coming out of his
mouth, but it wasn’t the conversation she expected. For the first time in a long time,
she felt a barrier between them as if he were a stranger.
Lee-yeon clenched her hands nervously. On such a good day, she didn’t want him to
see how scared she was.
“Chae-woo, I don’t know what you’re talking about all of a sudden.”
“I asked what you would think if I killed Ki-seok.”
The light voice in which he spoke felt even more foreign to her because of its flat tone.
As expected, she hadn’t misheard him. Lee-yeon’s lips were dry when she replied, “Let
me turn on the light first.”
When she moved to get up and turn on the light, Chase-woo grabbed Lee-yeon’s face
roughly and turned it towards him so she could see his reaction. The tips of their
noses were smushed together.
“Is that your answer?”
“What?”
“I think showing your back to me now means only one thing.”
“No. That’s not it. I just want to be able to see your face.”
“Say it here.”
Seeing Chae-woo suddenly acting so oppressive, Lee-yeon had trouble focusing. When
their eyes met, she could feel he was too dark, too close. It was like being swallowed
up by a huge blob. In her confusion, she suddenly blurted out a thought that had not
crossed her mind before now.
“Are you really Chae-woo?”
For a split second his grip loosened, but he soon recovered himself and tightened his
hold on her. Lee-yeon half forced her eyes to stay fixed on him.
“If I’m not your husband, then who the hell am I?” His empty eyes and tone were
unchanged. “Who was the one who paved the way to turn me into this?”
“But, but why.”
“You smell like cigarettes, like you’ve been in an enclosed space with someone.” He
leaned his head close to her ear and inhaled. “And I’m pretty sure that someone was
Ki-seok.”

“All I did today was obediently wait around for you. No matter how much I think about
it, I don’t think being a pathetic little watchdog really suits me.”
Suddenly, she realized that Chae-woo was scrutinizing her closely, trying to read her
reaction. Despite their proximity, she couldn’t hear the sound of his breathing as his
eyes slowly scanned her face.
The longer she waited to answer, the more it seemed as though this strange
confrontation would never end. However, seeing how unstable Chae-woo looked, Leeyeon decided to set aside her own turbulent emotions for now.
Of course, he’s frustrated and angry.
It’s natural that he would be feeling this way after waking up a month later, seeing
how much time has passed, and realizing that while everything around him changed
little by little, he alone remained the same.
She gently stroked the back of his hand, believing him to be in a state of stagnation.
“Do you remember what I told you before? I only ever want you to see things that
are good and beautiful. I’m someone who saves trees. I can’t help you with that, with
what you want to do.” Lee-yeon glanced at him furtively and continued, “So, if you
want my opinion, I’m against it. Killing him? I, I can’t even fathom doing something
like that. All I’m going to do is continue planting flowers in the front yard no matter
what.”

“And if you’re asking me how I’d feel, I’d mourn Ki-seok’s death for sure, but I’d get
over it quickly. Our relationship was terrible, but I’ve always liked trees more than
people. However-,” she paused momentarily and drew in a breath. “I’m worried about
myself. I feel like I’ll be more hesitant then to touch you or be with you.”
She could feel Chae-woo’s body go stiff at that moment.
“I’m afraid I’ll get scared and my heart will waver when I kiss and hug you.”

“Is that what you want?”
Lee-yeon’s voice trembled as she spoke but she kept her gaze steady. Chae-woo burst
into huffs of laughter and let go of her face. She immediately rubbed the sides of her
hair and shot him a sideways glance.
Chae-woo was already far away, rubbing his face with his hands. When she saw how
frustrated he seemed, her heart sank. He was a straightforward and simple man, but
she suddenly felt troubled and hopeless.
“Chae-woo. First, we should go to the hospital and have you examined-”
“Examined? For what?” he interjected, his voice sharp and defiant. Without realizing
what she was doing, Lee-yeon held out one hand as if to keep a safe distance between
them. She approached him carefully one step at a time as he was a vicious hound.
“You know, you suddenly woke up after being asleep for a month so it’s natural to be
confused. The doctor also asked me to call him as soon as you wake up and it seems
like you’re very sensitive right now. I understand it’s a lot to take in right now.”
“So you think something’s wrong with me?” Chae-woo gazed at her, a smirk stretched
across his face. “My head has never been clearer.”
“Well then, that’s a relief.”
Lee-yeon clasped her hands together hesitantly. Their conversation suddenly at an
end, the two stood there awkwardly for some time.
Chae-woo kept his eyes on her, scanning her body, the tips of her nails, as if he were
deciphering a text written in foreign language. Not knowing how to react to his
blatant staring, Lee-yeon eventually turned toward the bedroom.
“Chae-woo, then. I’ll wash up first.”
Her shirt flowed behind her like she was standing in front of a fan. Lee-yeon looked
back several times as she moved. Something more uncomfortable than dry sweat
made her hair stand on end, but he only nodded showing little other reaction.
Soon after the bathroom door closed, Chae-woo finally let out the breath he’d been
holding in. His face, which had just barely passed him off as the role of her husband,
hardened coldly. The change was instantaneous.
“All this time it’s like I’ve been possessed.”
The scent of her body was his first battle. The slightly sweaty smell was particularly
stimulating, and he nearly licked his lips at the sight of the nape of her neck.
Even more so, when her soft breasts had pressed against his lower abdomen, his head
throbbed. Playing the part of a good husband wasn’t as easy as he thought it would
be.
Just then, the door suddenly swung open and Lee-yeon ran out of the bedroom. The
man quickly shook off the frost that had frozen over his expression as she breathed
heavily, her ears red.
“Chae-woo, are you—!”
There was tension in her urgent tone. Lee-yeon licked her rough lips and hugged her
arms around herself tightly as if trying to control her racing pulse. It had just hit her.
“Have I been a complete idiot?”
At that, Chae-woo squinted warily.
“Your dick, no no, I mean, down there, did you really just want me to do that and I
was just too dense to realize it? Chae-woo, is that what you needed?

“It’s been a while.”

“Will it help you calm down?”
How would the idiot version of Chae-woo have responded to this?
He recalled the report Beom-hee had shown him and carefully considered the way the
two of them had spoken to each other, but he still failed to find an appropriate
response. In the meantime he felt himself harden as if a heavy fist was pushing
against the inside of his pants.
Damn it, I’m going crazy, he thought to himself, chewing on his own swears.
His body reacted too quickly. Chae-woo managed to pass himself off as the loving
husband by staring at her red lips.
“It’s not like that, so hurry up and finish washing up.”
“Then you don’t want to do it today?”
He looked at the ceiling as if something was caught in his throat. “We have a lot to
catch up on.”
They left it at that, and Lee-yeon went back into the bathroom. Chae-woo opened and
closed his trembling eyelids, trying to suppress his temper which threatened to burst
at any moment. Despite his efforts, the desire to conquer, a feeling far from affection,
finally stuck out its head.
“Ha, you must really have a death wish.”
When Lee-yeon finished taking a shower, she emerged from the bathroom to an empty
bed. She rushed into the living room and kitchen in search of him, but all she got was
the sound of her own footsteps. He was nowhere to be found.
“Chae-woo?” Lee-yeon leap up the stairs two at a time.

Kwon Chae-woo’s hair was wet as he stood tall, looking as though he too had just
finished taking a shower. As soon as their eyes met, he walked over to her dressed in
nothing but a pair of loose-fitting pajama pants.
His strong, broad shoulders, rock hard abs, and sleek waist
“Are you done staring?”
“Ahm.”
He grabbed Lee-yeon’s chin, taking her so much by surprise that she accidentally bit
her tongue. But when the gentle light from the nightlight shone upon his face, she
couldn’t even feel the pain.
As the dark shadows receded, they slowly revealed, one after the other, his ears, nose,
lips, and his two piercing eyes. When at last she was left face to face with those soft
hazel irises, she felt dazed.
Lee-yeon studied the details of his face. Chae-woo furrowed his brow slightly at her
blatant staring.
“Is there still something more to see?”
“All that time you were asleep, I missed seeing these eyes.”

“Just watching you blink is nice.”
“Then, do you not want to use your mouth?”
He rubbed the tip of his thumb over Lee-yeon’s lower lip, slightly grazing her teeth.
Chae-woo’s eyes grew misty every time he saw her shoulders start to shake from the
slightest stimulation.
“If I put it in your mouth”
His pants slipped down, revealing all at once his hardened member, slightly purple
and red in color. Just looking at it made her face hot, and her eyes burn. He patted his
dick with his palm.
“It’ll be disgusting and make you want to gag.”
“Is it that bad?”
“You’ve never done it before?”
“No, I haven’t”
She lowered her eyes gently.
“I can’t tell whether you’re timid or not.”
Chae-woo swallowed his laughter when he saw the innocent look on her face. Even if
he forgot everything else, there was no doubting how he felt when spread her legs and
drove himself into her. What had they been doing this whole time if she’s never blown
him before? What exactly is so precious? What makes her mouth more special than
others?
“It’s okay. We have plenty of time.”
Chae-woo smiled, a strange look on his face. But he found his past self was both
amusing and unpleasant. His mouth watered with the urge to ridicule himself for
acting so foolishly.
He pushed hard against her chest.

Lee-yeon fell onto the bed, embarrassed by his roughness. Then, her body stiffened
when he roughly shoved three fingers into her mouth.
“If you’re going to do it, you have to open up wide.”
“Ugh!”
“If you’re already shocked by this, it’s no fun.”
She was infatuated with glittering lust. His thick hands rubbed the moist inside other
mouth as if tickling it and pressed hard against her soft tongue. At the same time, he
shoved another finger in.
Chae-woo held Lee-yeon’s chin and continued swirling his fingers around in her
mouth. He stroked the soft inner flesh of her mouth, thinking of how it felt to be inside
her, and gently stroked her molars and the roots of her gums searching for sensitive
areas.
“Ah, hhhh.”
At first she was dumbfounded and bewildered, but slowly she felt her body begin to
awaken. Her drool was rolling chillingly down her neck. Then he pulled his hand out,
grabbed her by the back of her head and pressed against her.
“Ugh!”
He shoved himself into her, scratching the roof of her mouth, and filling it with a fiery,
hot sensation. He reached all the way to the back of her throat, suffocating Lee-yeon
with a pressure that was entirely different from the four fingers.
“Tighten your lips. And don’t use your teeth.”
“Huh”
“You have to keep your mouth tight and suck, not just drool all over it.”
The inside of her mouth swelled like it might explode and with every breath she
inhaled an unfamiliar, musty scent. Lee-yeon held Chae-woo’s thighs tightly, scared by
her lips stretched so tightly around him. His leg muscles stiffened, and he clenched
his abs.
“Ha” A short, feverish moan escaped his lips as he pressed against Lee-yeon’s head.
“Swallow deeply.”
“Ugh, uh”
There was a considerable difference in their eye levels, and yet they did not take their
eyes off each other. Lee-yeon’s eyes shook, but she trusted him and obeyed as he
instructed her, his expression filled with suppressed excitement.
“Don’t try to take it out. Open your mouth wider.”
She felt her tongue rub against his bulging shaft. Sliding against the inside of her
cheek, brushing against the roof of her mouth, at last she felt the tip of his penis hit
the back of her throat and slide deeper and deeper.
Every time the sheer length and thickness of him pumped in and out of her mouth, a
strong, musty scent surrounded her, making her feel dizzy. Despite this, Lee-yeon
instinctively sucked in her cheeks and moved her face back and forth.
At first, his balls had only slightly rubbed against her chin, but now they started to
smack strongly against her face.
“Ugh, ugh, ugh.”
Lee-yeon opened her mouth wide trying to suppress her gag reflex.
“Lee-yeon, I have a lot on my mind lately.”
His biting voice was interlaced with sweet breath.
“What should I do, hh” Chae-woo covered Lee-yeon’s ears and started pumping his
hips faster. His burning groin smashed hard against her face and lips. “How can I
repay you for all that time?”
“Ugh, ooh”
“I really want to pay you back.”
Lee-yeon was just fighting to keep her mouth open. Tears welled in her eyes, and she
was struggling to breathe. Her ears buzzed from being covered by his hands, but his
gaze looking down at her was clear.
“I know it’s important for people to know kindness.”
But as Lee-yeon was struggling to open her throat and still struggling to breathe, all
she could do was focus on trying not to bite down on his penis. Then he thrust into her
mouth again as though trying to pierce right through her.
“I’m not some kind of bloodhound that attacks out of nowhere.”
Chae-woo burst into laughter for the first time since having woken from his deep
slumber. His normally ferocious-looking eyes were twisted in intense pleasure.
“Hugh, ugh.”
As the tip rubbed mercilessly against the roof of Lee-yeon’s mouth, he got
goosebumps and moaned. Lee-yeon involuntarily clenched her jaw, lightly scratching
her teeth against him. He thrust himself faster in and out of her mouth. Chae-woo
breathed hard and licked his lower lip roughly.
“Oh Shit”
His abs clenched and tightened.
“It’s not that I don’t understand this life at all.”
“Ugh, ugh.”
“Actually, your face often pops up in my mind.”

“Because I want to see you.”
When she suddenly lifted her tongue which had been pressed down the entire time,
and rubbed it against him, she felt something hot shoot into the inside of her mouth.
Lee-yeon couldn’t stand the overwhelming scent of semen and pushed against him.
However, Chae-woo stood his ground, stubbornly shooting his seed into her mouth. He
had no intention of removing himself from her choking mouth.
“Ugh, ugh!”
Lee-yeon twisted her face and patted his stomach softly. Only then did he pull himself
out and rub a line of semen along her cheek with his tip. Lee-yeon immediately
coughed up the opaque liquid onto the floor.
“Cough! Cough!
Her throat tingled as she fought the urge to vomit. She slowly poked her tongue
around the inside of her ravaged mouth, trying to ignore the metallic smell of blood.
But as he helped her up, Chae-woo’s eyes were still gentle and kind.
“Was it awful?”
“That”
“Did you cry?”
For reasons even Chae-woo didn’t know, he found himself frowning. He shuddered
roughly and suddenly felt foul.
“I told you it would be disgusting,” he said dully, lightly touching her red eyes. “This is
why you should always be careful what you use your mouth for.”

“Gasp!”
Lee-yeon woke suddenly from a terrible nightmare and jumped from position in the
bed. As she slowly blinked her eyes, still half asleep, she noticed the empty space
beside her. It was the second time her throat felt swollen and sore. Lee-yeon ran out,
not bothering to glance behind her, her hair disheveled.
She hadn’t planned on falling asleep! When had she drifted off?
‘Where is him?’
Her head filled with awful thoughts, making her more and more frantic.
“Are you up?”
Just then, the voice she’d been hoping to hear came from the kitchen. The savory
smell of something sizzling in the frying pan pulled her in slowly. Lee-yeon halted
when she saw Chae-woo who was skillfully flipping fried eggs and sausages.
“Did you sleep well?”
 She felt as if she were still wandering in a dream.
“Good morning, Miss Lee-yeon.”
As their eyes met, he smiled familiarly and Lee-yeon seemed to melt slowly at the
smell of the food and the sight of the eggshells piled up.
She wanted so badly to believe that she’d finally gotten her life back.

“What are you doing spacing out over there? Aren’t
you going to come give me a hug?” Lee-yeon said,
her voice full of laughter, as she wrapped her arms
around his waist from behind.
“Chae-woo, what happened yesterday? Did you sleep beside me?”
“I slept properly and then I got up.”
Lee-yeon felt she had to get a glimpse of his expression somehow, so she pushed her
face under his arm. Surprised by her assertive attitude, he lifted the frying pan high.
“Lee-yeon, you’ll get hit by the oil,” he scolded her somewhat harshly as tried to shield
her face with his hands, but her eyes were bright.
“Are you sure you really slept? Am I helpful again?”
“I woke up without any trouble and I didn’t have any nightmares.”
“Really? You’re not lying, right?”
“I’m not lying.”
Her eyes gleamed with joy. Chae-woo stared at her as she smiled lightly with her
blistered lips, then turned his head.
“My nightmares must have moved on to someone else.”
“Moved on?” she asked in reply, but Chae-woo only smiled cryptically.
“Come, sit down.”
Lee-yeon glanced at him, feeling an odd sense of regret in the pit of her stomach as
she trudged over to the table. When he heard the chair scrape against the floor, the
smile he had been trying to maintain immediately fell and he bit the inside of his lip.
He could sleep last a night, even a week, without sleep. He had trained for this, so it
felt as routine as eating breakfast.
Last night, Lee-yeon had fallen asleep as soon as she’d hit the bed, completely
forgetting her intention to stay up all night together. Every once in a while, she would
murmur his name in her sleep, and he would instinctively scrunch up his face, his
stomach twisting in knots.
He stared at her face—the same face that he had always been cherished like a
breathtaking view before
The silly girl who had always cried underneath the shade of a tree. She’d rais her
knees and bury her face in her arms thinking that no one was watching her.
However, when she heard the sound of the cello floating on the wind, she’d raise her
head to look at the ground around her and the sky above her, placing her hands by her
waist and tilting her head at the sweet melody. The way she looked when she was
crying, laughing, napping, or humming along as he played, was so much more vibrant
and fuller of life than that gloomy person she’d been when they first met.
When he was unable to go to elementary school, watching Lee-yeon under the hill
through his shabby window had been Chae-woo’s only hobby. With a mother who hid
herself in those remote mountains and refused to interact with others, the world of
that 13-year-old was helplessly small.
And so, this mystery girl became the boy’s first audience, in another world, in four
seasons.
When the world was green with new life, when the autumn leaves changed color,
when the snow piled up on the branches, and when pink buds popped out again, she
was always there.
“Mom, what is something that always stays in the same place?”
“Hmm, a tree?”
“Something much smaller and prettier than a tree.”
“Aha, it must be a flower.”
Everyday, Chae-woo wiped the window and waited for her. As he gazed at her, his
small palm on the window, his warm breath fogged up the glass. The old, rattling
window frame was like a picture frame holding the tree and the girl prisoner-
“—woo, Chae-woo!”
That picture was all he had.
“Chae-woo, are you okay?” He was brought back to the present by Lee-yeon’s worried
voice.
He grabbed her arm and raised his head sharply as she shook him roughly. Sure
enough, Lee-yeon was looking at him anxiously. Without realizing what he was doing,
Chae-woo moved to smooth back her hair, but paused, clenched his fist and withdrew
his hand.
“It’s nothing, I was just thinking about something.”
“What were you thinking about?”
“Just, about when we first met.”

Startled, Lee-yeon awkwardly averted her eyes.
Liar.
Chae-woo reminded himself of what she is.
He shook off his meaningless feelings, still feeling a bit drowsy. He plated the food
and casually approached the table. It was the first time in a long time they’d spent the
morning together. Taking a fork from Chae-woo, Lee-yeon took a bite of the sausage.
“by the way, are your fingers hurting you?” She asked him as he ate.
“No, why?”
“Uhh-”
He was calmly eating, his mouth open, but something was different. Lee-yeon looked
at his hands and paused.
“-it’s the first time I’ve seen you use chopsticks with your left hand.”
At this, Chae-woo hesitated slightly before calmly reaching for a piece of the vegetable
stir-fry.
“You didn’t know?”
“What?”
“It’s not uncomfortable, so I must have always been ambidextrous.”
“Oh, that.”
Chae-woo clenched his jaw and glanced sideways at her as he chewed. The sharp look
put Lee-yeon on edge.
“I always saw you use your right hand.”
“Is that so?”
Lee-yeon nodded her head lamely and put down her fork. She sat there, just twiddling
her thumbs and forgetting to eat, when Chae-woo suddenly stole her sausage.
He took a sip of water as he stared at Lee-yeon who had picked up her fork again in
the confusion of the moment. As he gulped the water down, she looked at him and
their eyes met. In that moment, Chae-woo suddenly felt parched and ended up
finishing off the whole cup.

“Sigh”
Lee-yeon swept the back of her hand across her forehead as she pounded the soil with
a seedling shovel. She was crouching down on her knees and tending the flower beds
she’d left unattended for the past month.
Just a few hours ago, Choo-ja and Dong-mi had stopped by the house after hearing
that Chae-woo had woken up. The doctor also came by to check on Chae-woo. The
visit had gone smoothly, the two women left, and now it was just the doctor and Chaewoo having a private talk inside. They were occasionally exchanging glances here and
there.
“No–! isn’t”
Just in time, the doctor’s gestures grew larger.
Lee-yeon stretched out her head out the window of the molding door to try and get a
closer look at the two people’s lips as they spoke to each other.
‘If can!’
She nervously looked back and forth between the doctor who was speaking with his
voice raised and Chae-woo who sat with his arms crossed.
Just then, the man turned his head sharply in her direction like a ghost and jerked the
curtains shut.
“Ah!” Without noticing, Lee-yon let out a sigh. She was holding her small garden
shovel so hard her hands hurt. Lee-yeon mechanically pulled weeds as her mouth
watered hungrily.
Someone peeked out from behind the gate. Seeing who it was, she smiled and stood
up straight.
“Gyu-baek, what are you doing here?”
He ran to her, looking around frantically, buried his face in his hands and stamped his
feet anxiously. Lee-yeon’s expression stiffened at his unusual behavior.
“Gyu-baek, what’s wrong?”
“Uhhhh.”
Gyu-baek pulled Lee-yeon’s sleeve, groaning painfully.
“Director. Director.”
“Gyu-baek, are you feeling sick?”
“Male spiders feed their legs to females when they mate.”
“What?”
Lee-yeon frowned at his creepy comment, but Gyu-baek was expressionless as he
spoke. However, there was an urgency in his tone which was usually quite
monotonous. Lee-yeon tilted her head curiously.
“Don’t eat his legs.”
“Gyu-baek, what are you talking about?”
“It’s a strategy to appease the female. No matter how delicious it looks, you should
never eat it, even if you feel like you have to. From now on, don’t accept anything he
gives you. Promise me. Quickly, promise me!”
Gyu-baek stuck out his pinky and was waving it at her, when–
“What are you doing, Lee-yeon?”
Chae-woo opened the front door and strolled out. Gyu-baek’s shoulders tensed at the
sight of him and he quickly hid behind Lee-yeon. Concerned by his fearful reaction,
she lowered her voice to a whisper so only Gyu-baek could hear.
“Gyu-baek, Chae-woo is fine now. Don’t you want to go play with him?”
“No, no.”
“What? Why not?”
“Director. Director, it’s really bad Ugh!” Gyu-baek pinched his lips and groaned in
nervousness. Lee-yeon had become very serious and was trying to calm him down, but
Chae-woo had already reached them.
Gyu-baek put his hands over his ears and started reciting the encyclopedia.
“The jucunda is a rare beetle that appears in the middle of summer. During the day,
they stick their heads into flowers and drink the nectar. They also nibble on petals and
pistils. They are often found in wild roses and honeysuckles as well as in flowers on
fruit trees.”
“Chae-woo” Lee-yeon looked at him strongly, gesturing to him to go wait inside. At
this, Chae-woo tucked his chin in a slight nod as he stared at her change in attitude.
Her voice was authoritative—her stance protective over the child.


Lee-yeon suddenly became stubbornly insistent and stared at this man who had no
intention of moving. They stood there locked in a battle of stubborn endurance when
Lee-yeon’s cell phone started to ring. She answered the phone, her eyes still on Chaewoo, and he snorted, “Ha.”
Director! I’m so sorry to bother you, but are you busy now?
Dong-mi’s voice rang out valiantly as though she had just discovered a newfound hope
despite being exhausted.
“I’m at home. Is something wrong?”
I could really use your help right now. Could you come over here?
“What?”
Well, It’s about the national monument gingko tree with the snake living in it!”
Lee-yeon’s eyes, still glued to Chae-woo, grew wide. Meanwhile, he was laughing
insidiously.
“You shouldn’t don’t get too close!”
“Don’t worry, I’m just going to check its condition.”
Dong-mi tried to grab hold of her, but her hands swiped at empty air as Lee-yeon
moved fearlessly towards the tree.
A 15-meter-tall artificial mountain on Hwaido sheltered the tree.
As soon as Lee-yeon answered the phone, she went to where the gingko tree was,
Chae-woo following behind her as always. The rescue team was already there
surrounding the tree with full equipment.
This was the second largest gingko tree in Korea. Many gingko trees were in danger
of being submerged under water due to the construction of dams in the past, and the
only reason this many trees have survived until now is that they have been designated
as natural monuments.
In order to save this particular monument, this artificial mountain was constructed
over several years and the tree was able to settle safely in its new home. What would
have happened if no one had realized the value of this tree at the time?
“Lee-yeon, be careful.”
At that moment, Chae-woo, who was a few steps behind, grabbed Lee-yeon around the
stomach with one arm.

Ssss, ssss!
The snake, the size of a grown man’s forearm, bared its venomous teeth and opened
its mouth wide. It’s long upright body, its thin slit-like pupils. When she looked into its
eerie eyes, she felt a shiver down her spine.
However, feeling the warmth of Chae-woo’s arm around her, she quickly regained her
composure.
“Th-thanks.”
Chae-woo patted her upper stomach before pulling his hand away smoothly, leaving a
cold feeling where his hand had been.
This brief, gentle touch rattled Lee-yeon even more than the violently passionate
embraces of the previous night. The scent of him lingered at the tip of her nose. She
tried to control the intense beating of her heart as she said, “More than half of the
trunk has eroded. Since the inside is hollow, I guess a snake made its home there.”
“Is that harmful to the tree?”
“It’s hard to say.”
Dong-mi raised her thick, smooth eyebrows in response to the odd reply.
“What does that mean?”
“Since no one really comes to this area anyway, do you think it’s all that necessary to
catch it? In my opinion, I don’t think there’s anything to worry about.”
“Even though there’s a snake inside the tree?”
“It seems to be accommodating the snake in its own way.” Lee-yeon said.
There were countless cavities that had rotted and eroded, so it didn’t seem like it
sucked out one’s life force like the Sacred Tree. The gingko tree was just empty
inside.
Nature adapting to its circumstances was just the result of years of endurance.
Fortunately, there seemed to be no issues with its growth.
Sometimes people from the Cultural Heritage Administration would walk over to
check up on it, but that was only once or twice a year.
It was an artificial mountain with no caretaker and no visitors. Lee-yeon felt suddenly
overcome with loneliness as she looked around at the desolate scenery. Her eyes
ultimately landed on Chae-woo.
“Without the snake, this tree will be alone again.”
She gazed into the boundless depth of his eyes.
“And I think this tree is well aware of that.”

All that was left was the foot of the mountain which had fallen into ruin.
Lee-yeon was completing her third round of examinations when she distorted her face
and let out a heavy-sounding murmur.
“Ah”
More than 200 pine trees had been uprooted, clearly displaying the extent of the
accident. The wreckage of the aircraft was scattered all over the place, as smoke
soared up from the flames.
About 10 days ago, an AirChina Boeing 762-7 crashed into the foot of the mountain in
Gimhae while trying to land. A tragic accident in which at least a hundred people were
killed. As she stared at the screen, Lee-yeon subconsciously bit her lower lip.
“Choo-ja, you said this happened recently?”
“It’s been all over the news for the last few days, but you’ve been dealing with other
things, so you probably didn’t see it.”
Just as they were wrapping up their conversation, she heard a voice from the living
room, saying, “Yes, I’m Kwon Chae-woo” and turned her head reflexively. But the
photos she’d seen on the screen were so terrible, her attention was only turned for a
moment and she turned her eyes back to the monitor.
Just below the peak of the mountain, the aircraft crash site looked as though a
bombed had dropped. The aircraft had broken into three pieces, leaving only the
cockpit and fuselage recognizable, the rest scattered around in bits of debris. The
huge wreckage lay scattered around the top of the mountain, many of the large old
trees horribly mangled.
Under the circumstances, thirty survivors.
According to analysts of the accident, much of the impact from the crash was
absorbed by the over ten meters of dense pine forests, which helped increase the
number of survivors.
It was almost as if the pine trees of the mountain sacrificed themselves to save the
lives of the survivors. Now, all that was left–
“It’s the trees’ turn.”
Lee-yeon tapped the desk, a crease of determination forming between her eyebrows.
Since it is often used for major accidents, this screening was a task commonly given to
all tree doctors participating in the Dome project. Among them, Gamumbi Tree
Hospital and Solgae Tree Hospital, selected as the leading hospitals, were in charge of
managing the trees of the bereaved families.
Their job was to protect and prepare the leftover parts of the damaged trees for new
growth.
She shot a troubled look at Chae-woo who had just returned after making a call.
“Chae-woo, what should I do?”
“About what?”
“I might have to leave you at home for a few days. I think I’ll need to stay around here
for a while to work.”

Lee-yeon’s expression relaxed, but Chae-woo observed her quietly.
“It should only take three days and two nights, but Gimhae isn’t far from here, so I can
still visit while I’m gone.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes were full of worry. The screening had been scheduled less than a day
after Chae-woo woke up.
But she couldn’t just leave him alone when he needed her to help wake him from his
nightmares. Lee-yeon sighed, glancing back and forth between the mangled trees on
the monitor and the sleekly handsome image of Chae-woo. Both issues were so serious
it might not even be enough if she had two bodies.
“It’s okay. I’ll just sleep in your room with you.”
“What?” She was flabbergasted.
“You don’t want me to come?”

He narrowed his brows at Lee-yeon’s hesitancy. His voice was the same as before, his
pupils still hollow with memory loss, and yet she still felt a strange and unfamiliar
power from him.
“Is your husband not allowed to stay in the same room as you?”

“Could it be, you’re hiding something under your blanket?” His look was sharp as if he
could lift Lee-yeon with the slightest glance. She clenched her fists.
“It’s not that—”
“Director So–!”
Just then, Choo-ja, who had been scrolling through the photos on the monitor, opened
her eyes wide and called out.
“It looks like the animal rescue center is coming, too.”
“What are you talking about?” Lee-yeon turned to look at the official notice.
It was exactly as Choo-ja had said.
It seemed that for this screening the employees of the Wildlife Rescue Center who are
dispatched to search and rescue injured animals, would be evaluating the tree
doctors.
The criteria for this round of screening included such items as behavior, sincerity,
accuracy, cooperation, communication, and leadership. Points in each category were
tallied and candidates with the highest points were selected.
“Are you going to the mountain, too, Chae-woo?”
“Yeah, I just received the call.”
Lee-yeon stared at him blankly as the corners of his mouth raised in a satisfied grin
and he gently waved his cell phone in the air.
She was confused by this unexpected turn of events, yet Chae-woo seemed unfazed.
To put it nicely, his reaction was calm and collected, but in reality, it came off as rude
and unaffected.
“You say you received the call. You mean to say, you’re the one who’s going to
evaluate me?”
Lee-yeon shot him a peculiar glance to which Chae-woo simply shrugged his
shoulders.
“I can’t speak for anyone else, but just between you and me, it wouldn’t be hard for
you to earn my favor.”
“What’ that supposed to–”
“Just keep doing what you have been doing. That’s what you do best.”
His meaning was decidedly vague, but Lee-yeon simply nodded her head softly,
choosing to focus on treating the trees.
Either way, based on her previous experience with mountain landslides, there
probably wouldn’t even be any trees left to salvage. The main problem would be the
disposal and recovery of the debris. In terms of that kind of manual labor, the level of
completion was dependent on each individual’s own sense of duty and responsibility.
Therefore, the final score, rather than just a simple number, was actually a reflection
of the candidate’s work ethic.
“In that case, I should just focus on working hard and not worry so much about how
other people see me.”
“Well, don’t ruin your health just for work.”
Choo-ja clicked her tongue.
“Think about it this way. Imagine you’re focusing and working hard on your own. On
the other hand, someone else sees everyone working hard and passes around coffee.
From the perspective of the workers who are hot and tired, which of you would seem
to have better behavior, cooperation, and communication skills?”
Lee-yeon scratched her head at Choo-ja’s comment.
“Wouldn’t I stand out too much if I just kept walking around like that?”
“In the middle of a crash site filled with the black and burning debris of a demolished
plane? Don’t be so naive!”
“Even so, if I want to be real, I need to stick to the fundamentals rather than trying to
play a game of wits.”
“That’s right. You have to be faithful to the nearest thing!”
Suddenly, Choo-ja squinted her eyes and clapped her hands. Lee-yeon lowered her
chin cautiously.
“What are you planning to do with him anyways? Don’t you know once you sleep with
someone—”
“Choo-ja!”
Lee-yeon’s cheeks flushed and her breathing became heavy. Then she heard a faint
giggling sound. Lee-yeon futilely turned her gaze towards the desk, but Choo-ja could
still sense the change in her.
“Chae-woo, can’t you just give your poor little wife a good score?”
“But you know I can’t show favoritism towards my family.” He glanced at her
meaningfully.
“No, no, what are you all talking about!” As she said this, Lee-yeon jumped to her feet
and glared at the two of them warningly.
“You have to grade fairly based on each candidate’s skills. I don’t want any special
favor! Reputation and image are important to me, too. I don’t want rumors going
around that I’ve been cheating my way up, especially when it comes to trees.”
“Oh my, you’re one to talk about reputation being important.” Choo-ja picked her ear
and snorted. Nevertheless, Lee-yeon sighed, imagining the worst.
“If you’re accused of cheating, it’s game over,” Chae-woo said, watching her face
darken foolishly.
“I heard they upgraded the air conditioner in the center with the latest model.”

He opened his mouth and laughed as if he was enjoying watching Lee-yeon whose
expression had hardened.
“I know for sure that it wasn’t sent by Spruce Tree Hospital.”
“Yeah”
“The board itself is already tainted, so who could you turn to for a favor?”
Lee-yeon could do nothing but frown awkwardly.
“If you’re really uncomfortable, just forget about the corruption and act.”

He touched the desk and lowered himself to eye level with Lee-yeon. His eyes gazing
deeply into hers suddenly glowed in the sun. They looked faintly red, reminding Lee-
yeon of a wooden gift she once received.
“I already have enough going on in my head, don’t you agree, Lee-yeon?”

“Pretend not to know?” Chae-woo laughed snidely as he lifted the blanket.
“I didn’t know I would have to deny all the cheating.”
Before he knew it, it was time for bed. Lee-yeon was lying flat on her back, hounding
on to the edge of the blanket. She had just told him about the request she’d been
thinking about ever since receiving the official letter and his expression had fallen as
soon as he heard it.
“So, you want to pretend we don’t know each other during the day and have me sneak
in at night?”
Chae-woo climbed into bed, shaking his head lightly as if he’d just heard a joke that
wasn’t very funny. He pushed to make room for himself on the mattress. Lee-yeon’s
fingers tightened around the edge of the blanket which she was gripping like it was a
bulletproof vest.
“Lee-yeon, is that the kind of man you want me to be?”
“No, I think you’re misunder–”
“If that’s what you want, I’ll do it, but are you sure?”
“What?”
“Last time, you cried because you could only blow me once.”

“Think carefully.”
Chae-woo touched her soft lips and waited, though she couldn’t tell if he was trying to
appease her or threaten her. However, the more careful they were, the less chance of
making a scene in the field.
“Still, wouldn’t it be better to be safe?”
“Are you planning to really compete honestly even though the other hospitals have
already dominated the situation?” He looked down at her, a hand cupping her face.
“It’s obvious that these political loopholes were made intentionally, which means that
eyesore of a hospital is going to lose. Unfortunately, this is the end for you.”

“You should consider the possibility that the candidates who will pass this round of
screening have already been decided. You’ll be the only one sincerely trying her best.”
He spat out his words, his eyes dry. Lee-yeon felt herself flinch but refused to believe
his words.
“But still, I’ll never know if I don’t try.”
“I’m just saying, I’ve never seen officials that weren’t corrupt.”
At this, Lee-yeon’s breath hitched.
“when would you have seen that?” She asked carefully, pulling the blanket up under
her eyes. Chae-woo noticed her shaking pupils and slowly altered his expression. As
his cold, heartless facade unraveled like a lie, he rubbed his nose against her hair.
These kinds of small tender touches were something he used to do often, so Lee-yeon
easily let it go.
“When I was working.”

“What? Because I was comatose, now you can’t believe me?”
“Ye-es, a little.” Lee-yeon nodded shamelessly as if playing around. Chae-woo covered
her twinkling eyes with his hand and decided to call it an early night.
“You should get some sleep.”
“You, too. See you tomorrow morning, for sure.” Lee-yeon closed her eyelids and
hugged his forearm as hard as she could.
Chae-woo patted her back and waited for the woman in his arms to fall asleep. This
familiar touch, this steady beat, the sounds of the crickets chirping as she slept
silently. He stared out of the dark window until her breathing became even like a
baby’s.
There was no sign of sleep in his eyes.
Since the age of 13, when he had to go back to his real home, Chae-woo had never
slept with anyone with their skin touching like this. Looking at Lee-yeon sleeping
soundly, his body went wild, his heart racing as he felt himself harden. Fighting the
urge to shove her from his arms, he clenched and unclenched his fist.
Whenever his body reacted against his will like this, he felt defeated. It was a part of
him that still surrendered to the fake Chae-woo who was sinking to the bottom of the
abyss.
“Did this sucker do anything other than just eat and fuck?”
Pretending to be loving as if he’d oiled his tongue sometimes made him sick. It’s not
like he was some quivering puppy just following her panting, “Lee-yeon, Lee-yeon.”
And yet, patting her head in praise, hugging each other tightly, and making long and
dark eye contact were all so familiar as if they were habits.
It was a poor imitation of walking along an already well-polished road. But it was also
unwelcomed, so it always turned his mood sour.
“Hmm, Chae-woo.”
He scratched his ear and frowned at the sound of his name.
Don’t tell me she’s really muttering my name in her sleep.
“Fuck.”
Chae-woo clenched his jaw and temperamentally pulled his arm away from her.
It’s just a week at the most. He would escape Hwaido before the week was up.
“I never really realized it, but you’re so fast with your hands!”
Lee-yeon frowned at the voice of Director Park of Solgae Tree Hospital, who was
grumbling behind her back.
It was the first time in a long time since she’d been outside of Hwaido. They were on a
tour bus that would take them one-way over the bridge to Gimhae. Lee-yeon had just
gotten on and was making her way down the narrow aisle of the bus. If it wasn’t for
Director Park, who had been rambling on for a while now, the start of the business
trip would have been much more relaxing.
“As expected, young people are scary, so scary.”
Lee-yeon remained silent despite the provocation.
“Director So, exactly what game are you playing here?”
He poked Lee-yeon in the back and she looked back in amazement. Director Park,
dressed in luxury brands from head to toe, took a big sip from his brand-name coffee.
He was just your average middle-aged man, except that even the sunglasses sitting on
his nose had a big logo embedded near the hinge.
Lee-yeon stared at her face in the reflection of his black lenses and said flatly, “Don’t
poke me in the back.”
“Oh, come on, let me in on it. What exactly did you do to make the animal center
workers come running to Spruce Hospital? You and I both know that Spruce doesn’t
have that many customers. I’m the one who’s been supplying these people with their
coffee, so what did you do?”

‘People here value new recruits too much.’
“Is there anything better than air conditioning in this heat?”
Lee-yeon threw herself into a seat by the window.
She was already at a loss. The rescue center had accepted dozens of cups of coffee
from Director Park, but at same time came and greeted her.
Aside from this, she was dreading how things would go this day— Chae-woo being one
of the judge. She was purposely sitting far from where he would be sitting but it was
useless.
“Hey, talk to me. I may not be as young as you, but I can still feel when something’s
up,” Director Park asked from the seat behind her, sticking his neck out long.
“There’s nothing going on, Director Park.”
“Oh wow, stop avoiding the question. And don’t feign ignorance either–!”
She really didn’t want to say anything. She wasn’t trying to avoid his questions, but
how could she tell him that the man she was living with would reluctantly sit far away
from her.
Lee-yeon cleared her throat and looked out of the window, disregarding the director.
And her eyes were immediately drawn to someone wearing a thin zip-up jacket. He
was almost a head taller than all the other animal center rescue workers wearing the
same jacket. With straight broad shoulders and jet-black hair, he stood out easily from
the crowd.
Chae-woo was talking to Dong-mi, nodding his head briefly with an indifferent
expression on his face or furrowing his brow.
“There’s a saying that if you get into a fight with a family member, you’ll have bad
luck, but I don’t believe it.”
‘One, two, three, four.’ Lee-yeon ignored what was being said to her and began doing
a headcount of the center workers.
In the midsummer weather, the scorching sun shone fiercely with no shadows for
relief. The sun shone brightly on Chae-woo’s pale face, drawing many people’s
attention.
Unlike other people whose faces shined with sweat, his face was like a well-ironed
button-down shirt. This man without a single drop of sweat was the most alien of the
group. She brushed her tongue along the inside of her cheek bitterly and tried to
contain her creeping anxiety.
“Director, are you listening to me? Why are the staff only greeting you?”
As the staff all filed onto the bus, it quickly became noisy.
Her eyes met Chae-woo’s as he walked in between the seats, his neck bent low. Leeyeon’s heart fluttered when he pulled off his jacket like a young athlete.
She replied to Director Park as though possessed, “I know someone here.”
“Really? Who is it? A team leader? Or the head of the center?”
But Chae-woo passed by her without any sign of acknowledgement.
Even though they had agreed to pretend not to know each other before leaving the
house, her head still went blank as if she’d taken an unexpected blow. She couldn’t
believe she was so shaken up by his behavior, when he was the one whose embrace
she fell asleep and woke up in. It was actually kind of funny.
“Who is your connection?”
Director Park urged Lee-yeon on by poking her shoulder and, staring at Chae-woo’s
arms and the top of his head poking out over the seat, she said, “I-I don’t know.”
“What? What kind of answer is that?”
For the entire duration of the bus ride to the mountain, Chae-woo didn’t look back at
Lee-yeon once.
“Choo-ja, hand me that!”
Lee-yeon moved around restlessly. The acrid smell lingered on the tip of her nose like
a faint memory of the accident.
The body of the plane falling through the sky, the green trees as swept through the
broken cabin, the people falling upon the pines. That section of the forest had been
completely razed by the impact of the plane, leaving nothing but a glaring patch of red
ochre in its wake.
“Choo-ja, apply a coating to this cut here, and I’ll make a hole here!”
“Director So.
“How should we handle this?”
As Choo-ja swallowed with a sigh, Lee-yeon focused determinedly on the task at hand.
By either treating or cutting off the trunks of the trees, she was able to clearly
distinguish which trees could be salvaged and which could not.
In doing so, Lee-yeon was slowly able to prepare the damaged part of the forest for
the young bereaved trees to grow.
“But why isn’t your husband here?” Choo-ja asked as she stretched her back, her
bones cracking as she did so.
The center staff stationed around the forest had two jobs. One was to find and rescue
injured animals. The other was to closely observe and evaluate Lee-yeon’s
performance. But Chae-woo was nowhere to be seen.
“He must also be hard at work.”
“Director So. Have you noticed anything strange about your husband these days?”
“What?”
“Well, what I mean is” As Choo-ja thought about how to word her question, she eyed
Lee-yeon questioningly.
“Do you feel like sometimes the conversation feels forced or he doesn’t express his
affection as much, or maybe he feels a bit cold or distant.”
“Uh”
“When was the last time you kissed?”
Lee-yeon stopped to think, which made Choo-ja pound her chest in frustration.
“Look here! I’m 60 years old and I did it yesterday! Do you really need to think that
hard?”
“Hold on, hold on, where did you–”
“Is that what’s important right now? Your husband might already be feeling the sevenyear itch!”
“seven-year itch?” Lee-yeon wrapped her mouth around the unfamiliar term.
“These days he doesn’t seem like that man who used to follow you around like a puppy
dog. These days he’s become far too handsome and reliable. Doesn’t it seem like he’s
become a bit apathetic? It has to be the seven-year itch.”
Even with gloves on, her hands and shoes were already dirty. While clearing out the
black, slippery jet fuel, all kinds of dust, blood and ash, Lee-yeon had even managed to
get her face dirty.
Lee-yeon smiled awkwardly at Choo-ja who flared her nostrils.
“The seven-year itch, does it usually come unexpectedly?”
“It can happen if you get bored. It comes and goes for me, too.”
“how did you handle it?”
“I’m just waiting it out.”
“What?”
“I told you, I’m old.”

“Either way it’ll be over once one of us dies.”
Choo-ja looked up at the sky as Lee-yeon’s expression darkened.
“He might be tired of me?”
Her heart began to beat unsteadily.

Meanwhile, Chase-woo had been searching the mountain, when he caught sight of
Lee-yeon struggling with her arms wrapped around a tree that had snapped in two. As
she walked around looking exhausted, she stood out from the others as if she alone
was wearing another color.
Just then, Dong-mi, standing a bit ahead of Lee-yeon, strongly declared, “Director So,
you’ll always be number one in my book.”
As the other team members noticed Chae-woo, they too began to speak up one by one.
Chae-woo showed no reaction as he quietly followed Lee-yeon with his eyes. Seeing
his serious expression, Dong-mi smiled and started making fun.
“Don’t you feel the urge to jump in and help?”

Chae-woo just raised his eyebrows as Dong-mi smiled and muttered to herself, “The
director looks more beautiful when she’s working with the trees.”
“She’s always been like that.”
Joo Dong-mi shot him a look when she heard the indifferent tone of his voice. For a
moment, she was taken aback by his hardened expression, his heartless grimace so
contrary to what he had just said.
“She’s the most beautiful when she’s fallen asleep under a big tree. It’s kind of funny
that she’s still surrounded by trees even now.”
A faint smile crossed his lips but quickly fell away.
Dong-mi, who had been listening quietly, rubbed her arms as she said, “Maybe it’s
because you guys are together, but you’re giving me goosebumps.” At this, Chaewoo’s eyes grew wide as though he’d just been woken from a deep sleep. As soon as
he realized what he had said, his brows furrowed into a deep frown.
When she saw Choo-ja having a difficult time, Lee-yeon had sent her back first,
coming down the mountain herself after sunset.
She entered the motel they were all staying at, hungry and exhausted. There was
already a long line of people waiting to check in and you can tell by their dirty clothes
that they were all workers sent to help with the accident. Firefighters, police, military
personnel, and civil servants all stood around looking tired.
Lee-yeon stood at the back of the line, looking around at the fairly clean interior of the
motel. All kinds of workers passed by her, but none of them were wearing the logo she
was hoping to see.
‘Should I call Chae-woo?’ she thought to herself as she took out her cell phone and
looked at the screen.

Just then, something hit her from behind, and she felt a hand clasp around the nape of
her neck and quickly turn her around. In the blink of an eye, someone grabbed her by
the collar, pulling her close, as she lost her balance and stumbled.
“Ah, this woman, how long has it been?”
As she faced her attacker, her whole body froze. Her heartbeat thrummed
forebodingly in her ears and her mind went blank. She was forced to stand on tiptoe, making it hard to keep her balance.
“I was wondering where you were hiding. Have you been here the whole time?”
She didn’t even have the energy to attempt feebly to escape his grip. Her hands
trembled.
It was the first time she’d seen her cousin since fleeing the mainland and coming to
Hwaido. Her father’s child. He was all at once her cousin and her half-brother.
In his other hand, he was holding his phone, apparently in the middle of his call. He
gripped his phone harder as he said, “Hey–, bro, guess who I just ran into?”
His gaze was filled with both delight and malice. This gaze that immediately crushed
her hopes that the resentment between them would fade over time. The subtle
pleasure that rose behind those deep eyes was the same as ever.
“It looks like I got a pretty big catch.”

“Bro, did you have a good dream last night?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t breathe. Her cousin stood before her, his voice raised as he laughed
in her face. As always, it was like hearing everything that made her feel ashamed of
herself. It was exactly the same as before, except they were no longer on the
playground, in the school corridors, in the city, or at her workplace.
“She’s a tough girl, just like you said. For such a tough girl, it’s no wonder she’s living
such a shamelessly luxurious life after running away like that. What an ingrate. It’s
nice that the family who raised me doesn’t give a shit about me.”

“If she was going to screw people over, she might as well have the decency to lay
low.”
His expression hardened as he shook Lee-yeon roughly by her collar.
“Shouldn’t she feel ashamed?”
Each word felt like a cut, deep and painful. The sudden scene drew people’s attention.
However, no one rushed to intervene, possibly due to the orange uniform her cousin
donned.
“Life must come so easy to you, Lee-yeon.”
“Let go of me.”
She glared down at his hands, her nails digging into them. It was different from the
obedient look she used to have in her eyes. Her aggressor’s eyebrows raised at this
sign of resistance.
“bro, I have to hang up. I’ll call you back later.”
As soon as he finished tucking his phone back in his pocket, slap–! Lee-yeon’s head
jerked to the side. The onlookers all gasped simultaneously as he suddenly slapped
her across the face.
She must have busted a lip since she could taste blood in her mouth. She couldn’t
even bring herself to touch her cheek which burned as though on fire.
Her ears rang as she suddenly recalled every memory of her cousin cursing at her and
making her life miserable when she was young.
She could feel the stares of those standing in the lobby around her as they whispered
quietly. She had a nauseating feeling of deja vu. This evaluation had already been
influenced by others enough as it was.
Again and again, she felt overcome by an insurmountable sense of defeat.
“Get out of the way. You’re blocking the line.”
Lee-yeon squeezed her clammy fist with all her might.
“Did you take the wrong medicine today, Lee-yeon?”
“No, It must be that I forgot my pills today. Meanwhile, you’re causing a scene like a
troublemaker who can’t act his own age.”

“It’s really been a long time. You’ve gotten so old.”
“You, Lee–”
Lee-yeon’s childhood had never been smooth.
However, even after witnessing someone being buried alive, being drugged and
dragged to a slaughterhouse, and almost cracking her head open in a drug field, she
felt ridiculously confident that she had the upper hand on her cousin.
“You’re not a person.”
Slap–! He brought his hand down on her cheek again, just as she got the words out.
“You crazy girl. You must be really happy to see me today. Is that why your body
aches?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t help but laugh. She wasn’t scared by her weak, bully of a cousin.
Anyone with a minimal amount of strength could become a bully.
But the man she lived with was different. A man who could carefully brush back the
baby hairs on his wife’s head after brutally defeating a gangster and a wild boar with
his bare hands. This man who already played such a huge role in her life, was the one
she was truly afraid of.
“My blood may be dirty, but your shallow words and actions are even worse.”
After everything she’d been through, the accusations her cousin threw at her no
longer had the power to hurt her.
“Haha, So Lee-yeon, it looks like after ignoring me for so long, you’ve forgotten your
manners.” The man poked Lee-yeon’s forehead with his finger. Sharp malice gathered
like a smile in his eyes.
Looking into this familiar gaze, Lee-yeon suddenly realized how much she’d forgotten
about her miserable past. Chae-woo’s affection and protection were so strong.
“This won’t do.”
Her cousin clenched his jaw and dragged Lee-yeon outside.
Just then, the automatic door opened and a group of people wearing matching
uniforms walked in. Lee-yeon had maintained her composure despite having been
slapped twice, but at the sight of the familiar logo on the uniforms, her heart dropped.
The moment caught her off guard and she was carried away easily as though her body
was composed of nothing but straw, while at the same time her eyes met Chae-woo’s.


At the sight of her swollen cheeks and busted lip, he stiffened coldly. It was the
slightest of changes, but it still made Lee-yeon’s shoulders shrink. Only then did his
cousin begin to move, dragging her as if she were a cow, with a satisfied giggle.
“Since my older brother and sister aren’t here, I should at least pull myself together,
shouldn’t I?” he said, strengthening his grasp.
“If you’re going to drag me away, do it quickly.”
“What?”
“Stop stalling and take me away!”
“Oh!”
Lee-yeon lowered her voice as much as she could and quietly urged her cousin on.
The thought of Chae-woo and his teammates seeing her in such an embarrassing
situation struck her like a severe scolding. I can’t be the one to sully Chae-woo’s
reputation.
Lee-yeon knew from experience what it was like to be exiled from a community, so she
hoped with all her heart that this dirty scandal would not be the start of horrible
rumors. As she fought to endure the feelings of shame slowly enveloping her, she
closed her eyes.
“So Lee-yeon, open your eyes.”

She shivered at the sound of the voice in her ears. Her eyes opened wide against her
will. She was helpless against his commanding tone of voice.
“I don’t know why you’re avoiding me when I know you saw me. As your husband, I
have no choice but to misunderstand this situation.”
“Chae—Chae-woo.”
Before she knew it, Chae-woo was right in front of her, his gaze icy, as he said,
“Explain, before I skin this bastard alive.”
“Where are you off to in such a hurry with your face swollen like that? What were you
planning to do with this idiot?”
“Who the fuck are you?!” Her brother looked livid.
“Lee-yeon, I asked you a question.”
Her cousin glared angrily at Chae-woo as he struck him on the shoulder. Unfazed,
Chae-woo merely stared at Lee-yeon. He couldn’t seem to tear his eyes away from her
red cheeks.
His expression was as easy to read as a blank sheet of paper, but the look in his eyes
told a different story. He felt unusually consumed by the notion that he should not
move even a single step before hearing Lee-yeon’s response. Lee-yeon quickly thrust
herself between them.
“Hey, come on, don’t be rash–”
She quickly moved to discourage her cousin before he started a fight. But it was Chaewoo who responded.
“who is this?”
He tilted his head slowly toward Lee-yeon as though trying to confirm whether or not
he’d read this situation correctly.
His face had been blank and difficult to read this entire time, but finally showed some
hint of emotion. He questioned her fiercely, his voice having lost its composure
entirely.
“How exactly do you know each other?” He couldn’t recall her ever having mentioned
him before.
Chae-woo’s eyes trembled.
“And rather than going into the motel together, you’re in a rush to leave. Who the hell
is he?”
“It, it’s not like that, he’s my cousin!”
“Cousin?”
The corners of Chae-woo’s mouth rose into a grin as he recalled the details of Leeyeon’s family history that Beom-hee had given him.
“Ah, those sons of bitches.”
Without even a hint of hesitation, Chae-woo grabbed the man by his head. His grip
was so tight it turned his knuckles white.
Her cousin, his pride shattered, tried futilely to escape Chae-woo’s death grip. His
mouth filled with blood and spit, he let out a heavy groan.
“Ugh.! Fuck, husband? Did you say husband?”
To free himself from Chae-woo’s grasp, he fell messily to the floor. Eventually, her
spiteful cousin began to shout, his face grim.
“Why is the world so unfair? How many peoples’ lives have you ruined and you’re here
being all lovey dovey with your husband? My mom, uncles, aunts, brother, and sisters
have suffered their whole lives. While we were rotting away in a mental hospital you
were off pretending to be a decent person and getting married!”
Lee-yeon felt her eyes begin to burn as she felt the stares of the people around them.
Her cousin’s sense of injustice had been building since they were children. From a
pencil break or someone tripping, to failing a test or losing their fortune. Every
personal misfortune had been blamed on Lee-yeon’s improper birth. It’d been a long
time since she’d lived among such vulgarity.
“Do you think it makes sense for you to enjoy your life like nothing happened?”
As this was all unfolding, Chae-woo was signaling secretly to Beom-hee who was
undercover nearby, observing every change in Lee-yeon’s expression with his arms
crossed.
“Every member of my family has a mental illness. I went to the hospital because
everything in my life fell apart. Why is it always the innocent who suffer? Complete
strangers can understand us, so what’s wrong with you? Who changes their number
and runs away so they can live well all on their own? Shit! And you call yourself
human?”

He raised his voice as if to show off, and as expected, the sound of whispers poured
from the surrounding audience. Lee-yeon’s face was burning from embarrassment.
She didn’t care much about his criticism of her. But the presence of Chae-woo and his
coworkers bothered her.
“Haha, So Lee-yeon, it looks like after ignoring me for so long, you’ve forgotten your
manners.” The man poked Lee-yeon’s forehead with his finger. Sharp malice gathered
like a smile in his eyes.
Looking into this familiar gaze, Lee-yeon suddenly realized how much she’d forgotten
about her miserable past. Chae-woo’s affection and protection were so strong.
“This won’t do.”
Her cousin clenched his jaw and dragged Lee-yeon outside.
Just then, the automatic door opened and a group of people wearing matching
uniforms walked in. Lee-yeon had maintained her composure despite having been
slapped twice, but at the sight of the familiar logo on the uniforms, her heart dropped.
The moment caught her off guard and she was carried away easily as though her body
was composed of nothing but straw, while at the same time her eyes met Chae-woo’s.


At the sight of her swollen cheeks and busted lip, he stiffened coldly. It was the
slightest of changes, but it still made Lee-yeon’s shoulders shrink. Only then did his
cousin begin to move, dragging her as if she were a cow, with a satisfied giggle.
“Since my older brother and sister aren’t here, I should at least pull myself together,
shouldn’t I?” he said, strengthening his grasp.
“If you’re going to drag me away, do it quickly.”
“What?”
“Stop stalling and take me away!”
“Oh!”
Lee-yeon lowered her voice as much as she could and quietly urged her cousin on.
The thought of Chae-woo and his teammates seeing her in such an embarrassing
situation struck her like a severe scolding. I can’t be the one to sully Chae-woo’s
reputation.
Lee-yeon knew from experience what it was like to be exiled from a community, so she
hoped with all her heart that this dirty scandal would not be the start of horrible
rumors. As she fought to endure the feelings of shame slowly enveloping her, she
closed her eyes.
“So Lee-yeon, open your eyes.”

She shivered at the sound of the voice in her ears. Her eyes opened wide against her
will. She was helpless against his commanding tone of voice.
“I don’t know why you’re avoiding me when I know you saw me. As your husband, I
have no choice but to misunderstand this situation.”
“Chae—Chae-woo.”
Before she knew it, Chae-woo was right in front of her, his gaze icy, as he said,
“Explain, before I skin this bastard alive.”
“Where are you off to in such a hurry with your face swollen like that? What were you
planning to do with this idiot?”
“Who the fuck are you?!” Her brother looked livid.
“Lee-yeon, I asked you a question.”
Her cousin glared angrily at Chae-woo as he struck him on the shoulder. Unfazed,
Chae-woo merely stared at Lee-yeon. He couldn’t seem to tear his eyes away from her
red cheeks.
His expression was as easy to read as a blank sheet of paper, but the look in his eyes
told a different story. He felt unusually consumed by the notion that he should not
move even a single step before hearing Lee-yeon’s response. Lee-yeon quickly thrust
herself between them.
“Hey, come on, don’t be rash–”
She quickly moved to discourage her cousin before he started a fight. But it was Chaewoo who responded.
“who is this?”
He tilted his head slowly toward Lee-yeon as though trying to confirm whether or not
he’d read this situation correctly.
His face had been blank and difficult to read this entire time, but finally showed some
hint of emotion. He questioned her fiercely, his voice having lost its composure
entirely.
“How exactly do you know each other?” He couldn’t recall her ever having mentioned
him before.
Chae-woo’s eyes trembled.
“And rather than going into the motel together, you’re in a rush to leave. Who the hell
is he?”
“It, it’s not like that, he’s my cousin!”
“Cousin?”
The corners of Chae-woo’s mouth rose into a grin as he recalled the details of Leeyeon’s family history that Beom-hee had given him.
“Ah, those sons of bitches.”
Without even a hint of hesitation, Chae-woo grabbed the man by his head. His grip
was so tight it turned his knuckles white.
Her cousin, his pride shattered, tried futilely to escape Chae-woo’s death grip. His
mouth filled with blood and spit, he let out a heavy groan.
“Ugh.! Fuck, husband? Did you say husband?”
To free himself from Chae-woo’s grasp, he fell messily to the floor. Eventually, her
spiteful cousin began to shout, his face grim.
“Why is the world so unfair? How many peoples’ lives have you ruined and you’re here
being all lovey dovey with your husband? My mom, uncles, aunts, brother, and sisters
have suffered their whole lives. While we were rotting away in a mental hospital you
were off pretending to be a decent person and getting married!”
Lee-yeon felt her eyes begin to burn as she felt the stares of the people around them.
Her cousin’s sense of injustice had been building since they were children. From a
pencil break or someone tripping, to failing a test or losing their fortune. Every
personal misfortune had been blamed on Lee-yeon’s improper birth. It’d been a long
time since she’d lived among such vulgarity.
“Do you think it makes sense for you to enjoy your life like nothing happened?”
As this was all unfolding, Chae-woo was signaling secretly to Beom-hee who was
undercover nearby, observing every change in Lee-yeon’s expression with his arms
crossed.
“Every member of my family has a mental illness. I went to the hospital because
everything in my life fell apart. Why is it always the innocent who suffer? Complete
strangers can understand us, so what’s wrong with you? Who changes their number
and runs away so they can live well all on their own? Shit! And you call yourself
human?”

He raised his voice as if to show off, and as expected, the sound of whispers poured
from the surrounding audience. Lee-yeon’s face was burning from embarrassment.
She didn’t care much about his criticism of her. But the presence of Chae-woo and his
coworkers bothered her.
“Are you saying your parents are the adulterous ones after all? Do you think finding a
man is more important than your family? Is that why you left your family to chase
after a husband? Without even looking, you can tell that this man you call your
husband is–”
Lee-yeon collapsed to the floor and covered her cousin’s mouth.
“Please that’s enough. Don’t say anything more.”

Her cousin’s eyes grew wide with shock at her unprecedented behavior.
“I’m asking you to stop, now.”
Lee-yeon stared at him with tears in her eyes. Please, stop. Don’t you dare speak badly
about someone I care about.
She had been through unbearably difficult moments in her life, but she’d never felt as
little as she did now. Lee-yeon couldn’t bear to even look up at Chae-woo.
“He’s not my husband. I’m not married. You misunderstood.”
“Huh!”
Lee-yeon felt as though her wrist might break, but she endured the pain desperately.
Even as her hands trembled, she kept his mouth covered almost to the point of
crushing him. Still, her coworkers were still watching, even Dong-mi. She was anxious
to keep Chae-woo out of this somehow.
“It’s not what you think, so don’t just blabber on carelessly. Let’s just get out of here.
I’ll listen to everything you want to say, so let’s just keep it between us.”
“Ugh, ptui!”
Her cousin spat on the floor, shaking her hand, “Fuck, what are you!”
“Don’t you dare move a muscle, Lee-yeon.”

She froze at the sound of his sharp voice.
“First, I’m your husband, then I’m not. I don’t know why I’m so angered by your
volatility. I’m not sure I can be kind now, so even if you have to crawl over here, you
better do it now.”
“Chae-woo, this–”
“Stop spewing your nonsense.”
“That.”
“That’s enough. I said come here.”
Despite his insistence, she still hesitated to look around at the audience. Chae-woo’s
voice thundered.
“So Lee-yeon!”
Surprised, Lee-yeon shot up reflexively.
The cousin who was watching their interaction reached for her devilishly. But Chaewoo was faster. He lifted Lee-yeon out of the way and pushed her cousin’s face away
with his foot.
He stepped on the back of his head. The cousin slammed against the floor and spat
curses at Chae-woo. At each curse, Chae-woo smashed the cousin’s head down again
and again.
Bam, bam, bam, he kept bashing the cousin’s head down. The faces of the onlookers
blanched. However, no one came forward to stop him.
Expressionless, Chae-woo asked Lee-yeon, “Do you enjoy making heads turn?”
“Ugh, what, what the fuck, who the hell are you?” Her cousin asked.
“You tell me, Lee-yeon. Who the hell am I?”
He threw the question back at her, pounding his hell relentlessly. Lee-yeon caught
Chae-woo’s sharp gaze with shaky eyes.
The strange pounding sound continued to ring out against the floor, but Chae-woo’s
eyes remained on her.
“Tell me, Lee-yeon.”
“I just said that to try and spare you from embarrassment.”
Lee-yeon loosened her arm from around his shoulder. But the touch of him under her
arm and on the back of her knees was firm and hot.
“I was trying to find a way to keep you out of this mess. Look at all the people here. What do you think they see?”
Lee-yeon lowered her voice, bowing her head as if curling into a ball.
“so just pretend you’re not my husband for now. I can do that for you.”
At that moment, Chae-woo pushed her head into his shoulder. All of a sudden, she
could no longer see the stares of the people surrounding her and everything went
black. He was pressing hard against the back of her head making it impossible for her
to turn her head.
“Try again.”

Her heart thundered against her chest at their close proximity and the sweet smell of
his sweat. Then she heard a low voice in her ear.
“Who am I?”

Something was boiling up inside her threatening to explode.
With her eyes covered, she could no longer see anything, and the social calculations
she’d been making in her head disappeared, replaced with a strong desire to
disappear.
A desire to be with him, no matter where.
However, Lee-yeon gritted her teeth and pushed the thought from her mind.


The silence grew between them and Lee-yeon wondered what expression was
currently playing across Chae-woo’s face. He had remained disturbingly quiet all this
time and now he began to move, stepping slowly. Even as he made his way across the
lobby, he kept his hand on the back of Lee-yeon’s head, pressing her face into his
shoulder like she was a baby.
She could feel his pulse beating rapidly against the back of her neck. She felt as
though every nerve in her body was focused on that spot where she could feel his
speeding pulse.
“What room are you in?”
“Well, I didn’t”
Chae-woo kept walking and didn’t ask any further questions. She remembered there
being a long line, but somehow he approached the front desk and picked up the card
key with Lee-yeon’s name on it. The sound of his shoes dragging across the floor
seemed to gather into a single sound.
“So Lee-yeon! My mom is sick. She’s sick!”
The gasping voice tugged on Lee-yeon, her cousin’s final desperate cry. The mother he
spoke of was Lee-yeon’s aunt and the person who raised her.
Her expression was grim, but Chae-woo paid her cousin no attention and continued
towards the elevator.
Nevertheless, Lee-yeon was unable to ignore the distant sound of her cousin’s voice.
She bit her lip to fight back a surging feeling of repulsion when a large palm covered
her ear.
“You even paid your uncle’s hospital bill, and you only knew him for a year at most.
Does my mother, who has suffered considerably more than him, mean nothing to you?

“I heard you got a pretty hefty sum in compensation for that. What did you do with it!”
Chae-woo seemed to stop walking just for a moment but she soon felt him resume his
rhythmic pace. Lee-yeon dug into his arms, her ears still covered.
Meanwhile, Chae-woo found Beom-hee, still keeping an eye on the situation with a
cold expression, and winked at him.
Suddenly, two mensilently stepped from the crowd and dragged her cousin, still
shouting, out of the lobby.
Dong-mi’s eyes grew wide as she watched the noisy disturbance breathlessly.
She stared at the door through which the two men had disappeared.
Chae-woo swiped the key card and opened the door, pushing Lee-yeon against the
wall as soon as he set her down.
He had been working so hard to keep his cool, but now his cold expression was
shattered, an angry snarl taking its place.
“What was all that about?”
He ground his teeth together as if he were chewing glass. The shoulder that had
slammed against the wall stung, but Lee-yeon didn’t dare to breathe at the sight of his
fierce expression.
“You just can’t help but drag people into your problems. And you go ahead and say
that I’m not your husband, we didn’t get married, it’s all a misunderstanding? What
the fuck, you think you can just use people however you like?”
He rested his forehead irritably on his arm which was pressed against the wall. In
doing so, his face was covered in shadow, but she could still clearly make out his
furrowed brow and clenched jaw.
Lee-yeon leveled her shoulders and held her breath as her heart beat rapidly against
her chest. She knew he couldn’t understand that she had done it to protect him, and
his harsh words stung.
“I told you. I didn’t want to get you involved.” Her voice wavered, but she held back
her tears. Her chest just swelled lightly like that of a small bird. “What, what kind of
woman does that to her own husband?”

“It was my shame to bear. You’re just starting to build up your social reputation. Do
you want everyone to think you’re married to someone who was born illegitimately?
You know that would just bring you down with me.”

“On the outside people might pat your back and show you sympathy, but you know
what they’d be thinking on the inside. Little by little they’d start to laugh about you
behind your back. I didn’t want you to suffer from that kind of ridicule. That’s why I
said what I did, because of the consequences!”
She must have been overwhelmed from her speech because she felt tears rolling down
her cheeks.
A momentary smile flashed across Chae-woo’s face as he silently stared at her pitiful
state. It was just there for an instant, but it was clearly a laugh.
“You’re crying.”

He wiped away Lee-yeon’s tears, a smile on his face.
“When did you become so sincere?”
“What?” she replied, wondering at the odd insinuation.
“But what can I do? I don’t have an ounce of appreciation for your little sacrifice”
He placed a large hand over her swollen cheek and lip. When his hand touched her
skin, she felt the stinging, throbbing pain of where she was hit.
“Did you think I’d say thank you for lying for my sake? I get upset when someone
messes with my dog, but to hit my woman”
He couldn’t tear his fierce gaze from the bruises on her face. He inhaled deeply,
clenching his jaw tightly.
“Don’t you ever let me see you like this again.”

“Never.”
His warning reverberated through his cold stare.
“Don’t beg for no reason and don’t get hit for no reason. And I’m sick of lying and
hiding like this, too, so just stop.”
“I would do it all again.”
“What?”
“If this were all to happen again, I wouldn’t change a thing.” Lee-yeon stared at him
with wide eyes. Her look was stubborn and unfaltering. Chae-woo let out a breath and
nervously swept his hair back.
“Even if the same thing were to happen again, I still wouldn’t say you’re my husband
in front of everyone.”
Chae-woo’s expression hardened at her words.
“Everything my cousin said was true. It’s the filthy past I’ve carried with me since I
was born.”
“Fuck, doesn’t that guy have a name?”
Lee-yeon paused, shutting her mouth and lowering her eyes and his sudden outburst.
“This is my problem, not yours. So, I lied, big deal. It may seem cowardly to you, but
this is how I’m choosing to handle it.”
His heart throbbed at her words as though he’d been infected by her emotions. He
couldn’t help but notice how beautiful her eyes looked as they glistened beautifully
with tears which threatened to overflow at any moment. To be honest, it was pretty
effective at tugging his heart.
But as he listened to her laughable declaration of resolve, he couldn’t help but grind
his teeth in irritation. He was upset at himself for being bothered by the scars Leeyeon still carried with her because of her cousins and her birth. His stomach was in
knots.
He felt the urge to worm his way into her obstinate world and carve out a bigger scar
than that. As he imagined this, his sadistic impulses took over and surged out of
control.
“Listen, if you really want to make it up to me—”
Chae-woo lifted her chin roughly and forced her to look him in the eye.
“Let me bury myself deep inside you. So deep that I can’t escape, and even deeper
then.”

“I’m ready to be manipulated by you.”
Lee-yeon could feel the heat in his gaze as she stared into his dark eyes, her palms
growing clammy. A feeling, neither hot nor cold, was spreading throughout her,
awakening her body. Her heart was beating frighteningly fast.
“I’m the one who took your virginity. Did you really think I’d be bothered by your
past?”

At that moment, he grabbed Lee-yeon’s neck roughly and placed his lips over hers. As
their breathing grew rapid, their two bodies came together softly. As their legs
became entangled, he thrust his tongue into her mouth.
He slid his tongue along the roof of her mouth causing Lee-yeon to wriggle her
shoulders and tilt her head up.
Chae-woo buried his hand deep in her hair and kissed her deeply as though trying to
swallow her up. As their kisses grew more passionate, he felt himself harden as their
bodies rubbed against each other.
“Hahh,” a low moan escaped his lips.
This was the woman who had deceived him and who had some sort of relationship
with his brother. Chae-woo was confused himself.
Just as she had deceived him, he would do the same to her and shamelessly continue
to pose as her husband. Until the day he left her side.
But it was getting harder to tell what was an act and what was sincere. He knew he
needed to push her away with everything he had, and yet she pulled him back in with
all her might.
This man, whose heart was full of confusion and loathing, tilted Lee-yeon’s head back
and kissed her desperately.
He felt an inexplicable joy, the unfamiliarity of which caused him to distort his face.
The more he ran his hands over her smooth body and explored her tongue with his,
the more intense his feeling of longing grew, washing over him like a wave.
The softness of her tongue. The tip of his nose pressing against her. The warmth of
her breath on his face as she moaned softly. Saliva dripped from their mouths. He bit
Lee-yeon’s lip hard, tugging her bottom lip with his teeth. Her breathless moans were
sweet like honey.
Chae-woo’s body shook with desire. He knew the name of every scale and chord of the
piano and yet there was no word to express the sounds coming from Lee-yeon. An
indescribable sense of relief pulled him in deeper and deeper.
“Uh, Chae-woo, ha.”
At the same time, he noticed how comfortable Lee-yeon was with kissing and a new
feeling sparked inside him.
Who the fuck has she been kissing?
Chae-woo immediately felt the urge to interrogate her but decided that would come
off as unseemly.
His strange desire to have sole possession of her transformed him into a different
person every moment.
“From now on, don’t be overly considerate and share your every burden with me.”
“Hhmm”
“Even if what you’re trying to hide is a shitty family.”
Their voices, heated glances, and hot breath mingled and intertwined in the space
between them. His lips against hers, he whispered, “You have to throw me something
to gnaw on.”

“That’s how you treat a dog.”
Riiiip–he tore away Lee-yeon’s linen shirt.

Embarrassed, Lee-yeon pushed against Chae-woo’s shoulder, but he responded by
lifting her hips.
“Ugh!”
With their positions reversed, lifted his head as though he’d been waiting for this
moment and pressed head between her legs. Nipping her lightly here and there with
his teeth, he explored the taste of her with the tip of his tongue. Lee-yeon shook her
head, but his lips were already on her.
Chae-woo wrapped her legs around his waist and pushed her against the wall. Caught
between the wall and Chae-woo, Lee-yeon couldn’t resist feeling aroused by the feel of
his body against hers.
“Ha!”
He bent his head down and kissed her neck, swirling his tongue around and sucking
hard. His body trembled at the taste of her body.
He had already become irresistibly hard and could feel himself pressing against her
stomach as he growled, “Why do you keep making me care about everything?”
He tore away the rest of her torn shirt and grabbed for her breasts.
“Chae, Chae-woo, hold on ah!”
“We were getting along just fine.”
“Ugh!”
“I really tried my best.”
He swept his eyes over her breasts.
“But you started this. By showing me such a pitiful side of yourself.”
Lee-yeon’s body trembled at the sound of breath. He pushed Lee-yeon’s bra aside and
looked at her bare breasts expressionlessly. But the sense of calm lasted just an
instant. Small, round, and red. His mouth watered at the sight of it, the same color as
her red swollen lips. He reached for her nipples hungrily with his mouth. He wrapped
his mouth around the small of her breast and slowly flicked his tongue against the tip.
“Chae, Chae-woo. Hah, wait, Hah, hold on!”
Shudders, goosebumps, and in an instant her nipple stiffened to a point.
But it only made him more ravenous. She almost winced out of instinct when he
suddenly coiled his tongue once more around her nipple and sucked so hard his
cheeks dimpled. Her nipples became harder and harder from the stimulation.
“Hah, hah!”
As swirled his tongue over her breasts and continued to suck on her nipples. As his
tongue traveled over her skin, Lee-yeon pushed her head back against the wall or
tightened her legs.
“Ahhh, ah.”
Lee-yeon grabbed his shoulder and looked into his eyes, her face flush with lust. At
the same time, Chae-woo slipped off her tights and loosened his buckle. Lee-yeon’s
body writhed, her hair a mess.
“I’m, I’m sweaty”
“Didn’t I ever tell you? I like your sweat.”
He dug his nose into Lee-yeon’s collarbone. The soft scent of her body, mingled with
the smell of dry sweat on her skin, was completely captivating.
Her red nipple was slick with his saliva. And he could feel how hard he was, how ready
he was.
“I’m still all sweaty from work! I’ll shower first–”
“What a waste of time.”
He raised his head to look her fiercely in the eyes. The clean whites of his eyes
creeped her out.
“Even if it’s just a second, I want to take as much time as I can.”
“What’s that supposed to mean?”
He rubbed her through her underwear and felt her body react.
“Ugh!”
“What are you saying, when you’re this horny?”
His low voice was full of lust. Suddenly, he lifted her into his arms and started heading
toward the bathroom.
“Wait a minute!”
Despite her protests, Chae-woo stepped into the shower. He put Lee-yeon down,
turned on the shower and began spraying her with the water.
“Gah!”
Lee-yeon jumped at the sudden stream of water. The water pressure was strong and
left a painful tingling sensation all over her body. She closed her eyes and mouth
tightly and held out her arms as if trying to hold back the water. She tried to somehow
avoid the cold water, but Chae-woo mercilessly kept the stream pointed toward her.
Eventually, Lee-yeon turned around, shielding herself from the water, wiped her face
and shouted, “What are you doing!”
Her chest, face, and entire body were completely soaked. She wrapped her trembling
body with her arms.
“I thought you were worried about being sweaty.”
Chae-woo grabbed Lee-yeon and turned her around forcibly to look her in the eyes.
“Is this good enough?”

Lee-yeon was struck speechless by his uncharacteristically brazen attitude.
“Are you still not satisfied?”
Chae-woo pulled his shirt off over his head. She could see the outline of his hard dick
through his pants, where his buckle still hung loose. He quickly removed his pants as
well and picked up the shower head again.
“Wai-Wait–”
“I’ll help you wash up, so you take off your clothes too.”
This time, warm water washed over every corner of Lee-yeon’s body. Her wet, torn
clothes suck to her skin, revealing the smooth outline of her body.
Slowly feasting his eyes on her body, he could see the vague shadow of a tuft of hair
between her legs. His eyes stopped there and his breathing became quiet.
He fixated the stream of water between her legs, slowly revealing more and more of
what lay beneath her now translucent underwear. Suddenly, he licked his lips.
Lee-yeon, sensing his attention, quickly turned around. But it wasn’t a good idea.
A thin piece of cloth, clinging tightly to that secret place. Glossy thighs with firm skin.
Round buttocks barely covered by thin fabric. Droplets of water flowing from those
cheeks. His eyes were drawn to every bit of her.
“Mnn”
Maybe it was because of the water pressure, but Lee-yeon groaned weakly.
In an instant, the sound of rushing water stopped.


A strange silence stretched between them. Lee-yeon tried to turn her head, but she
was suddenly pulled backward by her waist.
“Oh!”
The heat of his touch shocked her system and she gasped as he grabbed her.
“Chae-woo, what, what are you!”
He pulled her underwear down and quickly pressed his lips together. On his knees, he
spread Lee-yeon’s legs apart and buried his head between them. Lee-yeon shuddered
with pleasure just from the feel of his breath between her legs. He slid his tongue
upward in one slow motion.
“Ahhh! Chae-woo!”
As she jerked and writhed, he tightened his grip on her abdomen. His nose rubbed
against her clit and he didn’t hesitate to rub his tongue around it before shoving his
tongue inside her.
“Ahh! Chae-woo, ah, don’t!
He grinned at Lee-yeon’s helpless response. Her face immediately turned red.
Chae-woo going down on her, she pressing herself into him shamelessly. It was all so
humiliating. She tried to break free like a deer sensing danger, but Chae-woo held her
fast.
Running away was futile.
Lee-yeon flexed her toes, biting her lip roughly. Chae-woo kept moving his tongue
around like he was enjoying something delicious, sucking on her soft flesh and
persistently shoving his tongue inside her.
“Mmmnnn, nnn, mmm!”
His red tongue was like a burning ember. Every time he licked and shoved his tongue
inside her, back and forth, the fire moved. The slurping sound reminded of the
splashing sound of water, but inside she felt hot.
She was being slowly devoured and the squelching sound seemed to echo around her.
He thrust his tongue inside her, tilting his head to reach deeper.
Chae-woo flicked her clitoris with his tongue slowly, as if nervous. Each time he did
this, Lee-yeon’s breath quickened and she felt like something was melting inside her.
“Ahhh, hahh, aaahhhh!”
Using his teeth, he nipped lightly at the soft folds of her vagina, sucking the skin into
his mouth and lightly tugging with his teeth. He shoved his tongue in again moving his
chin moving as though going in for a kiss. She swallowed every drop as she came, his
Adam’s apple bobbing up and down busily as he gulped.
“Ha”
“Haa”
As soon as Chae-woo pulled his lips away, breathing heavily–
“Ahh” he shoved his fingers into her.
“It feels different from the back.”
Lee-yeon’s hand, which was sliding down the bathroom wall, slipped weakly. He
swirled his fingers around inside her, using his knuckles to stretch her wider. At the
same time, he was bold with his hands.
“I remember every moment we’ve been together, but we’ve never done anything like
this.”
“Ahhh!”
“That’s why I like it.”
His fingers became wet and sticky as he slipped one finger inside of her, slowly sliding
it in and out, then two fingers, then three.
He purposely hooked his knuckles and hung them on the end. Whenever his fingers
rubbed along the inside of her, Lee-yeon’s hips moved involuntarily.
“Hahh, ahhh!”
Something was pouring out from deep within her and she couldn’t help but groan.
The fingers, covered in her wetness, kept pushing deep inside her. Lee-yeon’s ears
reddened at the stick, slurping, sucking sound.
“Chae, Chae-woo. Hah, stop. Stop”
“You have to make sense for me to listen to you.”
He let out a low, ridiculing laugh.
“Still, I don’t like this”
“Why?”
“It’s just, well, I’m a bit cold. Or I at least want to be able to see your face– Ahh!”
Just then, something hot and thick shoved its way into Lee-yeon’s body all at once as if
it were on fire.
“You want me to beg you, right?” he said, his voice rough as he breathed heavily.
Lee-yeon opened her mouth wide and tried to remain still as she bore the painful
pressure.
“Must I be so obedient?”
Chae-woo wrapped a hand around Lee-yeon’s neck.
Lee-yeon bit her lip as she braced herself for the force with which Kwon Chae-woo
was rutting against her. She felt completely full as he thrust into her.
He chuckled as she made a face at the feeling. “Lee-yeon, come on, loosen up for me.”
When he pulled out a little, she let out a sigh of relief. Kwon Chae-woo slid arm behind
her neck and allowed himself a moment to feel her soft skin. Compared to how he
usually was, he was being quite tender. Still, Lee-yeon couldn’t help but feel like she
was being shackled to him causing her to tense up.
“Right,” Kwon Chae-woo grunted. “You really don’t listen to me.” And, with that, he
bottomed out into her. “I’ve always been the one who’s listened to you. You’ve
practically enslaved me.”
Lee-yeon threw her head back in pleasure, hitting the bathroom wall, as Kwon Chaewoo put his leg beneath her ass and grabbed her hip. He could feel her slowly drifting
away, unable to hear what he was saying. He rocked her body back and forth as her
breath began to quicken, thrusting in and out with each movement.
He reached behind her back, and, with a swift touch, he unhooked her bra and took
hold of one of her breasts. The flesh was supple in his grasp as he fondled it and
flicked her nipple with his thumb.
Lee-yeon shut her eyes as she tried to hold herself together. She wasn’t exactly feeling
like herself at that moment. “Chae-woo,” she rasped. “I don’t like this—”
“You don’t like it?”
He thrust into her at that moment, and she couldn’t help but moan.
“You don’t like having sex?” he pressed. He moved against her sharply as he spoke.
“Would you like it if it wasn’t me doing it to you?”
Lee-yeon tried to answer but her breath was caught in her throat. The way he was
ramming into her was suffocating.
Kwon Chae-woo tutted. “My wife can’t even answer such a simple question,” he said.
“I must be fucking you really good.”
She couldn’t even scream, too wrapped up in her own pleasure to muster a sound. It
seemed like he was on a rampage and she was the carnage that he planned to leave
behind. With each thrust, his grip on her neck seemed to tighten.
“Don’t go all soft on me now,” he told her. “You are the bold So Lee-yeon, right?” His
breath was hot against her neck. “Turn your head.”
Weakly, Lee-yeon did as she was told. Suddenly, a set of teeth closed in on her bottom
lip and a tongue slid into her mouth forcefully. He was pressing his tongue against
hers, pushing in until she couldn’t seem to breathe anymore.
Then, he reached down and rubbed at her clit, sending shockwaves through her body
at the sudden feeling. It was like her entire body was on fire and she felt her legs
begin to shake.
Lee-yeon tried to push Kwon Chae-woo away, too overwhelmed by the feeling, but his
hand wouldn’t budge. He was set on rubbing his thumb against her heat and he was
merciless in his attack. It was like her body was being ripped in half, like she was
being pulled in two different directions all at once. Behind her, Kwon Chae-woo
moaned lowly as he squeezed her breast and sucked on her tongue. The point where
their bodies collided was sopping wet from Lee-yeon’s slick.
“I can taste blood in your mouth, Lee-yeon.” He frowned against her lips. “It seems
like I’ve sucked too hard.”
She couldn’t respond. Her pleasure was reaching its usual peak, but it felt different
this time. The knot in her stomach seemed so much tighter and her feelings seemed so
much more out of sorts.
“I don’t care,” Kwon Chae-woo continued. “Your sweat, your blood, your juice I can
never have enough of you.” His thrusts were getting stronger and they were
beginning to hurt from all the impact and the pressure. He nibbled on ear, his lips
traveling down her neck all the way to her cheek. His grip on her was tight as he
continued to move.
“Stop!” Lee-yeon cried. “I feel weird!”
But all he did was chuckle. “You’re not the only one,” he said. “I’m sure I feel way
worse.”
“Kwon Chae-woo, promise me one thing.”
The moment seemed so far away, but he could hear the voice clearly in the back of his
mind. Kwon Chae-woo felt his heart stop in his chest.
“Never find your memory. Ever.”
He shook his head at the memory and frowned. He pulled his thoughts away from it
and focused on holding Lee-yeon’s waist. It bothered him to know that his heart was
beating because of something completely unrelated to sex so he tried to refocus on the
task at hand. He thrust into her sharply, as if by instinct.
“Even if I go back to who I was, why would anything between us change? I’m so hung
up on you, Lee-yeon. What are you afraid of?”
It was his voice that he could hear in the back of his head, but it wasn’t really him. His
emotions began to take over him and he bit his bottom lip and shook his head to clear
the thought away.
“I don’t need it,” he said mindlessly.
Lee-yeon frowned. “What?”
But Kwon Chae-woo was focused. His mind was thinking hard about that moment.
“No matter what the situation is,” she had told him, “Dangerous or urgent, do you
really think I’m a woman who’s oblivious to the rest of the world? If I ask you to take
me anywhere, could you do that?”
“Every moment I live, I save you, I chase you instinctively. It may seem selfish right
now but my world revolves around you, Lee-yeon.”
His heart was pounding. “Fuck.”
He shoved himself into her tight hole, going as deep and as far as he could go. His
back tensed at the feeling. She squirmed against him, but his mind was now focused
on something else.
His mind drifted to the little boy who had come to his home when he was thirteen, he
had boycotted everyone. His family was careful and kind, they treated him like broken
glass. He wasn’t familiar with his birth parents and his three older brothers. Though
they acted like they were family, he couldn’t help but feel like they were actually
wicked people who had split him and his mother apart.
As time went on, things stayed the same. His heart only grew colder and he became
increasingly obsessed with the cello. He had rejected his family so much that he had
come to a point where he would bite anyone who tried to touch him. He had become a
boy who didn’t speak to others and played the cello in the dark.
He was isolated from the people he was supposed to be closest to and, in the end, they
decided to send him abroad, hiding his identity from everyone else.
There was only one thing he wanted to say, but he never could. He missed his mother,
but he knew that all she had been his kidnapper. Still, he missed her and he wanted to
return to her.
He snapped out of the thought and grunted. “I’m really sick of all the fuss.” His
thrusts were at their strongest now and his grip on Lee-yeon was tight and hard. She
was almost there.
Suddenly, a wave of white overtook her and she writhed against Kwon Chae-woo’s
body. Still, he continued to move.
Lee-yeon didn’t remember that he came.

“Spare me!”
Where was the man who thought he had all the power? Where was the predator now?
Kwon Chae-woo pulled the duct tape from the man’s mouth and untied the cloth
beneath. He shoved it into the mouth of Lee-yeon’s cousin and glared. He was scared
to death—which was understandable considered how he was covered in dirt and blood
from head to toe.
“Were you burying?”
It was Jang Beom-hee who answered. “Yes, there were too many mountains around.”
He bowed.
Kwon Chae-woo grimaced. “Are you saying there are more of these useless goons?”
The cousin flinched at the sound of his cold voice.
“Did they teach you nothing but how to bully others at home?” Kwon Chae-woo asked.
He grabbed the edge of the trunk and looked at the man inside, curled up like a
garbage bag. “Don’t be nervous.” He grinned, but it wasn’t truly a grin. It was a sickly
thing that spelled danger. “I only learned how to use a knife and axe at home too. We’re pretty similar in that way.”
The frightened man’s heart was racing as he looked up at the man who loomed over
him. Lee-yeon, who is this?
Kwon Chae-woo continued. “I’ll have someone follow you like a dog from now on,” he
said. “Maybe for your entire life, they’ll follow you until you die.”
“Please!” Lee-yeon’s cousin screamed. “Spare me!” He had thrown all his pride away
as soon as he was being pushed in and out of the ground.
But Kwon Chae-woo just continued. “You’ll see him when you get married,” he said.
“When you have a kid, when you go on to live a happy life. At the wedding, at your
child’s kindergarten, in front of your house, everywhere he will follow you like a
shadow you will never get rid of.” He watched as the other man struggled and tried to
break himself from. “Try,” he said coldly. “Struggle.”
He shut the trunk again. Inside, a scream broke loose but he could barely hear it.
“It’s going to be a long night,” he sighed.

When she woke up, she was alone.
The only trace of Kwon Chae-woo having been there was the medicine on the table
and the shower robe she was swaddled in. The robe fastened so tight that it took her a
while to undo it.
She thought about calling him but didn’t. Since they put on a show at the lobby last
night, she was sure others must have heard about it. She tried to put it all aside. Right
now, Lee-yeon just felt sluggish.
“Hey, Director So,” Director Park greeted her when she arrived. It was the third day
of judging. “You don’t look so good. Try not to push yourself, okay?”
“You’re telling me to be careless?”
“Not quite!” he laughed. “Don’t think like that.” He snuffed out his cigarette on the lid
of his coffee and threw the remains on the ground.
Lee-yeon frowned. “Director, you can’t just throw things here like that.”
The man gave her a look. When he realized she was serious, he shook his head. “It’s
already a dump, but I’m sorry. Sorry.”
She knew he didn’t mean it. Ignoring the growing sense of annoyance in her chest,
she took a deep breath and sat on top of a large rock. Choo-ja noticed that she was
getting pale so she went down the mountain to get medicine. Lee-yeon thought about
the long day ahead of them and wiped the sweat from her forehead.
It all looked like a mess. The ground had been dug up and there was so much trash
that a small mountain had started to form. The place was crying for help. As Lee-yeon
looked around, she was somehow reminded of Kwon Chae-woo. But she tried to ignore
her thoughts.
Then, as if something had read her mind, she heard footsteps getting closer. She saw
a big silhouette approaching her and she stood up.
He was holding a scythe and, when he saw her, he pretended to be looking at the
forest instead. He looked neat, in his jersey that went all the way up to his chin and
his hair combed back. There was a look of dissatisfaction on his face and, even though
they had sex the night before, it made Lee-yeon anxious to approach him.
She played with the hem of her top as she spoke. “Did you sleep well last night?” she
asked, then couldn’t help but add, “Did you sleep beside me?”
“Yes, I slept well.”
She was shocked by how soft his voice was, but she couldn’t help but think that it
sounded forced.
“Anyway, we’re in a good spot.”
“Sorry?”
“There’s no one here.”
Lee-yeon’s breath hitched in her throat. Here?Everything was filthy. It was all a mess.
“What do you mean?” she asked.
“We didn’t have much time to talk,” he said. “The judging happened as soon as you
woke up.” He adjusted his grip on the scythe and stepped closer. “What’s the
reward?”
Lee-yeon could feel her palms begin to grow sweaty.
“I’m curious to know what the story was. Can you tell me?”
“Well” she trailed off, looking away from him. “It’s just an old story. It’s nothing.”
Her voice was quiet now and she tried her best to show him how uncomfortable she
was, but all he did was stare at her calmly. With his eyes, clear and bright, pointed
right at her, she knew she couldn’t keep quiet.
“I helped someone who looked desperately in need of help,” she finally said.
“Remember the singing tree I told you about in front of the Holy Tree? The one I told
you about before you went to bed?”
Kwon Chae-woo raised a brow. There was enough talk about the Holy Tree without
Lee-yeon’s recountings of Jang Beom-hee’s version. He nodded.
“Well, it was a woman,” Lee-yeon said. “She looked young, but she already had a
child. She stayed at my place for about a month and then left. It was a short stay, but
her family sent money as a thank you. I used that money for my uncle’s hospital bill
when he was sick. That’s all there is to it.” She could feel her throat tighten as she
spoke. Her heart was racing and her mouth had dried. She tried her best to hide the
shaking in her voice.
Kwon Chae-woo leaned down to level with her. He looked straight into her eyes. “Leeyeon,” he said. “I told you to stop lying.”
A chill went down her spine.
“I told you I’m sick of it. I’ve had enough of it all.”
It was like her tongue had frozen. She couldn’t speak.
“Lee-yeon, I know how to rip the truth from people. It’s easy for me,” he said, ignoring
the way her eyes widened. “But I don’t want to do that to you. I’m your husband, so I
should be kind to you as my wife.”
Though his voice was soft and kind, Lee-yeon couldn’t help but feel like she was being
threatened. Even if he was just standing in front of her, he was still holding a scythe.
Her body moved without thinking and she took a step back.
“What’s wrong?” he asked. “Do you not want to tell me more about the past? As my
wife, do you not want to let your husband know these things?” When she didn’t
answer, he continued. “Should I stop?”
Then, his face shifted slightly. His nostrils were now flared and he was frowning as
looked around the area. Something smelled different. It was like the scent of oil had
overtaken the smell of the grass. He looked back at her.
“Everything depends on you now, Lee-yeon,” he said. “What exactly did you do?” His
eyes were cold now.
Lee-yeon wondered if she had somehow gotten a heatstroke. Her legs were now losing
strength and she was breaking out into a cold sweat. Her mind was hazy, like she was
trapped in a swamp.
An image flashed through her head. It was a poster. A poster of someone who needed
to be found.
“Someone’s chasing me! Please! Please hide me! Help me!” The woman was pleading
in front of the then younger Lee-yeon.
Butit was a $200,000 reward.
She remembered being more convinced by the amount of money than by the woman’s
plea. She had looked at the woman’s face. It had been the face in the poster. She
remembered how Choo-ja had said that her uncle would need surgery and
chemotherapy to save his life. So—
“I called them.” She blurted out.
Kwon Chae-woo clutched the scythe. He had been the one that told his mother to go to
the girl’s house, to Lee-yeon’s house.
Lee-yeon looked at him seriously. “I had my priorities,” she said. “I don’t regret
choosing my uncle.”
“You don’t regret it?”
Before she could answer, Kwon Chae-woo began to chuckle. He thought of the mother
he had missed, the mother that had died in the basement beneath his room. She was
right there and yet she had died. As he looked around the forest, there was no hint of
life in his eyes.
“Aren’t you curious to know what happened to that woman?” he asked. “Don’t you
want to know what happened to the woman you sold to extend your uncle’s life?”
Lee-yeon looked away. “They told me that she went home. I like to think that she’s
doing well.”
“It’s nice that you think that,” he said, his words cutting her when he knew it hurt.
“Usually preys don’t survive,” he added in a whisper.
She frowned at him as he began to back away. She realized that this conversation was
something else, she didn’t understand its entirety. Everything was strange, everything
made her uneasy. She stared ahead at the man that was already moving away from
her.
“We met on the wrong terms,” he said.
“I don’t know what you’re trying to say, Chae-woo.”
“It’s okay if you don’t.” He started to laugh. “I was always a bit messed up here,” he
said, pointing at his head. “Anyway, thanks for your answer.” He swung the scythe
against a tree and left it jammed into the trunk.
“Chae-woo!” Lee-yeon called, but there was no use. As he turned away from her, the
last thing she did was the look on his face: halfway between smiling and crying.
Then, boom!
She covered her head at the unexpected explosion. There was fire spread across the
area. Soon, there was smoke everywhere. She tried to get away, but the fire was
already so strong that it felt like her skin was melting.
Lee-yeon looked back at the place where Kwon Chae-woo had been. He was gone.
And then, boom! There was another huge explosion.
Beeeep — a sharp ringing sound echoed inside her head.
“–llo?”
Her vision was blurry, speckled with blotches of light and color. In the midst of it all,
she could just make out the vague outline of a silhouette.
“Ma’am, do you hear me?”
The sound of the unfamiliar voice switched her body into alert mode. Lee-yeon sat up
in surprise and felt her breath shake roughly as though her lungs were unaccustomed
to the act of inhaling and exhaling. Her pupils dilated, she scanned the inside of the
white tent and observed the paramedics in front of her. She must have been in the
makeshift emergency room located at the bottom of the mountain.
“You’ll feel dizzy if you sit up so suddenly. Please lie down.”
The paramedic was calm as he gently pushed Lee-yeon’s shoulders back down. He was
putting gauze on Lee-yeon’s chin and pouring saline solution over the back of her
hand which burned. He emptied the bottle before quickly opening another one.
“Your guardian has spent every moment by your side. He should be here any minute.”

The last thing she remembered was being pushed forward by the waves. Thanks to the
growing pain she felt from the moment she opened her eyes, she was certain she’d
definitely hit her chin on some rocks as she fell. She had no idea how she’d made it
out alive.
Then the tent flap opened and there he was. Kwon Chae-woo in the same shoes,
jersey, and pale face.
“Lee-yeon, are you okay?”
The sound of his concerned voice cleared away any lingering feelings of faintness.
Frustrated, Lee-yeon scooched herself towards the edge of the bed in a feeble effort to
escape.
Her sudden movement caused the paramedic pouring saline over her hand to miss.
Lee-yeon quietly gripped the white bed sheet tightly in her hand. Her heartbeat
became sporadic.
“What, how, here” She didn’t know what to say.
“Ahh, you don’t remember?”
“What? Remember”
As he got closer, Lee-yeon’s body stiffened noticeably. However, Chae-woo placed
himself beside her with a sweet yet brazen look.
He smoothly took the saline from the paramedic and held Lee-yeon’s hand in his. Her
shoulders trembled.
“I left first and went down before you.”
She thought she saw a hint of mockery in his silent gaze. Lee-yeon wanted to yank her
hand from his grasp, but it wasn’t easy. He was very subtly applying pressure by
pressing his fingernails into the back of Lee-yeon’s hand. Yet his expression was as
innocent as a shameless young boy.
“I got a bad feeling from the sound and the smell.”

Chae-woo was particularly sensitive. Of course, she knew that.
“Fortunately, I saw the firefighters and came back up. And it’s a good thing I did. If I
had come just a little later, it would have become a big forest fire.”
Lee-yeon struggled to find the right words, her mouth opening and closing as she tried
to express her relief. “I’m just so glad you’re safe,” she finally managed to say.
On the surface, there was nothing unusual about his words. He was just a responsible
citizen who had stepped up and fought to protect the Golden Time. But to Lee-yeon,
his words meant so much more.
“Miss, we almost lost you! If he had seen the fire just a little bit later, you won’t have
survived. They said not even a single ant in the area survived. If it wasn’t for your
husband, you might have had much more serious burns. But instead, all you got was
shock from the explosion. You should consider yourself very lucky.”
The paramedics made such a fuss, it was as though they were trying to convince her
of Chae-woo’s innocence. Slowly, her anxiety faded.
Her confusion cleared and her sharp sense of foreboding and intuition became dull.
“Chae-woo, are you hurt?”
“Not a scratch.”
“Thank goodness.” Lee-yeon managed to lift the corners of her mouth, but there was
no hiding the fatigue which showed clearly on her face.
Chae-woo placed a hand on her arm and leaned his head towards her. Lee-yeon held
her breath.
The smell of his breath, a big shadow hovering above his forehead. It was dark and
cold enough to freeze her solid. Chae-woo whispered as if he were telling a secret.
“Lee-yeon won this evaluation.”
“what?”
“A tree surgeon got injured for being in the field on her own despite the danger. Isn’t
that so admirable?”

“After yesterday, there’s nothing more to consider.”
The feel of his cold breath against her ears made the hairs on the back of her neck
stand on end.
“Lee-yeon, what’s going on?!”
Just then, the tent opened with the boom of a Choo-ja’s loud voice as she rushed in,
her face deadly pale. Only checking that all of Lee-yeon’s limbs were still attached and
unharmed did she plop onto the emergency room bed.
“Choo-ja.”
Choo-ja, her body crumpled as though in anguish, hugged Lee-yeon tightly.
“Lee-yeon, what happened?”
Choo-ja was agitated by the unprecedented situation, but Lee-yeon just buried her
face into her shoulder without a word. She bit her lip and fought the urge to burst into
tears. Something scary and hard to face was just around the corner. She hid her face
deeper.
“You don’t have anyone to flirt with, so you’re using me, huh?” Despite her sharp
words, Choo-ja patted Lee-yeon’s body which trembled even as she did so. “I heard
that if it wasn’t for Chae-woo, you would have been in real trouble.”

Lee-yeon flinched at her words, but the older woman didn’t notice a thing.
Meanwhile, Chae-woo gazed numbly at Lee-yeon, who refused to look at him. His
facade of kindness and deceit had vanished entirely. In that instant, he crushed the
bottle of saline in his and it burst like a carton of milk.

The evaluation period is now over.
It was Lee-yeon who passed the third evaluation, just as he’d said.
Lee-yeon slept in a daze all the way back from the mountain.
As Lee-yeon made the journey back down the mountain, her mind was consumed with
a hazy fog. But upon her return, she put on a brave face, pretending as if nothing had
changed between her and Chae-woo. She smiled and laughed, going through the
motions, even though her heart felt heavy.
Chase-woo, too, seemed to have returned to his old self, his strange and manipulative
actions and words now a distant memory. All in all, it was as if the entire ordeal had
been nothing more than a fleeting nightmare. A plausible peace began to fill the gap
between them.
“Director! Are you listening to me?” Dong-mi’s voice interrupted Lee-yeon’s thoughts,
pulling her back to the present.
They were sitting around a small tea table in the front yard of the house, the shade
providing a welcomed relief from the hot sun. The ice in their glasses clattered as
Dong-mi stirred her iced tea with her straw. Lee-yeon quickly shook off her thoughts
and wrapped both hands around her own glass, the coldness bringing her back to her
senses.
“I’m sorry. It must be the heat,” Lee-yeon apologized, “Please continue.”
Even as she said this, she was studying Dong-mi’s complexion.
On this relaxed Sunday afternoon, while Chae-woo was gone grocery shopping, Dong- mi had dropped by, her face stunned for some reason. Her usually calm and cold
friend looked as thin and fragile as a broken leaf, a dull look in her eyes.
“It’s It’s so hard to put into to words, I feel like I’m going crazy” Dong-mi sighed
deeply and wrapped her hands around her head in distress.
“My man, doesn’t seem like himself.”
“What?”
Lee-yeon’s fingers, which had been wiping away the water droplets from the surface
of her glass, froze.
“The guy I’m harassing, no, I’m attacking, no, I’m seeing.”
“You can just say you like him”
“I can’t stand getting emotional.”
Dong-mi scratched her forearm as her earlobes turned red.
It was nothing Lee-yeon hadn’t heard before. They’re not dating, but Joo Dong-mi has
been seeing a guy. However, as she gripped her phone tightly in her hand, checking it
frequently, looking nervous and restless, Lee-yeon had no choice but to lend an ear to
her ranting.
“Well”
Suddenly, Dong-mi looked around nervously and lowered her voice. It was as if she
was afraid someone might overhear.
“He was burying someone.”
 Lee-yeon felt her heart drop. It was difficult to maintain her composure, but she
managed to swallow the lump in her throat.
“At first I thought it was a ghost. Did I missee? You and I, we’re hikers, so we know.
There are tons of ghosts in the mountains! Furthermore, that mountain is the site of a
major accident, so for a while I tried to convince myself that something terrible
latched onto me and it was all just a big misunderstanding!”
Dong-mi’s desperately scrunched up expression gradually subsided as if she were
regaining her calm.
“But, I’m not an idiot.”

Lee-yeon exhaled quickly and lowered her gaze.
“He was really burying someone. My man, the man I slept with!”

“What am I going to do, Director?”
Lee-yeon drank the iced tea she still had not touched. It felt like something was suck
in te pit of her stomach and she had troubling swallowing her tea. Her heart was
pounding and she felt dizzy.
“The reason I’m telling you all this is”
Lee-yeon subconsciously chewed her lip, unsure of what to say or do to help her
friend.
“At that mountain. You know the guy who looked like Godzilla with a loud squeaky
voice, who looked like your family.”
“Oh, yes. My cousin.”
“Yes, the Godzilla. He was the one my man was burying.”
“What?!”
Wh-what did this mean? Lee-yeon choked on her tea and coughed drily. Her cousin is
dead.
“So I thought you might know something about this. Maybe you also have someone
you know who is like this? What have I gotten myself into, director?”
“I only know one such person.”
“What?”
Suddenly, Dong-mi’s face was shocked. It was a totally incomprehensible response for
Lee-yeon.
“Is that person your man?” Dong-mi said in a jest.
“What? No, no. What are you talking about? No.”
Lee-yeon shook her head frantically, denying the reality of Dong-mi’s words and
closing her mouth, unable to find the right words to say.
A strange silence fell between them as they both struggled to process the shocking
revelation.

Dong-mi folded her arms, letting out a small sound, “Hmm-”.
Lee-yeon gave her a frustrated look. She quickly cleared her expression and bent her
upper body toward the table. Her voice sounded surprisingly sharp as she spoke
secretively.
“Did you get caught?”
“What?”
“Did you check your behind you properly when you ran away?”
“Uh”
Dong-mi was briefly distracted by Lee-yeon’s eyes which were swirling with a strange
look.
“If you’ve witnessed such a terrifying sight, the price will follow you.”
“What”
“Make sure you lock your doors tight and don’t go out alone in the dark. In case he
comes after you.”

“Always be on your guard.” Lee-yeon drew to fingers across her neck in one swift
cutting motion. She was being so creepy, it was hard to take her seriously. Dong-mi
was listening with her mouth open and suddenly burst into laughter.
“Right? You don’t believe me, do you?”
No, I don’t think anyone knows as well as I do! But before she could continue, Dong- mi spoke again.
“I’m sure I head he’s a police officer. He didn’t even tell me where he works. No
matter how sexy he is, isn’t it too suspicious? It’s not like we’re in some 1928 gangster
movie and I don’t want to film a new-school drama either, for that matter.”
Dong-mi nervously swept a hand over her hair. She looked towards Lee-yeon, the look
in her eyes a mix of weak irritation and bitter worry.
“Didn’t you hear anything from that Godzilla?”
“Yes.”
“He’s not a gangster. I have no idea what he was doing burying someone.”
Dong-mi was still chewing her lip and gripping her phone tightly even though she
acted like she was going to cut the man off completely. She stretched out her long
arms hoping for an answer and hung on Lee-yeon’s sleeve.
“What would you do if you were me?” She began crying which made Lee-yeon start to
sweat.
Lee-yeon was in no position to talk about someone else’s worries as her head swirled
with things she couldn’t mention. But-
“My man, it can’t be him.”
Lee-yeon lowered her shoulders and looked at the small garden in the yard. She had
not neglected any of it. She had carefully picked out the plants she wanted to nurture
and watch grow every day, and thanks to her dedicated care, the seeds she had
planted were now on the verge of bearing fruit.
“Until the tree leaves my hands, I never give up first,” she said, her voice as calm and
steady as the low wind. “That’s what tree doctors usually do. So I would take it in
stride.”
Dong-mi looked at her, confused. “What are you talking about?”
Staring at Lee-yeon’s profile, she couldn’t read her expression at all. Dong-mi looked
at her silently and scratched her cheek.
“But if the end is fixed, its Rather than withstanding, shouldn’t we just gradually
growing apart?”
It felt like someone had slammed a rock over her head. Lee-yeon did not even blink as
if she had frozen solid.
She had a strong urge to refute it, but there was nothing she could say in defense.

That night, Chae-woo looked disapprovingly at Lee-yeon, who focused solely on her
phone.
As he clicked through the channels, color leaked from the monitor making his face
flash blue and red like a goblin.
The short bursts of audio might have been bothersome, but Lee-yeon’s eyes were
glued to her phone. Chae-woo couldn’t take it anymore and turned toward her.
“Who is it?”
“What?”
Lee-yeon answered without looking up at first, then lifted her head. Her attitude was
obviously insincere and mechanical.
Chae-woo ground his teeth and suppressed his rising emotions. He pointed his head
towards Lee-yeon’s cell phone.
“I didn’t think you had any friends you kept in touch with privately.”
“Oh, it’s not personal.”
“Isn’t it private enough to contact each other at night?” His eyebrows furrowed in
annoyance.
“It’s just a college student.”
“A college student.”
“The president of the pine tree club. They’re coming to Hwaido over the vacation and
they want me to be their guide.”
Lee-yeon’s gaze naturally slid back to her phone and Chae-woo reached out without
thinking.
However, seeing the shadow approach, she flinched and pulled her hand back.


His hand paused in the air. A cold silence swirled between them.”
“Uh, that’”
Lee-yeon’s embarrassment hit her a little bit too late, as she rolled her eyes, unable to
think of a plausible excuse.
“There-there was a mosquito”
Chae-woo slowly raised the corners of his mouth at her blatant lie. Lee-yeon glanced
at his face, but it was difficult to tell whether he was angry or laughing out of
disbelief.
“Why should you be their guide?”
After a moment, Chae-woo pulled his hand back and continued on casually. The heartrending moment passed as if nothing happened as he smoothly changed the subject.
However, Lee-yeon swallowed drily, as the thought that a well-defined voice could cut
like a sword and capture a moment.
“If they’re college students, that means they have no money. Are you volunteering
then?”
“It’s actually the other way around. The pay is pretty high.”
The Pine Tree Club was a joint club of universities in the Seoul metropolitan area.
They needed an expert to introduce the famous pine trees in Hwaido, and the
chairman of the club had contacted Lee-yeon using his personal connections.
The student’s uncle was a reporter from the environment department of the Kilbo,
who often held hands when Lee Yeon thought someone of wrongdoings. She normally
would have refused to do anything involving other people, but now she needed a
reason to go out and be busy.
“So, you’re going to take those punks around to look at pine trees, Lee-yeon?”
Chae-woo’s voice was monotonous, but there was strange dreary feeling that pulled at
the hairs on the back of her neck.
“What punks?”
“Think about those bearded guys following you around”
Just then, Lee-yeon suddenly raised a hand to stop Chae-woo from speaking. The man
was speechless at the sight of her palm raised out in front of him, as Lee-yeon quickly
answered her phone that had just started to ring.
“Hello?”
Chae-woo let out a short breath, “Ha,” and swept his bangs up. What’s going on here?
The thick voice over the phone stuck in his ear like a needle. He tapped his thigh with
the remote control as he watched Lee-yeon calmly take the call.
“It’s some boy’s voice.”
While talking on the phone in a low voice, she paused and looked at him.
“Is he the one you were texting earlier?”
“Uh” Lee-yeon lost her focus trying to listen to both voices at once and became
flustered.
“Lee-yeon, you don’t accept these kinds of troublesome favors.”

“At least that’s what I thought.” Suddenly, Chae-woo stared at the loose gap between
them. There was enough space for an entire person between them. As soon as he
narrowed the distance, Lee-yeon jumped from the sofa.


He burst into laughter and roughly turned off the TV. Then the room, which had been
filled with noise, quickly became quiet. Meanwhile, Lee-yeon continued to talk on the
phone as Chae-woo leaned against the sofa.
His quick eyes were fierce and sharp, following her movements, such as the number of
steps she walked back and forth across the living room, the shape of her mouth
responding kindly, and her meaningless laughter.
“-Yes, yes. I’ll see you then.”
Finally, she ended the call and looked back at him, the atmosphere subdued.
“Chae-woo why did you turn off the TV?”
“I found something more interesting to watch.”
Chae-woo put his elbows on the back of the sofa and smiled.
Lee-yeon avoided contact and ignored his sudden lax posture, but as soon as her eyes
happened to see his pants, her jaw dropped. She shrieked as if she were holding a
frying pan on fire.
“Chae-woo, what’s going on? Why are you suddenly erect?”
“Ahh.” He tilted his head slowly, his voice relaxed. “I’m not tempted, so don’t worry. I
don’t know about you, but for men, we don’t only get erection when we’re turned on.”
“Then why”
“Sometimes I get hard when I feel like holding a weapon.”
“What?” As Lee-yeon’s expression was vague as he raised his shoulders lightly as if
joking.
“It’s just a matter of mood.”
Lee-yeon seemed to be dragged by his pace but she was confused about what he
meant and didn’t mean because of his unconstrained attitude.
“Aren’t you curious?”
“About what?”
“This time, I think it’s harder than usual.” He said, referring to his engorged part.
“Don’t you want to know how it feels to have blood drawn in a different way?”
“Uh”
“Since you’re doing something you’ve never done before, I guess it turned me on.”
Lee-yeon curled her shoulders at Chae-woo’s blatant flirting, feeling uncomfortable
and trapped. She scratched nervously under her ears, her eyes darting towards the
door like a prey searching for a way out. She couldn’t pretend to be comfortable with
him this time.
He could almost hear the gears turning in her head. He lured her tightly to his pouted
lips and urged her not to be afraid.
“Yes? Lee-yeon.”
“I normally I don’t really like such various functions.”
At this, she hurried into her office. Click! And just before the door closed, “I’m going
to work overtime today! You can go to bed first!” Chae-woo’s stomach ached
unpleasantly.
As he stared at the tightly closed door, the look in his eyes turned cold as ice.
“Introducing you all to the tax-paying pine tree, Seok Song-ryeong,” Lee-yeon
declared, capturing the attention of the slumbering students. Their curious eyes fixed
on the towering specimen, filled with wonder.
As a group that shared a deep love for pine trees, the students instinctively analyzed
the tree’s age and health. A smile played on Lee-yeon’s lips as she basked in their
shared passion for the natural world.
“Do any of you pay property tax?” the students asked in hushed tones.
Lee-yeon shook her head. “Not yet, but this tree is unique. It holds a resident number
and is a registered landowner.”
“A landowner?” they repeated in disbelief.
“Yes,” Lee-yeon confirmed. “It owns a plot of land measuring two thousand pyeong.”

The students gasped in amazement at the information they received.
“If a tree can inherit, you won’t find its like anywhere else in the world,” Lee-yeon
added, emphasizing the tree’s unique qualities.
Even the small fir tree, with its simple brushstroke appearance, seemed even more
magnificent in light of this new knowledge. The students gazed in awe at the large
leaves overhead, their mouths slightly agape.
“This tree not only pays income and land taxes from the crops it produces, but it also
supports the community by offering scholarships to nearby students,” Lee-yeon
explained, scanning the group with a hint of nervousness.
Her cheeks flushed red as she locked eyes with a few male students, particularly the
towering figure of Kwon Chae-woo, who stood out with his cold expression.
Despite her efforts to remain composed, Lee-yeon couldn’t shake off the nervousness
that came with being watched by him..
“And so every year on Lunar New Year, the villagers hold a ceremony in honor of the
tree,” Lee-yeon added with a forced smile, her jaw visibly trembling.
Her thoughts raced as she wondered why Kwon Chae-woo was here. She had gone to
the office the night before to avoid him, but now he was here in front of her. The
sound of footsteps and breathing echoed in her mind from that pitch-black room.
She had stayed up late, scribbling in her treatment diary with a focused gaze. It
wasn’t until the break of dawn that she returned to the living room.
“Whoa” the students exclaimed in wonder, but Lee-yeon’s thoughts were elsewhere.
In the darkness, Lee-yeon’s eyes locked with Kwon Chae-woo’s, their gaze as intense
as blades. He was sitting on the sofa, just as she had left him, and the moment she
saw him, his cold and piercing eyes made her shiver. She couldn’t understand why he
was still here, waiting for her with such determination.
“Is everything finished?” Kwon asked, examining her closely. Lee-yeon quickly
nodded, feeling intimidated by the severity in his words.
As he stood up from the couch, the cheap leather cushions sagged under his weight.
He walked towards Lee-yeon, making her feel trapped and leading her towards the
bedroom. Despite the uncomfortable atmosphere, she slept soundly and woke up
feeling refreshed the next morning.
She went about her day normally, seeing Kwon off to work. Yet, there he was, still
observing her with a hawk-like intensity.
‘Why is he here?’
The man in his casual clothes looked no different from the surrounding students. But
his eyes were different from the students. He looked suspicious. Lee-yeon kept trying
to break away from the nerve-wracking stare and continued with her teaching.
“The landowner who had no children gave this land to this tree. It’s already been
registered for eighty years and left a will, so it’s officially inherited. The trunk had
withered. Lee-yeon checked her watch while slightly raising her straw hat.
“Shall we go to the next pine tree?”
At that moment, the club president approached and handed her a cold drink. “Here
you go, teacher,” he said, his voice soft and respectful.
Lee-yeon hesitated, her eyes flicking between the aluminum can and the young man in
front of her.
“Teacher, you used to write a column about tree stories for the K newspaper, right?”
the young man continued, a hint of excitement in his voice.
Lee-yeon stiffened, her eyes wide with surprise. “How do you know that?”
She thought no one read the article she wrote.
“I just happened to see it in my uncle’s newspaper, and I’ve been reading it ever since.
I thought your perspective was cool. I’ve been wondering who this person is who
thinks from the perspective of a tree. I was disappointed that it wasn’t a regular
column.”
The young man’s words caused a flicker of pride in Lee-yeon’s chest, but it was
quickly replaced with a sense of unease. She couldn’t shake the feeling that she was
being watched.
The young man with a gentle expression ran his fingers through his hair.
“I thought maybe I could become a fan of you at this point,” he said.
“Oh, I am happy that you liked my article,” said Lee-yeon, startled by the unfamiliar
words and lowering her head.
“It’s true. From the perspective of the hurting trees, it’s a shock for me to inflict harm
on people. To be honest, I even asked my uncle to introduce us because I really
wanted to meet you.”

“I’ve been looking for someone who can fill a whole day just talking about trees.” He
blushed and smoothed his neck.
“Teacher, do you know older men?”
The young man’s sharp eyebrows drew together as he struggled to find the words he
wanted to say. He opened and closed his mouth, looking momentarily flustered.
“If you’re talking about older men who spend hours talking to trees,” Lee-yeon
responded with a small smile, “then I know plenty of them.”
The young man seemed to relax a little, but his gaze remained intense. “No, that’s not
what I meant,” he corrected.
His eyes never left Lee-yeon’s as he asked, “Teacher, do you have a boyfriend?”
The question caught Lee-yeon off guard, and she nearly choked on her drink. “Euh”
she stammered.
At the mention of boyfriend, Lee-yeon unconsciously looked at Kwon Chae-woo.
Sure enough, a fierce look was directed at the back of the young man’s head. His face,
which seemed to likely kick the boy mercilessly, was like a ghostly apparition.
Perhaps it was just her imagination, but it seemed as if his eyes were filled with
blodlust, as if he were about to pull her towards him or tear her apart without a
second thought.
Despite the distance between them, his jaw was clenched tightly, like a tree root.
Soon, his fierce gaze turned towards Lee-yeon, and her legs began to feel weak, as if
they were tied up with chains. She could not feel her blood flowing.
At that time, the cell phone on her neck vibrated. I thought I knew who it was without
checking, so Lee Yeon just closed her mouth and put her cell phone in her ear.
-“Say it yourself that you have a husband.”
The sharp voice reached her taut nerves.
-“Speak,” he said.
He looked at the young man’s head and was licking his lips. The impulse to crush and
destroy it was strangely reflected on his face.
When the inexplicable anger filled his head, it didn’t matter whose feelings or
memories they were, the distinction became meaningless.
-“Here you can’t even lock the door, what are you going to do?” A voice that sounded
bitter and low reverberated as if it were watching her.
-“It’s different from yesterday. If you keep quiet, that child will scream.”

-“So, open that mouth.” Even though her temples were pounding, Lee-yeon managed
to control her expression.
-“I have a husband.” She replied, her voice devoid of emotions. She swallowed her dry
saliva and followed him with a blank expression, like a puppet being controlled. “I
have a husband.”
“What?”
At this, the young man’s face showed a huge disappointment. His eyes grew wide with
surprise, and his mouth hung open. He seemed to have been taken aback by Leeyeon’s sudden announcement.
-“My husband’s hobby is collecting bones.” Kwon-Chae Woo dictated over the phone.
‘My husband’s hobby is collecting— what?” She stopped herself mid-air.
Her face suddenly turned red with anger. What if she actually uttered those words?
Her one and only fan would find her a lunatic.
-“Don’t you know how to talk properly?”
She felt as if her mind, which had been overwhelmed for a moment, had suddenly
come back to life.
Her hand trembled as she ended the call, yet she continued to gaze at Kwon Chae-woo
with a cold, unwavering stare. He simply shrugged in response, unaffected by her
piercing gaze.
Meanwhile, the young man’s eyes blinked rapidly and his throat constricted.
“My uncle was certain that the teacher was still single and unattached,” he spoke.
Lee Yeon took a deep breath and stiffened her neck as she tried to calm herself. “I
used to believe I was single too,” she said, her voice barely above a whisper.
“There are many who know that,” the young man sighed, his shoulders slumping.
Just as the silence hung heavy in the air, a braided girl with an innocent expression
entered the room, glancing briefly at the young man.
“Did you marry your ideal type, teacher?” she asked, a hint of curiosity in her voice.

The girl must have been listening all this time.
Lee-yeon was speechless. It was a topic that she had never thought about in her life.
Just then, Kwon Chae-woo looked at her expectantly.
”  If it is my ideal type, it might turn into a big problem.” Lee-yeon jested.
“Really?” The girl replied.
“Don’t fantasize too much about marriage dear. For if it were to end in divorce, you’ll
find yourself a stranger to each other.”
“Oh, yes” Cutely, the girl in her early 20s nodded in sympathy.
“Then how long have you been dating and married, teacher?”
“Uh, we just met, so we got married right away.”
At the words, the female student’s eyes lit up with wonder
“That’s how much you fell in love at first sight?” Was it your first love?”
As she walked away, the sun’s golden rays cast a warm glow upon her eyes, causing
them to gleam. Despite the lively, cheerful laughter ringing in the air, Lee-yeon’s face
was rigid and her smile was forced.
She was taken aback by the realization of how much Kwon Chae-woo had come to
dominate her thoughts.
But she suppressed the feeling and put on a false grin.
“No, it’s not like that,” she called out to the students, continuing to guide them to the
next pine tree.
Her retreating form was shrouded in a hint of sadness, as she receded into the
distance.
Clink. Clink.
The silverware echoed through the silent dining room.


Lee-yeon’s gaze is fixed on Kwon Chae-woo, her attention so absorbed that she hardly
notices as her food slips from her plate. The warm aroma of the meal fills the air as
she removes her shoes, enveloping her in its comforting embrace.
Kwon Chae-woo gestures towards the washroom, his movements measured and
unhurried as he sets down the utensils.
Just as Lee-yeon prepares to demand an explanation for his behavior, she falters, the
fire in her chest dissipating in the face of his tranquil demeanor.
“I’ll give you a foot rub a bit later.” Kwon Chae-woo picked up her food for her.
“W-why?” Lee-yeon asked while staring at the eggroll on her bowl.
“Your feet must hurt from walking all day.”
“That’s true but” Kwon Chae-woo almost scoffed at her reaction.
“We even wrapped our thighs around each other, what’s wrong with feet?”

“Also I said I’ll rub it, not break it.”
That added explanation is even weirder
Lee-yeon hardly smiled and bit the eggroll.
She feels the vibration of her phone and instinctively glances at the screen. A message
from the head of her club lights up the screen. Mention of a gathering sends her mind
racing. Suddenly, Kwon Chae-woo slams down his chopsticks, his voice cold.
“We’re having a meal right now.”
Lee-yeon looks up at him, taken aback.
“But it’s after work hours. What do they want?”
“What do you mean? I’m getting paid for this,” she retorts.
Kwon Chae-woo tried to hide his frustration as Lee-yeon casually answered.
“So, just because of that you’re being distracted.”
“ What are you talking about?”
“I caught this fish with my own two hands and cooked it just for you. So, pay attention
to me.” Kwon Chae-woo’s voice is tinged with frustration as he grips the edge of the
table, causing the dishes to tremble.
“What’s so special about money? I’m giving you all of me. My body.” He spoke.
Lee-yeon is taken aback by his words. Kwon Chae-woo continues, his voice rising,
‘I can give you that money, I own the mountain behind your place. Half of the
mountains in Hwaido are mine!’ He almost said this but bit back the rest of his
outburst and wallowing a gulp of water instead.
Lee-yeon set down her utensils, her expression growing serious.
“What do you mean, ‘just money’? You are talking too much for someone just starting
out in their career.”
Kwon Chae-woo said nothing, but his frown deepened as he pressed a hand to his
chest.
Lee-yeon continued, her voice stern, “Our store would close down if you don’t take
money seriously.”
Her words stung and Kwon Chae-woo felt a surge of anger. He imagined making her
kneel before him, making her suffer even more than his mother did.
But he held his tongue, swallowing his emotions and forcing himself to stay calm.
Lee-yeon was tapping on the table even during all this and kept scolding.
“I think you’re forgetting that you came here with nothing. This house, car,
electronics, everything is mine. Even the interest on our debt I’m paying all on my
own! Who is complaining now? . Ah, except for second floor.”
She added quietly.
“As couple, we have to work towards the same goal.”
“Lee-yeon, you’ve changed.”
She flinched as his dark eyes looked at her.
“H-how did I change? That’s what I should be!”
“You said let’s only look at things that are beautiful and good.”

“You were worried that I would fly away. You liked me so much that you wanted to
hide me. You said that only you can see something this good and that you wouldn’t
even let me leave the house. How could you change so much?”
Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t help feeling annoyed at the stark difference in how she was
treating the two of him—the old, foolish Kwon Chae-woo and the one that got back his
memories.
Despite hearing her words himself, he couldn’t ignore the fact that discrimination was
wrong.
“You’re distracted while we eat, so are you going to be same while we have sex?”

“Do it, I’m curious what will happen.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes shook. She was examining his face either because she couldn’t say
anything because of his point or that he remembers all the conversation they had.
“A child is a child. Pathetic how they think they can use money for you.”
His lips twisted.
“Don’t bother with the juniors. What would you even do with dick that’s not—”
That moment, Kwon Chae-woo shut his mouth. His face suddenly turned dark and
changed.
“ What’s wrong?” As she carefully asked, the man chugged water and avoided her.
“ I’m—”
Kwon Chae-woo was also four years younger than So Lee-yeon so he was also a
dongsaeng.
He thought he fucked up.
“I was a bit rash.”
“Pardon?”
“. A little monkey smells good apparently.”
He felt dirty for some reason. He lost his appetite and didn’t eat.
“Like I said before, don’t take it unless necessary.”
The doctor gave him a bottle of medicine hesitantly but wouldn’t let go easily.
Kwon Chae-woo snatched the bottle regardless of the doctor’s warning.
He used going to the store as an excuse so he had to go back in a hurry.
“Just sleep instead!”
The doctor shouted behind him.
“You shouldn’t take it so leisu—“
The world became so quiet as he slammed the door. He stopped frowning as well.
As he walked down the hallway of a hospital, the phone vibrated. Kwon Chae-woo took
the call.
–Kwon Ki-Seok, no movement from him.
“What about So Lee-yeon?”
–She’s tending the garden.
Kwon Chae-woo kicked his tongue.
“She’s like a puppy.”
–Young master.
That moment, Jang Beom-hee called him worryingly. Kwon Chae-woo frowned like he
knew what was coming.
–How about we go back up instead of taking the medicine? I’ll get it prepared
immediately.

Kwon Chae-woo didn’t use his face at all like he wasn’t on the phone.
–No matter how I think, I think staying in Hwaido is waste of time. Just don’t think
about So Lee-yeon and sleep comfortably. I’ll take you to your home.
As he regained more of his memories, the fantasy of So Lee-yeon being able to cure
his hypersomnia began to fade. The emotional bond he once felt towards her was
weakening with each passing day, and eventually, the chain was broken completely.
It was his absolute instinct and Kwon Chae-woo hasn’t slept in a few days so that he
wouldn’t be caught.
–Wasn’t your goal Kwon Ki-seok to begin with?
“Yes.”
His family was trying to transform the youngest son who came back in 10 years as a
fitting member of the family.
The family that was maintaining its relationship through bad tradition emphasized on
solidarity but to the boy who lived as Yoon Joo-ha’s son, it meant nothing.
Kwon Chae-woo kept denying the connection by blood and chose to be in solitude.
When the man who stopped playing chess became the hunting dog, he dug about Yoon
Joo-ha, his mother, like he had been waiting for this opportunity.
And he found out that the reason why his parents locked up Yoon Joo-ha in the
basement wasn’t just because of anger.
Yoon Joo-ha was the sole survival from the illegal human experience that was ran by
Sooguk pharmaceutical.
When she was about 10 years old, she was able to barely escape thanks to a kind lab
partner, and she was able to find a sponsor that helped her fulfill her musical talent.
She pushed aside the memories of her torment and grew into a beautiful young
woman. Yet as she began to teach the talented Kwon Ki-Seok the art of music, her
past slowly crept back into her consciousness.
When she found out that the Kwon family was actual owner of Sooguk pharmaceutical,
the 21-year-old Yoon Joo-ha was swallowed by her nightmare from the past.
People screaming in pain, her little brother who was starving to death, the basement
facility full of molds. All of this overcame her each time she walked past Kwon family’s
fancy garden and saw Kwon Ki-Seok in fancy private school uniform.
Yoon Joo-ha had a gentle heart, but she made a desperate choice to hide the Kwon’s
three-year-old son in a cello bag and flee just a year after becoming Kwon Ki-seok’s
music teacher.
Her plan for revenge was flawed from the start.
Instead of causing harm to the child, she raised him with love.
Kwon Chae-woo felt a sense of obligation to fulfill the unfinished mission of the woman
who raised him.
“Would I really be the only one in Korea that detest Kwon family?”
Was there really not a single person who didn’t protest about their method of total
obedience?
The main duty of these people was basically being a hunting dog, so once Kwon Chaewoo overtook this group, it was more often that he would secretly take them board.
Something Kwon Chae-woo has been planning a long time.
That was the dissolution of the Kwon family.
–Yes, so do we really have to ruin your body just to fool So Lee-yeon?”
“Just to fool her.”
He chewed on Jang Beom-hee’s words without emotion.
“Honestly, it really isn’t important. But,” Kwon Chae-woo slowed down and eventually
stopped. “Nowadays, she feigns a smile, yet her eyes tell a different story.”
– Pardon?
“You know the process, Beom-hee.”
Kwon Chae-woo took in the smell of the alcohol for sanitary purposes.
“How the animals react when they realized they’re about to be slaughtered.”
“Meat gets tougher the more they struggle.”
Kwon Chae-woo said, his eyes flickering as he gazed out the window. He took a deep
breath and closed his eyes, trying to compose himself.
“I didn’t wait until now to eat something that’s not good.”
He closed his eyes. His voice was calm.
In the quiet stillness of the night, Lee-yeon lay wide awake, her gaze fixed upon the
ceiling above. Suddenly, she was disturbed by the rustling of her bed sheets.
“Lee-yeon, are you having trouble sleeping?” Kwon Chae-woo’s deep voice interrupted
her thoughts, his strong hand gently tapping the side of her head. The heat of his
breath was palpable, settling against her cheek as he leaned in close.
She pulled the thin summer blanket all the way up to her nose and only twitched her
brows.
“I drank coffee earlier when Chae-woo weren’t here,” she admitted.
“Why did you do that?” Chae-woo asked.
“I couldn’t fall asleep. I thought I would stay up until you fall asleep first.”
There was a brief moment of silence as Chae-woo considered her words. His lips
twitched slightly, the only indication of his thoughts in the darkened bedroom.
“These days, I always fall asleep first,” Lee-yeon continued. “But when I wake up,
you’re already awake.”
“Is that a problem?” Chae-woo asked.
“No, it’s not a problem,” Lee-yeon replied. “But it would be nice if it changed for a
day.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her eyes without a hint of sleepiness and pressed his mouth
in a thin line.
It has been two days since she hasn’t slept well, and she’s already reaching his limit.
Her refusal to surrender to slumber was beginning to wear on him. He could only
keep going with the aid of caffeine and prescription pills.But then, So Lee-yeon
stubbornly refused to sleep too, and his mouth tightened involuntarily.
With a calm voice, he asked, “Didn’t you mention an appointment with Gyu-baek
tomorrow?”
“Oh,” Lee-yeon muttered, as if she had forgotten all about it.
“Are you not planning on sleeping tonight?”
“Well”
Lee-yeon hesitated, as if there was something she wanted to keep unsaid. Her gaze
met Kwon Chae-woo’s, stretching out like warm, pliant dough, refusing to break.
Kwon Chae-woo thought that it would be better to turn off the concern, suspicion, or
interest, and he abruptly reached into Lee-yeon’s pajamas.

Lee-yeon was taken aback and grabbed the hand that had crept up on her clothes.
“What, what are you doing?”
“Just go to sleep like this. You were tired today, right?”
Kwon Chae-woo gently massaged Lee-yeon’s belly. As warmth spread through her
chilly lower belly, Lee-yeon felt as if her body was melting into a hot spring.
“It’s been a long time since I haven’t seen Kwon Chae-woo’s face when he’s asleep!”
“Did you look at that face for a whole month and still want to see it again? Are you not
tired of it?”
“That’s ”
Lee-yeon longed for the moment when Kwon Chae-woo would awaken in her arms,
wrapped in her embrace. At the time, his expression may have been impassive, but
her view had since changed.
He has somehow changed.
“Ugh!”
The hand that roamed the lower abdomen lifted up her pajamas and touched her
underwear. Lee-yeon flinched and grabbed his wrist again, but Kwon Chae-woo didn’t
care and rubbed her fold as if digging out with his fingernails.
“Sigh”
She couldn’t help it, but she was out of breath.
He squeezed his digits underneath her underwear and swept the fragile, smooth flesh
at once.
There was a sense of pleasure as if sprouting from a sudden stimuli, but there was
also discomfort.
“Kwon Chae-woo, stop it, I told you not to!”
She tightened her thigh and raised her upper body, thinking that this couldn’t go on.
But her body was blocked by the man’s arm, and she fell back onto the bed helplessly.
“Just go to sleep like this.”
“Uh How can I sleep in this condition? I’m not feeling okay!”
He quickly found a sensitive spot and pressed it cleverly, shaking it. Every time he
tickled her, her breathing swelled as if it was about to burst, but Lee-yeon tried to
hold back her moans and bite her lower lip.
The moment Kwon Chae-woo pressed his lips to her cheek-
“Go to sleep!” Lee-yeon fiercely turned her head and spoke firmly.


The motion that had been grinding against her stilled for an instant, an intentional
surrender by Kwon Chae-won. But, strange as it may be, her resistance only served to
stir a feelingwithin him.
With a leisurely gaze, Kwon scanned Lee-yeon’s delicate jawline and the collarbone
that jutted out sharply. Her desperate attempts to dodge his touch only fueled his
mischievous spirit. A thick, calloused finger found its way inside the opening, eliciting
a flinch from its recipient.
“Oh..!”
Lee-yeon’s brow wrinkled relentlessly.
“You know what? Lee-yeon only persecutes me. He smiles well to other men and is
kind but not to me.”
Would you have done that to other Kwon Chae-woo?
A pathetic sense of inferiority gnawed at him. How could he be jealous of his past self?
He found this ridiculous.
Her trivialities have been frantic lately. The inner wall, which is not even wet yet,
swallows its finger well to the end of the root, but she pushes him away.
Lee-yeon even feigned a casual snore, in a vain attempt to escape his touch and
caresses. Little did she know that such a flimsy facade only served to incite his desires
even further.
He was irked by her behavior, a far cry from the first time they had been together.
She used to flinch every time he touched her most sensitive spot.
“Who is Lee-yeon’s first love?”
He stretched and pressed on her clit with his middle finger in. His lifeless eyes were
quite different from his hands squealing in and out of the way.
She remained unresponsive. Kwon Chae-won spoke to himself, “I don’t understand
why you’re so stubborn, but you’ll always be my first love.”
There was no reply.
“I don’t like to repeat myself,” he added with a hint of warning in his voice.

“Tree.” Then Lee-yeon blurted out as if she were talking in her sleep.
“Tree? Is that bastard’s name Tree?”

“Do you know where he lives?”

“What does he look like? Can you draw a sketch now?”
Lee-yeon’s head has gone blank. He has not stopped for one second what he was
doing. She sighed.
“Stop it. We are supposed to be sleeping, you know Why do you have to do this while
I’m sleeping peacefully!”
She pushed Kwon Chae-woo’s shoulder, but he didn’t stir.
“I don’t understand.”
As she muttered that, her hand that was rubbing her belly extended to three fingers.
“Is it so terrible for a husband and wife to play in bed together?”
“Gosh”
“Why are you always so sensitive?” His thrusts persistently stretched her inner walls,
scooping up the love juice, and arousing her. His crooked fingers slipped in and out.
Despite her efforts, Lee-yeon could not resist the effects of this ministrations to her.
The flame between her legs burned brighter and hotter. Lee-yeon was close to
breaking out in a cold sweat as she bit her tongue, desperately trying to hide any
visible reactions.
“Hah”
The anxious moan came from Kwon Chae, not her. Before he knew it, his penis had
made his presence visible through his pants and was stabbing at Lee-yeon’s pelvic
area. Finally, she opened her eyes and glared at him.
“If you don’t take your hands off now, I won’t have sex with Kwon Chae-won again.”
His face, which had been straight all the time while caressing explicitly, was quickly
distorted.
“Do you know what you did wrong?”
“Was my fingers too thin?” He said, spiting her even more.

“Or did it hurt because my fingers are too callous? I should have washed it with my
mouth from the beginning.”
Lee-yeon took a deep breath as if meditating not to get caught up in him.
“It’s not that. You used to react very sensitively to my feelings!”
She fixed him with a cool, unreadable gaze.
“—But these days”
“Can’t you recognize me anymore, Lee-yeon?” As he said this, he pinched her sensitive
nub. The suction was akin to that of his mouth, so she almost groaned loudly.
“Well”
However, once she began to feel uncomfortable, the pleasure transformed into a
weighty weakness, rather than a source of pure enjoyment.
Lying helplessly under his power is not what Lee-yeon wanted. She doesn’t even want
to affirm Kwon Chae-woo’s rudeness in this way.
Her voice rose in pitch.
“Don’t you care about my feelings?” she asked.
“No,” Kwon Chae-won replied, his tone flat and devoid of any hesitation.
“Then why don’t you leave me alone in the first place?”
Lee-yeon clutched her chest, feeling as if her throat was closing up.
“You’re the reason for my mood swings, several times a day,” she said.
Kwon Chae-woo wrinkled his eyebrows and nibbled on her lower lip.
“Don’t cry over such small things.”
His lips were parting, and his tongue was pushing forward. As he licked and sucked,
he touched the inside of Lee-yeon’s mouth.
The man caressed everything from the roots of her tongue, and the more he toyed
with her reactions, the more she grew an unknown grudge.
“This bastard” she whispered with a muffled voice.
Kwon Chae-woo parted his lips and asked, “What did you say?”
“You bastard, you bastard”
Her eyes, filled with disappointment, were welling up with tears. Kwon Chae-woo
licked them away.
“Did you know that just now?”
The man deliberately played her sensitive spot and pulled out his finger at last. Her
backside trembled, but Lee-yeon struggled not to make a sound.
Kwon Chae-woo looked expressionless at the transparent liquid on his finger, and
suddenly lowered his pants and spread it on the tip of his ruddy manhood.
“You’re not going to have sex with me again?” He dragged Lee-yeon’s hand to hold his
veiny manhood. She tried to hold back as hard as he could, but it was useless. He held
her hands together and made them clasp him tightly.
Lee-yeon freaked out at the strangely wriggling object in the palm of her hand, but
soon afterwards, her hands moved quickly from top to bottom.
The heat of friction made her palms burn, but at the same time, something damp kept
flowing out.
“I don’t know about Lee-yeon-”
He fixed his gaze on her trembling eyes as if he were sticking his claws into them.
Even as his ragged breathing erupted intermittently, his relentless eyes did not waver.
His brow furrowed, and veins tightened around his neck.
“They like to be beaten up.”
Soon, Kwon Chae-woo’s hands began to bob so quickly that he couldn’t keep up. Her
arms and wrists hurt, and her hands tingled.
Soon, his lips parted and heavy moans escaped.
When something hot broke above her hand, Lee-yeon felt dizzy from the strong smell.
“Shit, not having sex. Even if Lee-yeon doesn’t like it, I’m going to keep making it. Do
you want to vomit?”
Lee-yeon’s entire body relaxed into a state of blissful laziness, as if she had just run a
hundred-meter sprint. Her belly pulsed with sensitivity, but she couldn’t muster the
strength to lift her heavy eyelids.
Kwon Chae-won briefly kissed her ear and whispered affectionately,
“Tonight, we’ll have sweet dreams together.”

*
Continue in part 4!

